
Prompt: A person who listens to music by artist also would enjoy
 + 

listening to music by similar artists. They may also enjoy exploring different genres of music and discovering new artists. Additionally, they could look into attending live concerts or events related to the artist they enjoy listening to.
 + 

listening to music from other artists in the same genre. They might also enjoy listening to similar-sounding songs from different genres, or exploring new genres that their favorite artists have been influenced by. Additionally, they could also check out remixes and covers of songs by their favorite artist, as well as any side projects they may have created.
 +  songs by similar artists. Listening to similar artists can expose a person to new music that they may not have heard before and broaden their music taste.
 +  music from similar artists. This is because artists often share a similar sound, genre, or style. Additionally, music fans tend to find comfort in discovering new music that feels familiar and provides a similar listening experience. Therefore, it is likely that someone who enjoys music from one artist would also enjoy music from similar artists.
 +  listening to music from other artists that are similar in genre. For example, if someone enjoys listening to rock music by Led Zeppelin, they may also enjoy listening to rock music by bands such as AC/DC or Van Halen.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Amnesia was her Name also would enjoy
 +  music from other alternative rock bands such as The Smashing Pumpkins, Radiohead, Weezer, The Strokes, and Interpol. They might also enjoy indie-pop, punk, and synth-pop artists such as Grimes, CHVRCHES, Vampire Weekend, Paramore and Foster the People.
 +  songs by other artists like:

-The 1975
-Marina and the Diamonds
-Lana Del Rey
-CHVRCHES
-Lorde
-The Neighbourhood
-Florence + The Machine
-alt-J
-Vampire Weekend
-Haim
-M83
 +  other artists who have a similar style, such as The Cure, Joy Division, Interpol, Sonic Youth, Bloc Party, The Smiths, Television, and Pixies.
 +  music from artist like Adele, Halsey, Billie Eilish, Taylor Swift, Ariana Grande, Selena Gomez and Maroon 5.
 +  listening to music by similar artists such as Lana Del Rey, The National, Beach House, Fleet Foxes, The xx, Alt-J and Bon Iver.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Lifetime Achievement Award also would enjoy
 +  music by

Stevie Wonder, Bob Dylan, Aretha Franklin, Ray Charles, Miles Davis, The Beatles, Jimi Hendrix, U2, Bruce Springsteen, and David Bowie.
 +  music by NOFX. NOFX is a punk rock band that began in 1983 and has released several albums, many of which have received critical acclaim. They are known for their high energy live performances and their innovative blend of punk, ska, and pop-punk sounds. They are also known for their political and social commentary in some of their songs
 +  the music of Bruce Springsteen. Bruce Springsteen is an acclaimed American singer-songwriter who has won numerous awards, including 20 Grammys. He is known for his unique blend of folk, rock and blues. His music is often uplifting and inspiring, as well as being incredibly catchy and enjoyable to listen to.
 +  music by bands such as Foo Fighters, Weezer, The Killers, Coldplay, Muse, Green Day, Radiohead, U2 and Nirvana.
 +  music by

A Tribe Called Quest, Wu-Tang Clan, Jurassic 5, Slum Village, The Roots, Nas, Public Enemy, OutKast, N.W.A., Black Star, Beastie Boys, Gang Starr, Grandmaster Flash and the Furious Five.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ruler of Everything also would enjoy
 +  music from

U2, Coldplay, Mumford and Sons, Arcade Fire, The Killers, Imagine Dragons, Radiohead, Paul Simon, Fleet Foxes, Florence + The Machine, and Kings of Leon.
 +  listening to music by

Bon Iver, The War on Drugs, Radiohead, Sufjan Stevens, St. Vincent, Bonobo, Beach House, Fleet Foxes, Arcade Fire, James Blake, and Local Natives.
 +  music by

Sabrina Claudio, 6LACK, H.E.R., Jorja Smith, and Bryson Tiller.
 +  Taylor Swift

Yes, a person who listens to music by Ruler of Everything may also enjoy Taylor Swift. Both artists create upbeat and catchy pop music with melodic lyrics that capture the listener's attention. Taylor Swift is known for her heartfelt ballads that often reflect on personal experiences, while Ruler of Everything is known for his joyful anthems that
 +  music by

Kendrick Lamar, J. Cole, Eminem, Drake, Nas, Kanye West, Logic, Childish Gambino, Future, and Post Malone.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Touch-Tone Telephone also would enjoy
 +  listening to music on streaming platforms such as Spotify, Apple Music, or Pandora. These services allow users to create customized playlists and access millions of songs from all genres. Additionally, they can filter music by mood, artist, genre, and more, making it easy to find the perfect music for any occasion.
 +  listening to music through other forms of technology such as streaming services, radio, or even vinyl records. Depending on their preference, they could also purchase physical copies of albums or download digital versions from various online stores. For those looking for a more traditional experience, listening to live concerts or attending music festivals can be an enjoyable way to listen to music. Additionally
 + 

listening to music on streaming services such as Spotify, Apple Music, Pandora, and YouTube Music. They may also enjoy podcasts, audio books, and even attending live concerts if possible.
 +  listening to music through a variety of other sources, including streaming services such as Spotify, Apple Music, and YouTube Music, internet radio stations like Pandora and iHeartRadio, on-demand audio platforms such as Audible and iTunes, or other streaming media services like Netflix and Hulu. Additionally, they could enjoy listening to music through physical media such as CDs
 +  listening to music on a jukebox. Jukeboxes provide a variety of music that can be selected and played at the touch of a button. They offer a wide selection of genres, including rock, pop, country, hip-hop, R&B and classical. With many jukeboxes featuring digital sound, you can enjoy high-quality


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Turn the Lights Off also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

The xx, Haim, LCD Soundsystem, Ariel Pink, Beach House, Lorde, Phoenix, Tame Impala, The 1975, and Vampire Weekend.
 +  music by:

-The Weeknd
-Lil Uzi Vert
-Post Malone
-Travis Scott
-Young Thug
-Kendrick Lamar
-Khalid
-Ariana Grande
-Drake
-Rihanna
 +  music by:

The Naked and Famous, Chvrches, Of Monsters and Men, Lorde, Imagine Dragons, Local Natives, Phantogram, The Kooks, Arctic Monkeys, Catfish and the Bottlemen.
 +  music by Beyonce, Lady Gaga, and Rihanna.
 +  listening to music by:

The xx, James Blake, Alt-J, Bon Iver, Florence + The Machine, Glass Animals, Hozier, Daughter, Sylvan Esso, Local Natives.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Weird Science also would enjoy
 +  music by the following artists:

1. The B-52s
2. Devo
3. Talking Heads
4. Oingo Boingo
5. The Cars
6. Depeche Mode
7. Human League
8. Visage
9. Gary Numan
10. Kraftwerk
 +  listening to music by The B-52s. Both bands have a similar style of upbeat pop/rock music with danceable rhythms, lighthearted lyrics, and nostalgic sound.
 +  music by other 1980s new wave bands, such as Depeche Mode, Duran Duran, The Cure, Talking Heads, New Order, and Blondie. Other similar music genres from the time period that they may also enjoy include synthpop, gothic rock, post-punk, and alternative rock.
 +  music from other alternative rock bands such as The Cure, Talking Heads, Joy Division, Bauhaus, New Order, Siouxsie and the Banshees, The Smiths, and Depeche Mode.
 +  music by Red Hot Chili Peppers, The Offspring, and Sublime. All of these bands have a similar punk rock influence, incorporating elements of funk and hip-hop. They all draw from a wide range of musical influences, including classic rock, ska, reggae, and metal.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by .flow OST also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from the anime series Angel Beats!

Angel Beats! is an anime series with a soundtrack composed by Jun Maeda and arranged by various artists. The music is an eclectic mix of classic rock, pop, jazz, and electronic styles. Fans of .flow OST will likely enjoy the upbeat rhythms and catchy melodies found in the tracks
 +  listening to other Visual Novel OST's such as Steins;Gate, Clannad, Katawa Shoujo, Danganronpa and Fate/Stay Night. They may also enjoy listening to music from anime soundtracks such as Your Lie in April, Sword Art Online, Fullmetal Alchemist and Attack on Titan.
 +  listening to other Japanese anime music. Some popular Japanese anime soundtracks include the music from Attack on Titan, Naruto, Spirited Away, Your Name, and Cowboy Bebop.
 +  listening to other game music, such as soundtracks from games like Final Fantasy, Kingdom Hearts, and Elder Scrolls. They would also enjoy listening to other anime-inspired music, such as songs from Cowboy Bebop or Attack on Titan. Other genres of music they may enjoy include rock, electronica, EDM, and hip hop.
 +  listening to music from other visual novels, such as Fate/stay night or Steins;Gate. Other related genres that this person may enjoy include anime opening and ending themes, Vocaloid songs, and Japanese rock.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by 1 800 PAIN also would enjoy
 +  listening to rap, hip hop, and R&B. These genres all feature elements of beats and rhymes that are popular in 1 800 PAIN songs. They also have similar themes of money, cars, and women. Additionally, these genres often include lyrics that touch on social issues such as race, poverty, inequality, and politics.
 +  listening to other rap and hip-hop music. They would likely enjoy listening to artists like Drake, Cardi B, Post Malone, Travis Scott, Kendrick Lamar, and more. Additionally, they might be interested in exploring different subgenres of rap and hip-hop such as trap music and drill music.
 +  listening to music by

Lil Uzi Vert, Playboi Carti, Gunna, Young Thug, NAV, Trippie Redd, Juice WRLD, Travis Scott, Future, and 21 Savage.
 +  listening to music by

Dr. Dre, Tupac, The Notorious B.I.G., Snoop Dogg, Busta Rhymes, Ice Cube, 50 Cent, Mobb Deep, Jay-Z, Eminem, Lil Wayne, Nas, Kendrick Lamar, etc.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Drake, Kendrick Lamar, J. Cole, Big Sean, Travis Scott, Cardi B, Post Malone, and Lil Uzi Vert. These artists all make rap, hip hop, and trap music which are all genres commonly associated with 1 800 PAIN's sound.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by 100 gecs also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Hannah Diamond, Charli XCX, SOPHIE, A. G. Cook, Yves Tumor, and Dorian Electra. All of these artists share influences from pop, electronic, and avant-garde music, so they all have a similar sound and often collaborate with
 +  listening to:

-Charli XCX
-PC Music
-Cashmere Cat
-Mura Masa
-SOPHIE
-A. G. Cook
-Sudan Archives
-Lil Uzi Vert
-Lil Yachty
-Ryan Hemsworth
-Danny L Harle
 +  music from the following artists:

- Charli XCX
- PC Music
- Dorian Electra
- Yung Lean
- SOPHIE
- Mykki Blanco
- A. G. Cook
- GFOTY
- GFRIEND
- QT
 +  listening to other artists who are associated with the hyperpop genre. These include Charli XCX, A. G. Cook, SAINT PEPSI, Dorian Electra, GFOTY, and SOPHIE.
 +  listening to other artists such as Charli XCX, Yung Lean, Lil Uzi Vert, GFOTY, Rico Nasty, Brooke Candy, Tommy Cash, Clairo, Tommy Genesis, and SOPHIE.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by 34+35Ashnikko also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Rico Nasty and CupcakKe.
 +  listening to music by Rico Nasty, Brooke Candy, and Doja Cat.
 +  listening to music by Rico Nasty, Doja Cat, and Cardi B.
 +  listening to other hip-hop and rap music by artists such as Cardi B, Megan Thee Stallion, Doja Cat, Nicki Minaj, Travis Scott, DaBaby, Lil Baby, and Young Thug. They may also enjoy listening to more alternative rap music from artists such as Earl Sweatshirt, Open Mike Eagle, JPEG
 +  listening to music by Rico Nasty, Doja Cat, Tierra Whack, SZA, and Little Simz.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by 50 Cent also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Eminem, Lil Wayne, Jay-Z, Drake and Future.
 +  listening to music by

Lil Wayne, Drake, Jay-Z, Eminem, and Kanye West.
 +  listening to

other hip hop and rap artists such as Kendrick Lamar, Drake, Jay-Z, Future, Kanye West, Nicki Minaj, Lil Wayne, and Eminem.
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

-Eminem 
-Lil Wayne 
-Kanye West 
-T.I. 
-Jay-Z 
-Drake 
-Nicki Minaj 
-Dr. Dre 
-2 Chainz 
-Nas
 +  listening to

other artists from the hip hop and rap genres, such as Drake, Jay-Z, Eminem, Kanye West, Kendrick Lamar, and Childish Gambino.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by 7 rings also would enjoy
 +  Ariana Grande's other music, such as "No Tears Left to Cry," "God Is a Woman," and "Break Free." Other artists that have a similar sound to Ariana Grande that this person may enjoy include Selena Gomez, Demi Lovato, and Nicki Minaj.
 +  listening to music by Ariana Grande.
 +  listening to music by Ariana Grande and other music from the pop genre. They may also enjoy listening to music by other pop artists such as Taylor Swift, Justin Bieber, and Selena Gomez.
 +  music by Ariana Grande
 +  music by Ariana Grande, Nicki Minaj, Big Sean and Iggy Azalea.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by <s>Averno</s> - no longer exists also would enjoy
 +  listening to other alternative rock bands such as The Killers, Coldplay, Arctic Monkeys, Muse, Radiohead, Foo Fighters, and Interpol.
 +  listening to other similar artists, such as Black Sabbath, Angel Witch, Trouble, Pentagram, Witchcraft, Electric Wizard, Coven and Saint Vitus.
 +  listening to other Latin genres such as Reggaeton, Bachata, Merengue, Salsa, and Cumbia.
 +  listening to music by other alternative rock/metal bands such as:

-Linkin Park 
-System of a Down 
-Deftones 
-Disturbed 
-Tool 
-Korn 
-Marilyn Manson 
-Chevelle 
-Puddle of Mudd 
-
 +  music by the band Korn. Korn is an American nu metal band that formed in 1993. They are known for their intense sound, powerful riffs and often dark lyrics. Their style of music has been influential in the development of many other genres, including nu metal, alternative metal, and alternative rock. Fans of Korn enjoy the band's


Prompt: A person who listens to music by A$AP Rocky also would enjoy
 +  music by Travis Scott, Lil Uzi Vert, Playboi Carti, and 21 Savage.
 +  listening to music by Lil Uzi Vert, Travis Scott, and Post Malone.
 +  listening to music by Drake, Kendrick Lamar, J. Cole, Future, and Kanye West. Other artists that they may be interested in include Big Sean, Travis Scott, Migos, and Anderson .Paak.
 +  music by other artists in the hip hop genre such as Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Chance The Rapper, Lil Uzi Vert, Cardi B, Migos and Travis Scott.
 +  listening to music by 
Kendrick Lamar, Drake, Travis Scott, and J Cole.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by AURORA also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Sigrid, Florence + The Machine, and Billie Eilish. These artists have a similar sound to AURORA with their dreamy electronic/pop sound. They each have their own unique sound, but all share elements of dreamy pop and electronic music that can be heard in AURORA's work
 +  music by

Banks, Billie Eilish, Lorde, Lykke Li, Florence + the Machine, Maggie Rogers, Halsey, Sigrid, Tove Lo, and Oh Wonder.
 +  listening to music by

Lorde, Florence and the Machine, Billie Eilish, Lana Del Rey, Tame Impala, Lykke Li, Massive Attack, Daughter, Hozier, Sigrid, Sia, Banks.
 +  listening to:

-Billie Eilish 
-Lorde 
-Halsey 
-Florence + the Machine 
-CHVRCHES 
-Years & Years 
-Lana Del Rey 
-Lykke Li 
-Kate Bush 
-Banks
 +  listening to artists such as Lorde, Sigrid, Florence + The Machine, MUNA and Lykke Li.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Abel Korzeniowski also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Max Richter, Ludovico Einaudi, Johann Johansson and Dustin O'Halloran. These four composers create music that is similar in style to Korzeniowski's, often with a classical/cinematic feel.
 +  listening to the works of Ludovico Einaudi, Max Richter, and Olafur Arnalds. All four composers are known for their neo-classical style, which is characterized by gentle melodies, orchestral arrangements, and emotionally evocative soundscapes.
 +  listening to music by Ludovico Einaudi. Both composers are renowned for their classical compositions and piano works, often incorporating other instruments to create a unique sound. Additionally, both composers often evokes emotion in their pieces, creating a mood of contemplation or reflection.
 +  music by the composer Max Richter. Max Richter is a contemporary classical and electronic composer who has composed music for films, television series, and ballet performances. He often blends traditional classical instruments with electronic elements to create atmospheric soundscapes. His music has a cinematic quality that is often similar to Abel Korzeniowski's work.
 +  music by:

Max Richter, Yann Tiersen, Clint Mansell, Ólafur Arnalds, and Hauschka.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Abigail Larson also would enjoy
 +  music by

Loreena McKennitt, Joanna Newsom, Rachel Grimes, Agnes Obel, and Ane Brun.
 +  music by other fantasy, horror, and science fiction inspired composers like Jeff Grace, Bear McCreary, and Christopher Lennertz.
 +  listening to other music by instrumentalists in the same genre. This could include artists such as Ludovico Einaudi, Max Richter, Nils Frahm, Hauschka, Dustin O'Halloran, and Ólafur Arnalds.
 +  listening to music by other fantasy-inspired artists such as Lindsey Stirling, Within Temptation, Eluveitie, and Sirenia. They may also enjoy music by popular film composers such as John Williams, Hans Zimmer, and Alan Silvestri.
 +  music from

Hannah Yata, Rachel Portman, and Stellardrone.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Adele also would enjoy
 +  artists like Amy Winehouse, Sam Smith, and Sia.
 +  the music of Amy Winehouse. Both singers have a soulful and jazzy sound, and both are known for their raw emotion and powerful vocals. Furthermore, both Adele and Amy Winehouse have produced hits that are considered classics in the music industry.
 +  listening to music by Amy Winehouse and Beyonce.
 +  listening to Amy Winehouse, Sam Smith and Beyoncé.
 +  listening to artists like Sam Smith, Ed Sheeran, Amy Winehouse, Alicia Keys, Katy Perry and Rihanna.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Against Me! also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Menzingers, Modern Baseball, Joyce Manor, Rise Against, The Gaslight Anthem, The Lawrence Arms, Hot Water Music, and Bad Religion.
 +  listening to:

1. Rise Against
2. The Gaslight Anthem
3. NOFX
4. Hot Water Music
5. Bad Religion
6. The Menzingers
7. Alkaline Trio
8. Strike Anywhere
9. Off With Their Heads
10. The Bouncing Souls
 +  music by

The Gaslight Anthem, Rise Against, The Menzingers, Hot Water Music, Bad Religion, Emarosa, Masked Intruder, The Lawrence Arms.
 +  listening to punk bands such as Rise Against, Bad Religion, Rancid, Sum 41, NOFX, Green Day, The Offspring, and The Clash.
 +  music by bands like Rise Against, The Hold Steady, and Bad Religion. All of these bands play punk rock music with politically charged lyrics. 

Other similar bands to check out include Alkaline Trio, Streetlight Manifesto, and Gaslight Anthem.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Agnes Martin also would enjoy
 +  music by 

Max Richter, Hildur Guðnadóttir, Ryuichi Sakamoto, Ólafur Arnalds, and Nils Frahm.
 +  music by

Philip Glass, Steve Reich, John Adams, Terry Riley, or Arvo Pärt.
 +  the music of other minimalist artists such as Steve Reich, Philip Glass, John Cage, and Terry Riley. All these composers are considered to be pioneers in the minimalist genre and share many of the same characteristics found in Martin's music. Other related composers include La Monte Young, Robert Ashley, Charlemagne Palestine, and Meredith Monk.
 +  the music of: 

Laurie Anderson, Brian Eno, Joanna Newsom, Nico Muhly, Sufjan Stevens, Björk, Joni Mitchell, FKA Twigs.
 +  music by which of the following?

1. Yoko Ono
2. Laurie Anderson
3. Steve Reich
4. Brian Eno
5. Robert Fripp


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ahrix also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Seven Lions, Marshmello, Porter Robinson, Zedd, Martin Garrix, Alan Walker, and Avicii.
 +  listening to music by

Seven Lions, Pegboard Nerds, Marshmello, San Holo, and Slushii.
 +  music by similar artists such as Seven Lions, Illenium, KSHMR, Marshmello, The Chainsmokers and Slushii.
 +  music by:

Marshmello, Martin Garrix, K-391, Alan Walker, ZEDD, Avicii, Kygo, The Chainsmokers, Jason Derulo, David Guetta.
 +  listening to music by

Seven Lions, Ilan Bluestone, Grum, and Armin Van Buuren.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Akon also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Chris Brown, 50 Cent, T-Pain, Rihanna, The Black Eyed Peas, Flo Rida, and Pitbull.
 +  listening to music by:

Drake, Chris Brown, Pitbull, Flo Rida, Lil Wayne, Usher, T.I., Snoop Dogg.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Drake, Rihanna, Sean Paul, Nicki Minaj, Chris Brown, and Pitbull.
 +  listening to music by:

• Chris Brown
• Lil Wayne
• T-Pain
• Neyo
• Pitbull
• Flo Rida
• Sean Paul
 +  listening to music from Wiz Khalifa, T-Pain, and Flo Rida.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Al Held also would enjoy
 +  listening to similar music genres such as abstract expressionism, minimalism, and post-minimalism. These genres share a focus on improvisation and use of texture and color. Similar artists include Mark Rothko, Ellsworth Kelly, Robert Mangold, Agnes Martin, and Sol Lewitt, among others.
 + 

Abstract Expressionism, Color Field painting, Hard Edge painting, Minimalism, and Pop Art.
 +  listening to music by

Jackson Pollock, Willem de Kooning, Mark Rothko, and Hans Hofmann.
 +  music by

other abstract expressionist jazz musicians such as John Coltrane, Ornette Coleman, Miles Davis, and Sun Ra.
 +  listening to art from

other abstract expressionist painters such as Willem de Kooning, Mark Rothko, Joan Mitchell, Robert Motherwell, and Barnett Newman.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Albert Gleizes also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other French artists. Such artists might include Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, Francis Poulenc, and Jean Sibelius.
 +  listening to music by

Pablo Picasso, Joan Miro, Marcel Duchamp, Fernand Leger, and Wassily Kandinsky.
 +  music by

Pablo Picasso, Jean Metzinger, Fernand Léger, Robert Delaunay, Juan Gris, Wassily Kandinsky, and Henri Matisse.
 +  listening to Claude Debussy and Maurice Ravel. Both Debussy and Ravel were important figures in the development of French music during the late 19th and early 20th centuries, making their works very similar to those of Gleizes. They are often described as Impressionist composers, meaning that their music is characterized by its dreamy, atmospheric
 +  music by other modernist musicians. Examples include Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, and Ravel. All of these composers were part of the modernist movement in music during the early 20th century, and their compositions feature similar characteristics to those of Albert Gleizes. Other modernist composers worth exploring are George Antheil,


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Albert King also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

B.B. King, Stevie Ray Vaughan, Eric Clapton, Etta James, Buddy Guy, and Jimi Hendrix.
 +  listening to music by

B.B. King, Freddie King, Buddy Guy, Muddy Waters, Eric Clapton, Stevie Ray Vaughan, and Howlin' Wolf.
 +  listening to:

-B.B. King 
-Freddie King 
-Luther Allison 
-Johnny Winter 
-Stevie Ray Vaughan 
-Etta James 
-Howlin' Wolf 
-John Lee Hooker 
-Jimmy Reed 
-Otis Rush
 +  listening to music by

B.B. King, Stevie Ray Vaughan, Muddy Waters, Jeff Beck, and Buddy Guy.
 +  listening to music from fellow blues artists such as B.B. King, Muddy Waters, John Lee Hooker, and Buddy Guy. These artists all share a similar style of blues-infused rock and roll with elements of soul, jazz and gospel music. Additionally, those who enjoy Albert King's music may also enjoy listening to blues-rock


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alberto Vargas also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other Latin artists such as Bad Bunny, Ozuna, J Balvin, Selena, Gloria Estefan, Maluma and Daddy Yankee. Other popular Latin genres include salsa, merengue, bachata and reggaeton.
 +  music by

other Latin American composers such as Heitor Villa-Lobos, Agustín Lara, Carlos Gardel, and Astor Piazzolla.
 +  listening to music by

other Latin American composers, such as Silvio Rodríguez, Agustín Lara, Armando Manzanero, Chucho Valdés, and Carlos Gardel.
 +  music from other latin artists, such as Selena, Marc Anthony, Carlos Santana, Juanes, Shakira, Daddy Yankee, Maluma, Ozuna, and Romeo Santos. Additionally, they might enjoy listening to cumbia, salsa, bachata, reggaeton and Latin pop music.
 +  music by other Latin American musicians such as Juanes, Gloria Estefan, Ozuna, Selena, Maluma, J Balvin, Anuel AA, Romeo Santos, Marc Anthony, Daddy Yankee, and Shakira.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alec Benjamin also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Ben Platt, Lauv, Bebe Rexha, Jeremy Zucker, Conan Gray, MAX, and Jon Bellion.
 +  music by :

1. Sam Smith
2. Lauv
3. Ben Platt
4. Lewis Capaldi
5. Ed Sheeran
6. Billie Eilish
7. Hozier
8. Khalid
9. James Bay
10. Troye Sivan
 +  listening to music by artists such as Dean Lewis, Billie Eilish, Lauv, and Ben Platt. These artists all have a similar sound to Alec Benjamin – soft acoustic-driven melodies with heartfelt lyrics.
 +  listening to music by 
Billie Eilish, James Bay, Lauv, and Lewis Capaldi.
 +  music by

Artists similar to Alec Benjamin include Lauv, Jeremy Zucker, Bea Miller, Quinn XCII, Jon Bellion, and gnash.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alec Empire also would enjoy
 +  some of the following similar artists:

- Atari Teenage Riot
- Modeselektor
- Mouse on Mars
- The Knife
- Apparat 
- Venetian Snares 
- Boom Bip 
- Kid606 
- Squarepusher 
- Prefuse 73
 +  the music of other electronic artists such as Aphex Twin, Daft Punk, Squarepusher, Autechre, Four Tet, and Plaid. These artists create experimental music that is often influenced by hip hop and techno. Additionally, Empire's label Digital Hardcore Recordings has featured other electronic musicians including Atari Teenage Riot, Ec8or
 +  the music of 
Aphex Twin, Squarepusher, Venetian Snares, Mouse on Mars, and Autechre.
 +  listening to music by other similar artists and bands, such as Atari Teenage Riot, Modeselektor, Apparat, Konono No. 1, Dälek, and DJ /rupture.
 +  listening to music by

other electronic and hip-hop artists such as Aphex Twin, Nine Inch Nails, Björk, Missy Elliott, A Tribe Called Quest, Daft Punk, and Moby.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alestorm also would enjoy
 +  bands such as: 

- Turisas 
- Sabaton 
- Gloryhammer 
- Trollfest 
- Korpiklaani 
- Ensiferum 
- Finntroll 
- Eluveitie 
- Moonsorrow
 +  listening to music by

Folk Metal bands such as Turisas, Ensiferum, Finntroll, Korpiklaani, and Moonsorrow.
 +  music by

Folk Metal bands such as Korpiklaani, Turisas, Ensiferum, Finntroll, and Sabaton.
 +  listening to bands like Turisas, Ensiferum, Finntroll and Tyr. These bands are all a part of the folk metal genre and blend traditional folk music with heavy metal.
 +  other bands in the pirate metal genre, such as Running Wild, Swashbuckle, The Dread Crew of Oddwood, and Lagerstein. They may also enjoy other genres of metal music such as power metal, death metal, and black metal.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alice Cooper also would enjoy
 +  music by

Kiss, Ozzy Osbourne, Motley Crue, Metallica, Iggy Pop, Jimi Hendrix, Judas Priest, Guns N' Roses, Aerosmith, and Van Halen.
 +  music by

Kiss, Marilyn Manson, Ozzy Osbourne, Rob Zombie, Motley Crue, AC/DC, Metallica, Guns N' Roses, and Def Leppard.
 +  listening to music by

Kiss, Ozzy Osbourne, Marilyn Manson, Metallica, Motley Crue, Guns N' Roses, Rob Zombie, and AC/DC.
 +  music by

KISS, Deep Purple, Marilyn Manson, Rob Zombie, AFI, Motley Crue, Iron Maiden, Ozzy Osbourne, Slayer, Megadeth, Judas Priest.
 +  listening to music by other classic rock artists like Led Zeppelin, Aerosmith, and Queen.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alicia Keys also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other similar artists such as Beyoncé, Rihanna, Lauryn Hill, Mary J. Blige, and John Legend.
 +  listening to music by Beyonce. Both artists are popular R&B and hip-hop singers who have achieved international fame. They both also have a unique vocal style and their music often has a soulful and upbeat sound. Fans of both artists may enjoy listening to their songs, as they have many similarities in their musical styles.
 +  music by

Adele, Beyoncé, Rihanna, Bruno Mars, John Legend, Justin Timberlake, Mariah Carey, SZA, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by:

Beyoncé, John Legend, Rihanna, Mariah Carey, Jennifer Hudson, Usher, Mary J. Blige, Drake, Chris Brown, Frank Ocean.
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Rihanna, Beyoncé, John Legend, Chance the Rapper, Drake, Adele, Lady Gaga, Cardi B, and Janelle Monae.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Alkaline Trio also would enjoy
 +  listening to bands such as Blink-182, Taking Back Sunday, Rancid, The Used, Sum 41, and Green Day. All of these bands share a similar style of fast-paced punk rock music with lyrics that often focus on themes of depression, angst and rebellion.
 +  listening to music by bands like My Chemical Romance, AFI, and Fall Out Boy.
 +  listening to music by other punk rock bands, such as Rise Against, Bad Religion, AFI, The Offspring, NOFX, and Blink-182.
 +  listening to music by Blink-182. Both bands are punk rock groups that draw influence from the same genres, including pop punk and alternative rock. Both groups have similar styles of singing and instrumentation, with fast tempos and catchy melodies. They both write dark, introspective lyrics that often explore themes of heartbreak and loss.
 +  listening to bands such as AFI, Bad Religion, The Bouncing Souls, The Offspring, Taking Back Sunday, Green Day, and My Chemical Romance.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by American Steel also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Rancid, The Bouncing Souls, Hot Water Music, Green Day, and Alkaline Trio.
 +  listening to music by which of the following bands?

The Lawrence Arms, The Gaslight Anthem, Hot Water Music, Bouncing Souls, Alkaline Trio.
 +  bands like:

-Strung Out 
-Rise Against 
-Lagwagon 
-Pennywise 
-NOFX 
-Hot Water Music 
-Descendents 
-The Lawrence Arms 
-Alkaline Trio 
-The Gaslight Anthem
 +  music by:
Dropkick Murphys, Flogging Molly, The Gaslight Anthem, The Hold Steady.
 +  artists such as:

-Against Me!
-Rise Against
-Rancid
-NoFX
-The Gaslight Anthem
-The Menzingers
-Hot Water Music
-Strung Out
-Bad Religion
-Descendents 
-Alkaline Trio


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Andrew Jackson Jihad also would enjoy
 +  listening to the music of Frank Turner and the Sleeping Souls, The Front Bottoms, and The Menzingers.
 +  music by: 
Frank Turner, Against Me!, The Mountain Goats, The Menzingers, The Gaslight Anthem, The Flatliners, Iron Chic, Dave Hause, and The Lawrence Arms.
 +  listening to music by Frank Turner, Jeffrey Lewis, and The Mountain Goats.
 +  music by Bright Eyes, The Mountain Goats, and Jeff Rosenstock. 

These artists have a similar style of music to Andrew Jackson Jihad, which is often classified as folk-punk or anti-folk. All of the artists listed share elements of punk, folk, and indie music in their sound. They often write protest-style songs
 +  listening to music by Bright Eyes, The Mountain Goats, Neutral Milk Hotel, and Johnny Hobo and the Freight Trains.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by André Derain also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, Francis Poulenc, Olivier Messiaen, and Pierre Boulez.
 +  music by

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, and Gabriel Fauré.
 +  similar music from other French Impressionist composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel and Gabriel Fauré. These three composers all share similar musical influence and techniques to André Derain and so fans of his music would likely enjoy exploring the works of these other French Impressionist composers.
 +  music by

other French impressionist composers such as Claude Debussy, Gabriel Fauré, and Maurice Ravel.
 +  music by

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Erik Satie.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Angelo Badalamenti also would enjoy
 +  music by: 

David Lynch, Deborah Lurie, Julee Cruise, Mark Snow, Mark Isham, and Twin Peaks.
 +  music by Ennio Morricone
 +  listening to music by other composers such as Hans Zimmer, Vangelis, John Williams, and Yann Tiersen. All of these composers have written iconic soundtracks for films and television shows that have become classics in their own right. Each composer has a unique style that is distinct from the others, so there is something for everyone to
 +  music by:

Moby, David Bowie, Twin Peaks, Trent Reznor, Roy Orbison, Sia, Bjork, Portishead, Mazzy Star, The Velvet Underground.
 +  listening to:

1. David Lynch
2. Brian Eno
3. Julee Cruise
4. Harold Budd
5. John Barry
6. Nick Cave and the Bad Seeds
7. Mark Snow
8. Portishead
9. Mark Isham
10. Tricky


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Annie Lennox also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Sinead O'Connor. Both singers are known for their powerful and emotionally charged vocals, as well as for their socially conscious lyrics. O'Connor's work is often infused with elements of Celtic music, while Lennox has a more eclectic sound that incorporates influences from genres such as pop, rock, soul, and funk.
 +  listening to music by Sinead O'Connor because both singers are known for their unique and powerful voices, as well as their soulful and emotional lyrics. Both artists have a similar style of music, blending elements of folk, rock, and soul.
 +  listening to music by other female rock and pop artists, such as Amy Winehouse, Sinead O'Connor, Fleetwood Mac, Cyndi Lauper, and Alanis Morrisette.
 +  listening to music by

Adele, Sade, Kate Bush, Whitney Houston, Madonna, Tori Amos, Eurythmics, The Pretenders, Björk, and Cyndi Lauper.
 +  listening to music by other female singers such as Sade, Madonna, Adele, Aretha Franklin, Katy Perry, Taylor Swift, and Beyoncé.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Answered Prayers OST also would enjoy
 +  music from various other bands and artists such as BTS, EXO, Blackpink, Red Velvet, BLACK6IX, Girls' Generation, TWICE, NCT, SHINee, SuperM, Big Bang, 2NE1, and many more.
 +  listening to music by other k-pop groups such as BTS, EXO, NCT 127, GOT7, MAMAMOO, BLACKPINK, TWICE and Red Velvet. They might also enjoy listening to other genres of music such as R&B, Hip Hop, Pop, Dance, EDM, and Rock.
 +  listening to music by the same artist or genre. They may enjoy listening to music from other artists in the same genre such as Hillsong, Worship Central, Bethel Music, Elevation Worship, Passion, and many more. They may also find enjoyment in listening to other Christian worship and praise music.
 +  listening to other soundtracks from musicals, such as Hamilton: An American Musical and Dear Evan Hansen. They may also enjoy listening to artists such as Ben Platt, Lin-Manuel Miranda, and Pasek and Paul.
 +  listening to other versions of the songs from the original soundtrack, as well as similar music by other artists. Depending on the person's taste in music, they may enjoy songs from genres such as pop, rock, rap, R&B, and electronic. Some artists that would be similar to the style of Answered Prayers OST are Coldplay


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Anthony Caro also would enjoy
 +  music by

Other composers of classical music such as Johannes Brahms, Ludwig van Beethoven, and Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart.
 +  listening to music by

John Cage, Steve Reich, Terry Riley, Morton Feldman, Philip Glass, and Iannis Xenakis.
 +  listening to music by

other contemporary classical composers such as Oliver Knussen, George Benjamin, and Thomas Adès.
 +  music by

John Adams, Philip Glass, Steve Reich, Terry Riley, and Arvo Pärt.
 +  listening to music by

Composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, John Adams, and Philip Glass.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Aphex Twin also would enjoy
 +  other electronic music producers such as Kraftwerk, Squarepusher, Autechre, Boards of Canada, and Plastikman. They may also enjoy ambient and IDM genres for which Aphex Twin is known.
 +  music by

Four Tet, Autechre, Boards of Canada, Björk, Squarepusher, and Flying Lotus.
 +  listening to music by Squarepusher, Autechre, and Boards of Canada.
 +  listening to music by Brian Eno. Both Aphex Twin and Brian Eno are known for their experimental and ambient sounds. They have both have created unique and innovative sounds that span a variety of genres, including electronica, minimalism, and ambient. Brian Eno's work is often characterized by its use of synthesizers and innovative sound production techniques
 +  some of the following artists:

1. Squarepusher
2. Autechre
3. Boards of Canada
4. Oneohtrix Point Never
5. Venetian Snares
6. Plaid
7. Prefuse 73
8. The Gaslamp Killer
9. Kaitlyn Aure


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Arcade Fire also would enjoy
 +  bands like Broken Social Scene, The National, Feist, and Vampire Weekend.
 +  music by

The National, Broken Social Scene, Vampire Weekend, LCD Soundsystem, Spoon, Fleet Foxes, Grizzly Bear, Sufjan Stevens, Interpol, Belle and Sebastian.
 +  listening to

The National, Broken Social Scene, The Shins, Sufjan Stevens, Lorde, Of Montreal, Modest Mouse, The Decemberists, Florence + The Machine, and St. Vincent.
 +  listening to music by The National. Both bands have a melancholic, dreamy sound and are known for their intense and passionate lyrics about life, love and society. They both draw inspiration from classic rock and folk music.
 +  listening to music by other indie rock bands, such as The Strokes, Kings of Leon, The Killers, Death Cab for Cutie, and Vampire Weekend.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Arctic Monkeys also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by The Vaccines, the Libertines, Circa Waves and Blossoms.
 +  music by the band The Strokes. Both bands have a similar sound, combining elements of indie rock and garage rock. The Strokes are known for their catchy guitar riffs and pop-like hooks, while Arctic Monkeys blend punk and rhythm and blues into their sound. Both bands also have experienced success in the UK music scene, with Arctic Mon
 +  listening to music by other alternative rock bands such as The Strokes, Radiohead, The Kooks, Bloc Party, Franz Ferdinand, The Libertines, Interpol, and Kings of Leon.
 +  listening to music by other indie rock or alternative rock artists such as The Strokes, Interpol, The Killers, Radiohead, Vampire Weekend, Foals, Franz Ferdinand, Bloc Party and Band of Horses.
 +  listening to music by other British indie bands like Blur, Franz Ferdinand, The Libertines, Maximo Park, and The Kooks. They may also enjoy listening to similar genres of music such as alternative rock, indie rock, and post-punk.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Aretha Franklin also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other influential soul singers such as Sam Cooke, James Brown, Otis Redding, Marvin Gaye and Stevie Wonder.
 +  listening to music by

Marvin Gaye, Sam Cooke, Otis Redding, James Brown, and Al Green.
 +  listening to music by other female soul singers, such as Etta James, Gladys Knight, Billie Holiday, and Ella Fitzgerald. All of these singers have been influential in the development of soul music and have created timeless classics that are still enjoyed today.
 +  listening to

Otis Redding, Etta James, Sam Cooke, Marvin Gaye, The Temptations, Al Green, Dionne Warwick, Gladys Knight & the Pips, Chaka Khan, and Stevie Wonder.
 +  artists like

Marvin Gaye, Al Green, Otis Redding, Sam Cooke, Stevie Wonder, Diana Ross, Tina Turner, and James Brown.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ariana Grande also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Selena Gomez, Taylor Swift, Justin Bieber, Beyoncé, Lady Gaga, Cardi B, Nicki Minaj, Demi Lovato, Halsey, and Shawn Mendes.
 +  music by

Selena Gomez, Beyoncé, Taylor Swift, Demi Lovato, Billie Eilish, Miley Cyrus, Rihanna, Nicki Minaj, Justin Bieber, and Lady Gaga.
 +  listening to music by:
 
Selena Gomez, Beyoncé, Taylor Swift, Lady Gaga, and Cardi B.
 +  listening to music by

Selena Gomez, Demi Lovato, Taylor Swift, Billie Eilish, and Justin Bieber.
 +  music by:

-Dua Lipa
-Selena Gomez
-Cardi B
-Mariah Carey
-Lady Gaga
-Taylor Swift
-Beyoncé
-Nicki Minaj


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Arnold Armitage also would enjoy
 +  music by

Frederick Delius, Edward Elgar, Ralph Vaughan Williams, Gustav Holst, and other British composers of the late Romantic era.
 +  listening to music by other classical composers such as Mozart, Beethoven, Bach, Tchaikovsky, Vivaldi, Handel, Shubert.
 +  listening to music by other classical composers such as Johann Sebastian Bach, Ludwig van Beethoven, Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart and Franz Schubert. They may also be interested in exploring music from other genres such as jazz, blues, rock, pop and hip-hop.
 +  listening to music by composers such as George Gershwin, Leonard Bernstein, Sergei Prokofiev, Claude Debussy, Igor Stravinsky, and Johannes Brahms. These composers all wrote classical music in a variety of styles, which range from symphonies to chamber music. They are also well known for their contributions to the
 +  music by other composers such as George Gershwin, Igor Stravinsky, Johannes Brahms, Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and John Williams. These composers share similar musical styles with Armitage, including jazz, classical, and orchestral music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Arthur Dove also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by 
John Cage. Both composers were part of the avant-garde movement in the early 20th century and incorporated novel techniques into their works. Cage was heavily influenced by Dove's ideas, and their respective works often feature unusual soundscapes, improvisation, and unconventional instrumentation.
 +  listening to music by

John Cage, Morton Feldman, and Steve Reich. All of these composers have a similar style of minimalism, experimentation, and avant-garde composition that is heavily influenced by European modernism.
 +  listening to music by Wassily Kandinsky. Both artists are considered pioneers of abstract art and their compositions draw on elements of classical and modern music. Kandinsky, like Dove, explored the relationship between sound and color in his music, such as his 1909 composition, "Impression III (Konzert)." He was also a prolific composer of atonal
 +  listening to music by

John Cage. Both composers are associated with the avant-garde movement and explore sounds, textures, and structures in unconventional ways. Both composers also make use of aleatoric elements, including chance operations and improvisation.
 +  music by

Georgia O'Keeffe, John Cage, Morton Feldman, and Erik Satie.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by As Angels Bleed also would enjoy
 +  listening to

other metalcore and melodic metal bands such as Make Them Suffer, Motionless In White, Parkway Drive, The Word Alive, and Architects.
 +  listening to

other metalcore bands such as August Burns Red, Architects, The Devil Wears Prada, Bring Me The Horizon, and Killswitch Engage.
 +  listening to music by

Asking Alexandria, Bring Me the Horizon, Bullet for My Valentine, Five Finger Death Punch, Slipknot, and Avenged Sevenfold.
 +  listening to music by

other melodic death metal and extreme metal bands such as Arch Enemy, In Flames, Children of Bodom, Amon Amarth, and Dark Tranquillity.
 +  music by

Amorphis, Dark Tranquillity, In Flames, Soilwork, Insomnium, and Wintersun.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ash also would enjoy
 +  music by other alternative rock bands such as The Cranberries, Weezer, Red Hot Chili Peppers, The Strokes, Radiohead, Deftones and Nirvana.
 +  listening to music by

Kurt Vile, Courtney Barnett, St. Vincent, Mac DeMarco, Parquet Courts, The National, Broken Social Scene, Wolf Parade, The Shins, Beach House, and Of Monsters and Men.
 +  listening to music by

The Killers, Coldplay, Muse, Imagine Dragons, Weezer, Kings of Leon, Oasis, Foo Fighters, Red Hot Chili Peppers, and U2.
 +  listening to music by:

Coldplay, U2, Kings of Leon, Death Cab for Cutie, Muse, The Shins, Foo Fighters, Paramore, Snow Patrol, and The Killers.
 +  music by Coldplay, Snow Patrol, The Script, and Keane.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Aslan also would enjoy
 +  music by the following artists:

1. U2
2. Bob Dylan
3. Bruce Springsteen
4. Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers
5. The Waterboys
6. Snow Patrol
7. R.E.M
 +  music by other Irish artists such as U2, The Cranberries, Sinead O'Connor, Van Morrison, The Corrs, Snow Patrol, and The Script.
 +  music by artists like:

-Snow Patrol 
-The Script
-U2 
-Coldplay
-Oasis 
-Muse 
-Counting Crows 
-Keane 
-The Verve 
-Hozier
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

-The Cranberries
-U2
-Coldplay
-Snow Patrol
-The Script
-Oasis
-Mumford & Sons
-The Verve
-Radiohead
-The Corrs
 +  listening to music by

U2, Snow Patrol, Damien Rice, Mumford & Sons, The Cure, Coldplay, and REM.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Astrix also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Infected Mushroom
 +  listening to music by:

Other psytrance artists such as Shpongle, Infected Mushroom, Vini Vici, Skazi, and GMS.
 +  listening to music by Infected Mushroom. Both Astrix and Infected Mushroom are psytrance acts that specialize in creating high-energy, upbeat and often intense dance music, combining traditional instrumentation with futuristic soundscapes and samples. They both have a unique style of music and have gained international recognition for their work in the electronic music scene.
 +  music by

Avalon, Ace Ventura, Goa Gil, 1200 Micrograms, and Infected Mushroom.
 +  listening to music by

Shpongle, Hallucinogen, Talamasca, Infected Mushroom, and Ace Ventura.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Au Revoir Simone also would enjoy
 +  listening to: 

St. Vincent, Lykke Li, Feist, The Postal Service, Oh Land, Tokyo Police Club, Phoenix, Chairlift, Beach House, Wild Nothing.
 +  music by:

- Lusine
- The Field
- The Notwist
- Little Dragon
- Broadcast
- M83
 +  music by

The xx, Beach House, Lykke Li, Chromatics, St. Lucia, Phoenix, The Bird and the Bee, Real Estate, Kishi Bashi, Of Montreal, Tennis, M83.
 +  listening to music by

St. Vincent, The Knife, Lykke Li, Postal Service, Chairlift, Little Dragon, Tegan & Sara, and Of Montreal.
 +  music by

The Postal Service, The Bird and the Bee, The Knife, Lykke Li, Hot Chip, and La Roux.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Aubrey Beardsley also would enjoy
 +  music by

John William Waterhouse, Dante Gabriel Rossetti, William Holman Hunt, and Edward Burne-Jones. All four of these artists are part of the same Pre-Raphaelite Brotherhood movement as Aubrey Beardsley and provide a similar aesthetic in their works.
 +  listening to music by

Alt-J, Radiohead, Imogen Heap, St. Vincent, Bon Iver, Vampire Weekend, and Florence + The Machine.
 +  music by

Marina and the Diamonds, Florence + The Machine, Lykke Li, Halsey, and Banks.
 +  music by:

Ralph Vaughan Williams, Gustav Holst, Edward Elgar, Amy Beach, Henryk Górecki, Maurice Ravel, Sergei Prokofiev, Arnold Schoenberg, Béla Bartók, and Aaron Copland.
 +  music by Ed Sheeran. Both artists share a tendency to write music that is lyrically intimate and emotionally honest. While Beardsley's music is heavily influenced by folk and roots genres, Sheeran often incorporates elements of pop and hip-hop into his songs. Fans of both artists are likely to appreciate the thoughtful lyrics, catchy melodies,


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Avril Lavigne also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Taylor Swift, Demi Lovato, P!nk, Katy Perry, and Miley Cyrus. They might also enjoy other pop-punk and alternative artists like Panic! at the Disco, Fall Out Boy, Paramore, Good Charlotte, and All Time Low.
 +  listening to music by fellow pop-punk artist Paramore. The two artists share a similar sound and style, and the lyrics are often about similar topics such as relationships and self-empowerment. Additionally, both Avril Lavigne and Paramore have seen mainstream success in the music industry, making them accessible to a wide variety of listeners.
 +  listening to music by other artists in the pop punk genre such as Good Charlotte, Fall Out Boy, Paramore, Blink-182, No Doubt, You Me at Six, Simple Plan, and All Time Low.
 +  music by artists such as Taylor Swift, Katy Perry, Gwen Stefani, Selena Gomez, and Demi Lovato.
 +  music from other Pop and Rock artists including Taylor Swift, Katy Perry, Kelly Clarkson, Lady Gaga, P!nk, Maroon 5, Coldplay, and Paramore.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ayesha Erotica also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other artists in the same genre or similar genres. Examples of such artists include Grimes, Björk, FKA twigs, SZA, Lorde, and Lana Del Rey.
 +  music from the following artists:

1. Frank Ocean
2. Solange
3. Anderson .Paak
4. H.E.R
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

1. Janelle Monae
2. Anderson .Paak
3. SZA
4. Noname
5. Solange
6. Jorja Smith
7. FKA Twigs
8. Hiatus Kaiyote
9. Thundercat
10. Toro y
 +  music by other artists that are similar in genre and style. Some of these could include Sade, The Weeknd, FKA Twigs, Anderson .Paak, Banks, Jhené Aiko, and Kelela.
 +  music by Lauryn Hill, Frank Ocean, Kendrick Lamar, and Solange.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by B.o.B. also would enjoy
 +  other popular contemporary hip hop and rap songs. Some examples of other songs that they may enjoy include "Rockstar" by DaBaby featuring Roddy Rich, "Money in the Grave" by Drake featuring Rick Ross, "Old Town Road" by Lil Nas X, "Savage" by Megan Thee Stallion featuring Beyoncé, and "The
 +  music by Drake, Kanye West, Eminem, and Jay-Z.
 +  music by artists such as Chance the Rapper, Wiz Khalifa, Big Sean, Drake, Lil Wayne, Kendrick Lamar, and Jay-Z.
 +  other artists who make similar music, such as Wiz Khalifa, Tyga, Big Sean, Kanye West, and T.I.
 +  artists such as Wiz Khalifa, Lupe Fiasco, T.I., Kid Cudi, Big Boi, Nicki Minaj, and Drake.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Backstreet Boys also would enjoy
 +  music by N*Sync and the Spice Girls. Both groups had a similar sound and style to Backstreet Boys and were popular in the 1990s. Other similar artists include: 

-Aqua
-Britney Spears
-Hanson
-LFO
-Montell Jordan
-No Doubt 
-O-Town
 +  music by

*NSYNC, Britney Spears, Spice Girls, Five, New Kids on the Block, Hanson, and Boyz II Men.
 +  listening to

* NSYNC
* Spice Girls
* Britney Spears
* Justin Timberlake
* Boyz II Men
 +  music by *NSYNC. Both bands come from the same era of popular music and their sound is very similar. They both had a pop-dance sound that was popular in the late 90s and early 2000s. Fans of either band would likely enjoy music from the other.
 +  listening to other boy bands such as *NSYNC, the Jonas Brothers, One Direction, and BTS. They may also enjoy listening to other pop artists such as Justin Bieber, Ariana Grande, Taylor Swift, and Shawn Mendes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Base Force One also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

N.W.A., Gang Starr, Public Enemy, Run–D.M.C., Boogie Down Productions, Ice-T, EPMD, De La Soul, Big Daddy Kane and A Tribe Called Quest.
 +  listening to music by The Beastie Boys. Both groups are hip-hop groups that incorporate elements of rap and punk into their music. The Beastie Boys are often considered pioneers in the genre, having released some of the earliest rap-rock crossover songs. Base Force One is a newer group, but they have a similar sound that appeals to those who
 +  listening to the music of Jurassic 5, The Roots, and A Tribe Called Quest. All three of these hip hop groups have a similar style and sound to Base Force One.
 +  listening to music by

Kanye West, Drake, A$AP Rocky, Kendrick Lamar, Missy Elliott, and Jay-Z.
 +  music by

The Roots, A Tribe Called Quest, Gang Starr, Jurassic 5, and De La Soul.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Beach House also would enjoy
 +  listening to the following bands:

1. Sufjan Stevens
2. Fleet Foxes
3. Grizzly Bear
4. Bon Iver
5. The Shins
6. The National
7. Real Estate
8. Slowdive
9. Neon Indian
10. Stereolab
 +  listening to music by The xx. The two bands have a similar sound, combining dreamy, ambient electronica with shoegaze-inspired indie rock. While Beach House has more of an ethereal, spacey sound, The xx are known for their soulful, minimalist approach. Both bands also make use of subtle harmonies and major key melodies
 +  music by

The War on Drugs, Real Estate, The xx, Wild Nothing, Phantogram, Father John Misty, Washed Out, Balmorhea, and DIIV.
 +  music by:

-The War on Drugs
-Real Estate
-Fleet Foxes
-Grizzly Bear
-Bon Iver
-The Shins
-The National
-Spoon
-Slowdive
-Lower Dens
 +  music by

The xx, Mazzy Star, Fleet Foxes, Real Estate, Cocteau Twins, Chvrches, Wild Nothing, Washed Out, The Radio Dept., Yo La Tengo.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bear's Den also would enjoy
 +  listening to the following music:

1. The Staves
2. Laura Marling
3. Daughter
4. Bon Iver
5. Fleet Foxes
6. Ben Howard
7. Mumford & Sons
8. The Tallest Man on Earth
9. John Martyn
10. Iron & Wine
 +  listening to music by the bands Bon Iver, James Vincent McMorrow, and The Tallest Man On Earth.
 +  listening to music by:

Mumford & Sons, The Lumineers, Of Monsters and Men, The Head and the Heart, Bon Iver, Fleet Foxes, First Aid Kit, Tall Heights.
 +  music from similar genres such as folk, indie, and Americana. They may enjoy artists such as The Lumineers, Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, Iron and Wine, The Head and the Heart, Ryan Adams, and other folk-inspired acts.
 +  music by artists such as Mumford & Sons, The Lumineers, First Aid Kit, Of Monsters and Men, Beirut, Hozier, and Fleet Foxes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bears in Trees also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Bon Iver, Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, The Lumineers, Of Monsters and Men, Local Natives, The Head and the Heart, Sufjan Stevens, The Tallest Man on Earth, First Aid Kit.
 +  listening to music by

Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, Sufjan Stevens, Phosphorescent, and The Tallest Man on Earth.
 +  listening to music by

Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, The Tallest Man on Earth, Sufjan Stevens, and Laura Marling.
 +  music by:

Bon Iver, Fleet Foxes, Sufjan Stevens, Iron & Wine, The Head and the Heart, Death Cab for Cutie, National Parks, Local Natives, Of Monsters and Men, and Typhoon.
 +  listening to music by acts such as Bon Iver, The Tallest Man on Earth, Julien Baker, Sufjan Stevens, Fleet Foxes, Grizzly Bear, Iron & Wine, and many more. These artists are all part of the folk/indie/alternative genre which Bears in Trees also falls into.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Beastie Boys also would enjoy
 +  listening to

A Tribe Called Quest, Run-D.M.C., The Roots, Public Enemy, N.W.A., and LL Cool J.
 +  listening to other alternative hip-hop artists such as A Tribe Called Quest, Outkast, De La Soul, Run-D.M.C., Public Enemy, The Roots, Wu-Tang Clan, and Nas.
 +  music by Run DMC
 +  listening to

Public Enemy, Run-DMC, A Tribe Called Quest, The Roots, LL Cool J, and N.W.A.
 +  listening to

Run-DMC, Public Enemy, A Tribe Called Quest, LL Cool J, and Sugarhill Gang.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Beethoven also would enjoy
 +  music by

Mozart, Bach, Haydn, and Schubert.
 +  other classical music, especially from composers such as Mozart, Bach, Haydn, and Handel. They might also enjoy more modern classical music from composers such as Debussy, Ravel, and Stravinsky. Listening to recordings with a live orchestra would also be enjoyable for someone who likes Beethoven's music.
 +  listening to music by

Mozart, Bach, Brahms, Haydn, and Chopin.
 +  music by

Mozart, Haydn, Bach, Chopin, Schumann, Brahms, and Handel.
 +  listening to music by other Classical composers such as Mozart, Bach, Haydn, Schubert, and Handel. Other similar styles of music include Romantic music (e.g. Brahms and Chopin), Baroque music (e.g. Corelli and Vivaldi), and Impressionist music (e.g.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bel Canto also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Enya, Loreena McKennitt, Clannad, Dead Can Dance, Ólafur Arnalds, Jónsi, Faun, and Ane Brun.
 +  listening to music by

Enigma, Delerium, Sirenia, Dead Can Dance, and Loreena McKennitt.
 +  music by Enigma and Loreena McKennitt. Both of these acts are considered to be in the same genre, "New Age" music. They both have a similar sound, combining elements of classical, world, and electronic music. Enigma's music often has ethereal and spiritual themes while McKennitt's tends to focus more on traditional
 +  other music by:

1. Enya
2. Bat for Lashes
3. Cocteau Twins
4. A-ha
5. Dead Can Dance
6. The Cranberries
7. Saint Etienne
8. Kate Bush
9. Tori Amos
10. Loreena McKennitt
 +  listening to music by

The Cocteau Twins, Dead Can Dance, This Mortal Coil, Azam Ali, Loreena McKennitt, and Enigma.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Belle and Sebastian also would enjoy
 +  listening to bands such as Camera Obscura, The Magnetic Fields, and The Divine Comedy. All of these bands have a similar style of music to Belle and Sebastian, with a focus on gentle melodies, thoughtful lyrics and an overall indie folk sound.
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

1. The Magnetic Fields 
2. Yo La Tengo 
3. Camera Obscura 
4. The Shins 
5. Morphine 
6. Neutral Milk Hotel 
7. Pavement 
8. Of Montreal 
9. The Smith
 +  listening to Camera Obscura, The Magnetic Fields, Stereolab, and Yo La Tengo. All of these bands have a similar sound with mellow, dreamy indie-pop music.
 +  listening to music by:

1. Camera Obscura
2. The Decemberists
3. The Shins
4. Death Cab for Cutie
5. Neutral Milk Hotel
6. Of Montreal
7. Broken Social Scene
8. Sufjan Stevens
9. The Magnetic Fields
10. Beirut
 +  music by

The Decemberists, Camera Obscura, St. Vincent, The New Pornographers, Feist, Sufjan Stevens, Spoon, Death Cab for Cutie, Iron & Wine, The Shins.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Beth Orton also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Cranberries, Cat Power, Mazzy Star, Florence + the Machine, Feist, Tori Amos, and Fiona Apple.
 +  listening to 

other singer-songwriters such as: 
1. Fiona Apple 
2. Cat Power 
3. Joni Mitchell 
4. Damien Rice 
5. Elliott Smith 
6. Paul Simon 
7. Laura Marling 
8. Tracy Chapman 
9. Vashti
 +  music by

Norah Jones, Feist, Laura Marling, Iron and Wine, Rufus Wainwright, and Ryan Adams.
 +  listening to music by:

-Natalie Merchant
-K.D. Lang
-Sarah McLachlan
-Aimee Mann
-Laurie Anderson
-Lisa Germano
-Joan Armatrading
 +  listening to music by:

Norah Jones, Tori Amos, Sarah McLachlan, and PJ Harvey.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Beyoncé also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Rihanna, Ariana Grande, Lady Gaga, Nicki Minaj, Cardi B, and J. Cole.
 +  music by Rihanna. Beyoncé and Rihanna both have similar R&B/pop styles in their music, so someone who enjoys the music of one artist is likely to enjoy the music of the other.
 +  listening to music by Rihanna, Lady Gaga, and Ariana Grande.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Rihanna, Kelly Rowland, Destiny's Child, and Nicki Minaj. They may also enjoy listening to other R&B/Pop artists such as Bruno Mars, Justin Timberlake, Mariah Carey, and Ariana Grande.
 +  listening to music by artists like Rihanna, Bruno Mars, Adele, and Lady Gaga.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Big Bad Voodoo Daddy also would enjoy
 +  listening to other swing or jazz bands such as The Brian Setzer Orchestra, Squirrel Nut Zippers, Cherry Poppin' Daddies, and Royal Crown Revue. They may also enjoy listening to artists like Cab Calloway, Benny Goodman, and Duke Ellington.
 +  other styles of music, such as swing jazz, western swing, Dixieland jazz, traditional jazz, Latin jazz, and gypsy jazz. They may also enjoy other related genres such as jump blues, boogie-woogie, and ska.
 +  listening to bands such as Cherry Poppin' Daddies, Squirrel Nut Zippers, Royal Crown Revue, and Lavay Smith & Her Red Hot Skillet Lickers. These bands all draw from similar swing, jazz, and jump blues influences, often featuring horns and strings in their arrangements.
 +  listening to music by Swing Republic, Royal Crown Revue, and The Brian Setzer Orchestra.
 +  the music of the Brian Setzer Orchestra. The two bands have a similar style of music that draws on the sounds of jump blues, swing jazz and big band. Both bands feature lively instrumentation, including horns and saxophones, driving percussion and upbeat melodies.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Billie Marten also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from

Bon Iver, Phoebe Bridgers, Lucy Rose, Daughter, Fleet Foxes, Sufjan Stevens, Nick Drake, James Blake, Hozier, and Laura Marling.
 +  listening to music by 

Bon Iver, Laura Marling, Daughter, Daughter of Swords, Phoebe Bridgers, Big Thief.
 +  listening to music by:

Bon Iver, Daughter, Laura Marling, Lucy Rose, Bombay Bicycle Club, Johnnyswim, The Tallest Man On Earth, Gregory Alan Isakov, and Lord Huron.
 +  listening to music by

Bon Iver, Sufjan Stevens, Daughter, Laura Marling, and The Oh Hellos.
 +  listening to

Fiona Apple, Phoebe Bridgers, The Japanese House, Julien Baker, Laura Marling and Sharon Van Etten.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Black Rebel Motorcycle Club also would enjoy
 +  music by

The White Stripes, The Black Keys, Interpol, Echo & The Bunnymen, Arctic Monkeys, The Jesus and Mary Chain, The Kills, Yeah Yeah Yeahs, Joy Division, The Stone Roses.
 +  music by

The Black Keys, Interpol, The Strokes, Arctic Monkeys, Queens of the Stone Age, Pixies, White Stripes, Dinosaur Jr., The Kills, Joy Division.
 +  listening to music by

The Jesus and Mary Chain, The Dandy Warhols, The Brian Jonestown Massacre, The Kills, The Strokes, The White Stripes, Interpol, Arctic Monkeys, Death from Above 1979.
 +  listening to

-The Black Keys
-The White Stripes
-The Kills
-The Strokes
-The Vines
-Interpol
-Death From Above 1979
-The Libertines 
-Arctic Monkeys 
-Foo Fighters
 +  listening to artists such as The Strokes, The Vines, Interpol, The Kills, Arctic Monkeys, and The White Stripes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Black Sabbath also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Led Zeppelin, Metallica, AC/DC, Iron Maiden, Judas Priest, Ozzy Osbourne, Van Halen, Motorhead, Megadeth, and Slayer.
 +  music by:

Led Zeppelin, Deep Purple, Judas Priest, Iron Maiden, Motörhead, Metallica, Slayer, Megadeth.
 +  music by Led Zeppelin. Black Sabbath and Led Zeppelin are both classic rock bands who emerged in the late 1960s and early 1970s. Both bands have a sound that is heavily influenced by blues, and feature crunchy guitar riffs and memorable vocal melodies. Although there are some distinct differences between the two bands' styles, fans of one are
 +  listening to music by

Led Zeppelin, Deep Purple, Judas Priest, Iron Maiden, Slayer, Metallica, Megadeth, Alice in Chains, and Pantera.
 +  music by

Led Zeppelin, Deep Purple, Judas Priest, Iron Maiden, Motörhead, and Metallica.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Black Tape For A Blue Girl also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Cruxshadows, Siren's Cry, Faith and the Muse, Assemblage 23, The Last Dance, Essence of Mind, Seeming, Neikka RPM, Ego Likeness, and Love Spirals Downwards.
 +  listening to music by Lycia
 +  music by

This Mortal Coil, Cocteau Twins, The Cure, Clan of Xymox, Dead Can Dance, The Chameleons, The Smiths, The Sisters of Mercy.
 + 

Music by This Mortal Coil, Cocteau Twins, Dead Can Dance, Clan of Xymox, Lycia, and Love Spirals Downwards.
 +  music from other darkwave and ethereal musical acts such as This Mortal Coil, Dead Can Dance, Cocteau Twins, Clan of Xymox, Lycia, and Love Spirals Downwards.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bloodrock also would enjoy
 +  music by

Molly Hatchet, Lynyrd Skynyrd, Blue Öyster Cult, Mountain, ZZ Top, Black Sabbath, Led Zeppelin, Grand Funk Railroad, Deep Purple, and Aerosmith.
 +  music by bands such as Steppenwolf, Deep Purple, Cream, Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, Bad Company, Lynyrd Skynyrd, Uriah Heep and Grand Funk Railroad.
 +  other hard rock and metal music, such as Led Zeppelin, AC/DC, Metallica, Black Sabbath, Iron Maiden, Guns N' Roses, Judas Priest, and Deep Purple. They may also appreciate other 1970s classic rock and progressive rock acts such as Rush, Pink Floyd, Queen, and Jethro Tull.
 +  music by

Blue Oyster Cult, Grand Funk Railroad, ZZ Top, Black Sabbath, Led Zeppelin, and Aerosmith.
 +  listening to music by which of the following?

-Alice Cooper
-Kansas
-Black Sabbath
-Thin Lizzy 
-Lynyrd Skynyrd


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Blues Sacareno also would enjoy
 +  listening to Reggae and Calypso music. Both of these genres are rooted in the same tradition of African-American music, and share many similar sounds and rhythms. Reggae and Calypso often feature upbeat rhythms, soulful vocal melodies, and lyrics that tell stories of love, life, and struggles.
 +  music by

Ray Charles, Muddy Waters, B.B. King, John Lee Hooker, Little Walter, Howlin' Wolf, Keb' Mo', Bonnie Raitt, Taj Mahal, and Susan Tedeschi.
 +  listening to music by

Louis Armstrong, Etta James, B.B. King, Robert Johnson, Muddy Waters, and Billie Holiday.
 +  listening to music by

Delta Blues, Texas Blues, Chicago Blues, New Orleans Blues, and Piedmont Blues.
 +  listening to jazz music. Jazz is a style of music that has its roots in the blues, so they would likely have a lot of musical overlap. Jazz is often seen as a more complex and improvisational style than the blues, but it still has strong links to its predecessor. It can be said that jazz is an evolution of the blues, with


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Blur also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Oasis, Pulp, Supergrass, Elastica, The Stone Roses, Suede, and The Verve.
 +  listening to the music of

The Smiths, Pulp, Suede, The Stone Roses, Oasis, Happy Mondays, Supergrass, Elastica, The Charlatans UK.
 +  listening to

Oasis, Pulp, Supergrass, The Stone Roses, Suede, and The Verve.
 +  listening to bands such as Oasis, Pulp, Supergrass, The Charlatans, and Elastica. All of these bands are associated with the Britpop movement of the 1990s and have a similar sound to Blur in terms of their mix of rock and pop influences.
 +  listening to music by other British rock bands such as Oasis, Pulp, The Smiths, Supergrass, Suede, Arctic Monkeys, Radiohead and The Libertines.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Boards of Canada also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Aphex Twin, Autechre, The Orb, Brian Eno, and Four Tet.
 +  music by Aphex Twin. Both artists produce electronic music with an ambient, moody feel and often incorporate ethereal soundscapes and synthesized melodies.
 +  listening to music by Aphex Twin. Aphex Twin and Boards of Canada are two of the most influential and iconic electronic musicians of all-time, and both artists have created music that is similar in its experimental and ambient qualities. Both musicians employ a variety of sound design techniques to create unique sonic landscapes, often featuring dreamy and hypnotic atmospheres
 +  music by:

• Aphex Twin
• Autechre
• Ulrich Schnauss
• The Field
• Tycho
• Brian Eno
• Bibio
• Oneohtrix Point Never
• Lone
• Panda Bear
 +  music by Aphex Twin. Aphex Twin and Boards of Canada both produce ambient electronic music that often incorporate elements of IDM, experimental, and ambient sounds into their compositions. Both artists are known for creating music that is experimental in nature, atmospheric and often has a dreamy or mysterious quality. They also share influences from various genres such as hip-


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bob Dylan also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Leonard Cohen, Joan Baez, Joni Mitchell, Neil Young, and Woody Guthrie.
 +  listening to music by

Bruce Springsteen, Joni Mitchell, Leonard Cohen, Joan Baez, and Neil Young.
 +  music from other artists such as Joni Mitchell, Leonard Cohen, Joan Baez, Neil Young, and Van Morrison. These artists are either contemporaries of Dylan or have been influenced by his style. Each of these musicians have a unique style that blends folk, blues, and rock 'n' roll elements in their music.
 +  listening to music by Neil Young. Both artists have similar styles of music that feature acoustic sounds and lyrics that tell stories. Additionally, both artists are known for their influence on the folk rock genre and have collaborated together in the past.
 +  music by

Johnny Cash, Bruce Springsteen, Neil Young, Leonard Cohen, Joan Baez, and Pete Seeger.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bob Marley also would enjoy
 +  music by other reggae artists, such as Peter Tosh, Jimmy Cliff, Burning Spear, Toots & The Maytals and Steel Pulse. These artists are all considered important figures in the development of reggae music.
 +  listening to music by other reggae artists, such as Peter Tosh, Jimmy Cliff, Toots and the Maytals, Burning Spear, Desmond Dekker, and Steel Pulse.
 +  music by artists like: 

Peter Tosh, Burning Spear, Jimmy Cliff, Toots and the Maytals, Israel Vibration, Steel Pulse, Inner Circle, Third World, Damian Marley, Ziggy Marley, and Alpha Blondy.
 +  music from other reggae musicians, such as Peter Tosh, Burning Spear, and Jimmy Cliff. Other popular reggae artists include Toots and the Maytals, Inner Circle, Alton Ellis, Bunny Wailer, and Steel Pulse.
 +  music by other reggae artists such as Peter Tosh, Jimmy Cliff, Toots & The Maytals, Burning Spear and Steel Pulse.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bobby Boris Pickett also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Dr. Hook and the Medicine Show. The two artists have a similar style, with lighthearted and humorous lyrics about love and relationships. Dr. Hook and the Medicine Show are best known for their hit song "Cover of the Rolling Stone", but have many other songs that could be enjoyed by fans of Bobby Boris Pickett.
 +  listening to music by:

The Monkees, The Rolling Stones, The Troggs, The Beach Boys, The Animals, and The Kinks.
 +  music by

Ricki Lee Jones, Lou Reed, David Bowie, Brian Setzer Orchestra, and Etta James.
 +  music by 

The Trashmen, The Ventures, Sha Na Na, and Chubby Checker.
 +  listening to music by other artists from the 1960s such as The Beach Boys, The Beatles, The Rolling Stones, and Elvis Presley. Other artists from the same era that are popular include Elton John, David Bowie, Janis Joplin, and Jimi Hendrix.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bomb the Music Industry also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other punk rock bands such as The Bouncing Souls, NOFX, Lagwagon, Rise Against, Bad Religion, The Offspring, Green Day, Pennywise, and Descendents.
 +  listening to music by

The Front Bottoms, PUP, Jeff Rosenstock, The Menzingers, Joyce Manor, The Smith Street Band, and Laura Stevenson.
 +  listening to other ska-punk bands, such as Reel Big Fish, Mustard Plug, The Interrupters, and Less Than Jake. Other similar ska-punk influenced bands include Save Ferris, Streetlight Manifesto, The Mighty Mighty Bosstones, and Goldfinger.
 +  listening to music by

Rise Against, Reel Big Fish, Streetlight Manifesto, Less Than Jake, Alkaline Trio, and Anti-Flag.
 +  similar music by bands such as Against Me!, The Lawrence Arms, The Menzingers, and Anti-Flag. All of these bands are associated with the punk rock genre and share many of the same ideas and themes found in Bomb the Music Industry's music. Additionally, these bands often tour together and are seen as contemporaries or peers in the punk rock


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bon Iver also would enjoy
 +  music by

The National, Sufjan Stevens, Fleet Foxes, Local Natives, Iron & Wine, and Daughter.
 +  listening to music by Sufjan Stevens. Both artists are known for their unique blend of folk, indie, and experimental music. They share many similarities in their sound, with both artists making liberal use of clever instrumentation, acoustic guitar, and intricate vocal harmonies. Additionally, both artists draw heavily from personal experiences in their lyrics, which can be
 +  music from folk-pop artists such as Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, and Sufjan Stevens. All of these artists have similar musical styles to Bon Iver and all incorporate elements of folk, indie, and pop music. Additionally, other recommended artists may include Ray LaMontagne, The Head and the Heart, Angus & Julia Stone,
 +  music by

Moses Sumney,  Nick Drake, Sufjan Stevens, Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, The National, Beach House, Phoebe Bridgers, Bonny Light Horseman, and Colin Stetson.
 +  music by: 

Moses Sumney, The National, Sufjan Stevens, Sharon Van Etten, James Blake, Feist, Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, Justin Vernon, Phoebe Bridgers.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Brendan Kelly also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by bands such as The Lawrence Arms, Alkaline Trio, The Menzingers, and The Falcon. All of these bands are part of the punk rock/indie rock genre. They all have a similar sound to Brendan Kelly's music—loud, fast-paced guitars and drums with catchy lyrics.
 +  the music of the bands The Lawrence Arms, Alkaline Trio, and The Menzingers. All three bands are part of the punk rock scene and feature similar styles and sounds as Brendan Kelly's music. Fans of Kelly's music will likely appreciate the catchy melodies, hard-hitting riffs, and emotionally charged lyrics found in the songs of
 +  listening to music by Dan Andriano, another member of The Lawrence Arms. Dan Andriano is the bassist and occasional vocalist for the punk rock band. He has released five solo albums since 2009, including Hurricane Season in 2016. His songs have a variety of influences ranging from pop punk, to folk, to alternative country. Fans of
 +  listening to music by The Lawrence Arms. The Lawrence Arms is a punk rock band that was co-founded by Brendan Kelly and Neil Hennessy in 1999. They released their debut album, "Apathy & Exhaustion," in 2002, and have since released eight additional albums. The band's sound has been described as a blend of melodic
 +  music by other punk rock artists, such as Rancid, The Offspring, Bad Religion, NOFX, Rise Against, and The Gaslight Anthem. These bands are all heavily influenced by punk music and have a similar sound to Brendan Kelly's music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Brian also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Beatles, The Beach Boys, Fleetwood Mac, Led Zeppelin, and Bob Dylan.
 +  music by 

Bruno Mars, Justin Timberlake, Taylor Swift, Ed Sheeran, Adele, Maroon 5, and Beyoncé.
 +  listening to music by

Coldplay, The 1975, Radiohead, Travis, Billie Eilish, and U2.
 +  music by

The Beatles, Bob Dylan, Bruce Springsteen, David Bowie, Elton John, Fleetwood Mac, Led Zeppelin, Madonna, Paul McCartney, Prince, and Stevie Wonder.
 +  listening to music by

Bob Dylan, Paul McCartney, The Beatles, Neil Young, Joni Mitchell, Bruce Springsteen, and Elton John.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Bring Me The Horizon also would enjoy
 +  music by other metalcore bands, such as Asking Alexandria, Killswitch Engage, and Architects. Other similar bands from across the metal genre include Slipknot, Parkway Drive, and Trivium.
 +  listening to music by similar artists such as Asking Alexandria, Pierce The Veil, All That Remains, Architects, A Day To Remember, Of Mice & Men, Motionless In White, and Get Scared.
 +  listening to music by:

Papa Roach, A Day to Remember, Asking Alexandria, Falling in Reverse, Linkin Park, Slipknot, System of a Down, The Ghost Inside, Of Mice & Men, Motionless In White.
 +  listening to music by:

Papa Roach, Architects, Of Mice and Men, A Day to Remember, All That Remains, Linkin Park, Asking Alexandria, Bullet for My Valentine, Motionless In White, Sleeping With Sirens.
 +  music by:

-Muse, Asking Alexandria, Of Mice & Men, Parkway Drive, Architects, A Day To Remember, August Burns Red, letlive., Issues, Sleeping With Sirens


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Britney Spears also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Lady Gaga. Both artists are known for their pop music and upbeat tunes. Lady Gaga's music is generally more theatrical and experimental than Britney Spears', but fans of one artist may still enjoy the other's music.
 +  music by other artists in the pop genre such as Justin Bieber, Ariana Grande, Taylor Swift, Lady Gaga, Rihanna, Demi Lovato, and Selena Gomez.
 +  listening to music by

Justin Timberlake, Rihanna, Lady Gaga, Christina Aguilera, Katy Perry, Kelly Clarkson, and Demi Lovato.
 +  listening to music by

Christina Aguilera, Lady Gaga, Taylor Swift, Backstreet Boys, Justin Timberlake, Gwen Stefani, Katy Perry, Rihanna, Pink, and Beyoncé.
 +  listening to music by Kelly Clarkson, Beyoncé, Lady Gaga, and Justin Timberlake.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Buddy Holly also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Elvis Presley. While their styles of music are different, they both performed classic and timeless rock & roll music. Elvis Presley is often considered the "King of Rock & Roll," while Buddy Holly is often credited with helping to pioneer the genre. Both artists had a large influence on popular music that is still felt today.
 +  listening to music by The Beach Boys and Elvis Presley
 +  listening to music by early rock and roll artists such as Elvis Presley, Chuck Berry, Little Richard, and Fats Domino. These four artists are often referred to as the "founding fathers" of rock and roll, and their music has influenced many modern genres, including Buddy Holly's. Listening to their music will give a sense of
 +  the music of:

1. Elvis Presley
2. Roy Orbison
3. The Beach Boys
4. Johnny Cash
5. Chuck Berry
6. Carl Perkins
7. Jerry Lee Lewis
8. Little Richard
9. The Everly Brothers
10. Bill Haley & His Comets
 +  music by Elvis Presley. Elvis Presley is considered to be the "King of Rock and Roll" and was incredibly influential in the 1950s and 1960s, just like Buddy Holly. Both artists had a large influence on the genre of rock and roll, and many of their songs have similar sounds and themes. Consequently, someone who enjoys Buddy Holly


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Børns also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Tame Impala, Carly Rae Jepsen, Vampire Weekend, MGMT, Passion Pit, and Foster the People.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Phoebe Bridgers, Tame Impala, Glass Animals, LÉON, and Aurora.
 +  music by Tame Impala. Both Børns and Tame Impala have psychedelic, dreamy pop vibes. They both feature unique melodies and sounds that provide an ethereal listening experience. Fans of Børns would also likely appreciate the experimental soundscapes of Tame Impala and their blend of classic rock and psych-
 +  listening to music from the following artists:

1. Tame Impala
2. Halsey
3. Bleachers
4. The 1975
5. Vampire Weekend
6. MGMT
7. Phantogram
8. Passion Pit
9. CHVRCHES
10. Lorde
 +  listening to music by Tove Lo and Halsey. Both Tove Lo and Halsey create alternative-pop music that is similar in style to Børns.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by CDR also would enjoy
 +  streaming services. Streaming services provide a wide variety of music and allow users to customize their listening experience. Music streaming services like Spotify, Apple Music, and Pandora offer users the ability to search for and listen to new music, create playlists, or listen to pre-existing playlists from other users. Additionally, streaming services often come with additional features such
 +  listening to music through streaming services as they have a wide variety of music. Streaming services may provide access to a much larger selection of songs, as well as new releases, while CDs typically contain only a handful of tracks. Additionally, streaming services often offer better sound quality than CDR and the convenience of being able to access the music from any device.
 +  streaming music services like Spotify or Pandora. These streaming services allow users to access a large variety of music and create personalized playlists. They also offer radio stations tailored to specific genres and artists, making it easy to find new music that suits your taste.
 +  listening to music on the radio. Radio stations often play a variety of music, including classical, rock, rap and pop. Additionally, they often have special programs dedicated to specific genres and feature interviews with artists and DJs. Listening to the radio can provide a listener with access to new music and different styles from around the world.
 +  listening to music by streaming services such as Spotify, Apple Music, and Google Play Music. Streaming services offer users a vast selection of music that can be accessed in various ways, including through applications on smartphones, tablets, and computers. They also make it easy to share music with friends and discover new artists. Additionally, many streaming services also include exclusive content


Prompt: A person who listens to music by CORPSE also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Carnifex, Whitechapel, Suicide Silence, The Black Dahlia Murder, and Oceano.
 +  music from other metal genres such as black metal, death metal, thrash metal, doom metal and progressive metal. They may also enjoy some forms of electronic music such as industrial, EBM, and power noise. Additionally, they may be open to listening to other dark genres such as dark ambient, dungeon synth, and post-metal.
 +  listening to music by

Rotting Christ, Marduk, Belphegor, Behemoth, Immortal, Cradle of Filth, Carach Angren, and Necronomicon.
 +  listening to

-Deathcore 
-Metalcore 
-Black Metal 
-Thrash Metal 
-Brutal Death Metal 
-Grindcore 
-Industrial Metal
 +  other music genres, such as metalcore, deathcore, and grindcore. They might also like some other heavier genres, such as black metal, doom metal, and death metal. Additionally, they may enjoy more melodic styles, such as post-hardcore and progressive metal.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Caamp also would enjoy
 +  music from the band The Lumineers. The two bands have a similar style of folk-rock music with lyrics about life's struggles and joys. Both bands rely heavily on acoustic guitar, banjo, and harmonica to create their sound. Additionally, both have a strong focus on vocal harmonies. Fans of either band would likely also be
 +  music by Courtny Barnett, The Avett Brothers, and The Lumineers.
 +  listening to music by other country music groups such as Little Big Town, Old Dominion, The Band Perry, and Kacey Musgraves.
 +  music from other folk and indie bands, such as Bon Iver, Fleet Foxes, The Head and the Heart, The Lumineers, Father John Misty, Local Natives, and Tallest Man on Earth.
 +  the music of

The Avett Brothers, Lake Street Dive, The Lumineers, The Head and the Heart, The Band of Heathens, and Trampled by Turtles.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cage the Elephant also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Foals, The Black Keys, Arctic Monkeys, Alt-J, The Vaccines, Kings of Leon, Tame Impala, Queens of the Stone Age, Royal Blood, The Strokes.
 +  songs by

Foals, The Black Keys, Arctic Monkeys, Queens of the Stone Age, St. Vincent, Alt-J, The Strokes, Modest Mouse, Tame Impala, and Manchester Orchestra.
 +  listening to the following bands:

- Arctic Monkeys
- Kings of Leon
- The Black Keys
- Foals
- The Killers
- Queens of the Stone Age
- The Strokes
- Muse
- Vampire Weekend
- Modest Mouse
 +  listening to

 bands or artists such as Arctic Monkeys, The Black Keys, The White Stripes, Queens of the Stone Age, Wolf Alice, alt-J, The Killers, Foo Fighters, Muse, and Red Hot Chili Peppers.
 +  listening to

alt-J, The White Stripes, The Black Keys, Kings of Leon, Arctic Monkeys, Foster the People, Imagine Dragons, Queens of the Stone Age, Modest Mouse, and Silversun Pickups.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cake Bake Betty also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other alternative bands from the 1990s such as The Smashing Pumpkins, Weezer, The Offspring, Beck, Nine Inch Nails, Foo Fighters, and Spin Doctors.
 +  music by The White Stripes. They both share a rockabilly, garage rock, and punk rock sound which is heavily influenced by blues and folk music. Furthermore, they both have clever, witty lyrics that often focus on personal experiences.
 +  music by:

The B-52s, Talking Heads, Devo, Weezer, Violent Femmes, Cake, They Might Be Giants, The Pixies, Ween, Flaming Lips.
 +  music by other alternative rock bands such as Weezer, The White Stripes, The Pixies, R.E.M., Pavement, and The Strokes. These bands all share the same alternative rock sound as Cake Bake Betty, which typically features a focus on distorted guitars and catchy melodies. Additionally, someone who enjoys Cake Bake Betty may
 +  music by

They Might Be Giants, The Dresden Dolls, Jonathan Coulton, The Aquabats, The Decemberists, Andrew Bird, Ween, Of Montreal, Regina Spektor, Beck.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Calvin Johnson also would enjoy
 +  music by Beat Happening, Kurt Vile, and Yo La Tengo. All three of these artists were contemporaries of Calvin Johnson and share many of the same influences and sonic sensibilities. Beat Happening have a lo-fi indie-rock sound, while Kurt Vile has a more mellow, dreamy sound. Yo La Tengo
 +  listening to music by artists such as Kurt Vile, Courtney Barnett, Mac DeMarco, Built to Spill, Yo La Tengo, Sleater-Kinney, The Microphones, and Modest Mouse.
 +  listening to music by bands like Yo La Tengo, Beat Happening, and The Mountain Goats. All three of these bands share similar musical styles with Calvin Johnson, such as lo-fi indie rock and jangle pop. Fans of Calvin Johnson's work will appreciate the sonic similarities between these bands and his own work. In addition, all
 +  listening to music by artists such as Elliott Smith, The Microphones, Modest Mouse, Pavement, The Shins, Built to Spill, Dinosaur Jr., Beat Happening, Sleater-Kinney, and the Soft Boys.
 +  music by artists such as Beat Happening, K Records, Modest Mouse, Elliott Smith, The Microphones, Cat Power, Iron & Wine, Sleater-Kinney, Mirah, and Built To Spill.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Caravan Palace also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by 
Parov Stelar, Tape Five, and Club des Belugas.
 +  music by

Parov Stelar, Django Reinhardt, Kormac, Jamie Berry, and The Electric Swing Circus.
 +  music by 

Parov Stelar, Yelle, Kavinsky, Ryan Playground, Wax Tailor, Breakbot.
 +  listening to

Daft Punk, Stromae, Parov Stelar, Justice, C2C, Electric Guest, Zeds Dead, Yelle, and Röyksopp.
 +  music by

Daft Punk, Parov Stelar, Gramatik, Electro Swing Revolution, The Electric Swing Circus, and The Hot Sugar Band.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Caribou also would enjoy
 +  music by

Björk, Four Tet, Flying Lotus, Little Dragon, Daphni, Radiohead, Toro Y Moi, Jon Hopkins, James Blake, Tame Impala.
 +  music by the following artists:

- Four Tet 
- Tycho 
- Bonobo 
- Apparat 
- Floating Points 
- Gold Panda 
- Little Dragon 
- Toro y Moi 
- Com Truise 
- Mount Kimbie
 +  listening to music by

Four Tet, Animal Collective, TV on the Radio, Hot Chip, Beach House, and Flying Lotus.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Four Tet, Tame Impala, Floating Points, Bonobo, Tycho, Little Dragon, and Mount Kimbie.
 +  listening to music by Bonobo, Four Tet, and Flying Lotus.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Carl Andre also would enjoy
 +  listening to

Minimalist composers such as Philip Glass, Steve Reich, John Adams, and Terry Riley, as well as other contemporary visual artists like Sol LeWitt, Robert Morris, and Dan Flavin.
 +  music by

Other minimalist composers such as Steve Reich, Philip Glass, John Cage, and Terry Riley.
 +  music by

other minimalist composers, such as Steve Reich, John Adams, Philip Glass, and Terry Riley.
 +  listening to music by other minimalist composers such as La Monte Young, Terry Riley, Philip Glass, Steve Reich, John Cage, and Morton Feldman. These composers have all been influential in creating a unique minimalistic sound similar to that of Andre.
 +  listening to music by

Sol LeWitt, Yoko Ono, Robert Morris, and Robert Rauschenberg.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Carl Perkins also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Elvis Presley, Johnny Cash, Buddy Holly, Jerry Lee Lewis, and Roy Orbison.
 +  listening to 
Elvis Presley, Johnny Cash, Roy Orbison, Buddy Holly, and Chuck Berry. All of these musicians are often considered to be pioneers of rock 'n' roll and were contemporaries of Carl Perkins.
 +  listening to music by Elvis Presley. Elvis Presley and Carl Perkins were both influential early rock and roll artists who shared a close friendship. Both artists recorded many classic songs with similar styles, such as "Blue Suede Shoes," which was written and recorded by Perkins, but later made famous by Presley. As such, fans of Carl Perkins
 +  listening to music by other early rock and roll pioneers such as Elvis Presley, Chuck Berry, Little Richard, Buddy Holly, and Fats Domino. They might also enjoy listening to the influential blues musicians who inspired early rock and roll such as Muddy Waters, Howlin' Wolf, and John Lee Hooker.
 +  listening to music by other early rock and roll musicians such as Elvis Presley, Chuck Berry, Little Richard, and Buddy Holly. All of these musicians were influential in the development of rock and roll music during the 1950s, and their songs feature many similar elements such as catchy melodies, strong backbeat rhythms, and prominent guitar playing.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Carlos Quizpez Asín also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Silvio Rodríguez, Victor Jara, Mercedes Sosa, Atahualpa Yupanqui and Violeta Parra.
 +  listening to music by:

1. Juanes
2. Vicente Fernández
3. Romeo Santos
4. Shakira
5. Marc Anthony
6. Maná
7. Juan Luis Guerra
8. Ozuna
9. Daddy Yankee
10. Alejandro Sanz
 +  music by other Latin American composers such as Jose Antonio Zuluaga, Silvio Rodriguez, and Mercedes Sosa. These artists' music is rooted in folk traditions from their respective countries, with a strong influence of traditional Spanish rhythms. Other Latin American composers that might be of interest include Juan Gabriel, Armando Manzanero, and Jo
 +  listening to music by other Peruvian musicians and composers such as Susana Baca, Eva Ayllón, Gammy Y Los Vecinos, and Nicola Cruz. These artists draw on Peruvian folkloric music traditions, incorporating Andean melodies and rhythms and modern electronic beats to create a unique sound. Other Latin American genres such as cumb
 +  music by other Latin American composers such as Heitor Villa-Lobos, Antonio Carlos Jobim, Joaquín Rodrigo, and Astor Piazzolla. These composers have created some of the most beloved Latin American musical works and styles. Other Latin American musicians to explore include Mercedes Sosa, Celia Cruz, Silvio Rod


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Caro Emerald also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Natalia Lafourcade, Pink Martini, Jamie Cullum, Esperanza Spalding, Pharrell Williams, Norah Jones, Gotan Project, Stacey Kent, Melody Gardot, Martha Wainwright.
 +  listening to other jazz singers and bands such as Jamie Cullum, Stacey Kent, Melody Gardot, Norah Jones, and Diana Krall. They may also enjoy listening to classic jazz and swing artists like Cole Porter, Louis Armstrong, Ella Fitzgerald and Duke Ellington. Additionally, they may be interested in other genres of music including soul
 +  listening to similar artists such as Joss Stone, Sharon Jones & The Dap-Kings, Anouk, and Melody Gardot.
 +  listening to music by:

-Jazzanova
-Stacey Kent
-Jamie Cullum
-Nouvelle Vague 
-Hooverphonic 
-The Herbaliser 
-Parov Stelar 
-Zero 7 
-Nickodemus
 +  listening to music by:

-Kovacs 
-Parov Stelar 
-Chet Faker 
-Klyne 
-Randy Crawford 
-Hollie Cook 
-Jamiroquai
-Sons of Maria 
-Tuxedo 
-Gecko


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cavetown also would enjoy
 +  music by Rex Orange County. Both artists write honest, introspective songs that chronicle the highs and lows of young adulthood. Furthermore, they both make use of heartfelt lyricism, acoustic instrumentation, and a unique vocal style to create an emotional atmosphere in their music. Fans of either artist would likely enjoy the other's work.
 +  listening to artists such as:

-Billie Eilish 
-Rex Orange County 
-Oscar Lang 
-Phoebe Bridgers 
-Khai Dreams 
-Nina Nesbitt 
-Declan McKenna 
-Ben Platt 
-Conan Gray 
-
 +  music by

Hozier, Clairo, Billie Eilish, Rex Orange County, Phoebe Bridgers, The Japanese House, Beabadoobee, and Florence + the Machine.
 +  music by

other Indie Pop/Rock/Folk artists such as Ben Folds, Bon Iver, Sufjan Stevens, Phoebe Bridgers, Father John Misty, The Lumineers, Local Natives, Vitamin String Quartet, and Death Cab for Cutie.
 +  music by which of the following artists

-Jeremy Zucker
-Owen Rabbit
-Maximo The Moon
-Rex Orange County 
-beabadoobee


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Celestial Aeon Project also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

1. Aes Dana
2. Solar Fields
3. H.U.V.A Network
4. Bluetech
5. Carbon Based Lifeforms
6. Celldweller
7. Omegahertz
8. Tangerine Dream
9. Ishq
10. Zero
 +  listening to music by

Carbon Based Lifeforms, Cydelix, Solar Fields, Lab's Cloud, and Atrium Carceri.
 +  listening to other new age artists like Enya, Kitaro, Vangelis, and Yanni.
 +  music by other new age musicians such as Enya, Kitaro, Yanni, and Secret Garden. Other similar genres to explore include ambient, chill out and instrumental music.
 +  listening to other electronic music such as Kors K, Vektroid, Madeon, and Kygo. These artists create music that is similar in sound and structure to Celestial Aeon Project's work. They create a mix of ambient, synthwave, and techno that is sure to please any fan of electronic music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Celtic Woman also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Corrs, Clannad, The Chieftains, Enya, Lisa Hannigan, Iona, Altan, Sinead O'Connor, Mary Black, and Lúnasa.
 +  music by:

-The Chieftains 
-The Pogues 
-The Corrs 
-Loreena McKennitt 
-Enya 
-Altan 
-Solas 
-The Dubliners 
-Clannad 
-Mary Black
 +  the music of Enya
 +  listening to

The Corrs, The Chieftains, Clannad, Enya, Loreena McKennitt, and The Dubliners.
 +  music by

The Chieftains, Clannad, Mark Knopfler, Riverdance, Enya, Loreena McKennitt, The Corrs, Sinead O'Connor, Eva Cassidy, and Irish Rovers.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Chamillionaire also would enjoy
 +  music by other hip hop artists such as Kanye West, J. Cole, Drake, Eminem, Kendrick Lamar, and Jay-Z. Other related genres of music that this person might enjoy include R&B, Trap, Reggaeton, and Pop.
 +  listening to music by Lil Wayne, T.I., 50 Cent, Ludacris, and The Notorious B.I.G.
 +  listening to music by T.I., Lil Wayne, and Ludacris.
 +  listening to music by:

Lil Wayne, T.I., 50 Cent, Drake, Kanye West, Future, Wiz Khalifa, Ty Dolla $ign, Jeremih, Juicy J, and 2 Chainz.
 +  music by Lil Wayne. Both artists are popular hip-hop artists who often rap about similar topics, such as money, fame, and street culture. They both have unique styles and frequently collaborate with other well-known rappers.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Charles Sheeler also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Claude Debussy, Erik Satie, Arnold Schoenberg, Igor Stravinsky, and Béla Bartók.
 +  listening to music by George Gershwin. Both composers wrote music in the early 20th century and draw heavily on popular musical styles of their era, such as jazz and blues. Gershwin is known for his beautiful melodies and lush arrangements, while Sheeler is known for his more experimental, avant-garde approach to
 +  listening to music by

George Gershwin, Leonard Bernstein, Duke Ellington, Aaron Copland, and Henry Cowell.
 +  listening to the music of composers such as George Gershwin, Igor Stravinsky, and Aaron Copland. These three composers also created music in the early 20th century which is similar in style to Sheeler's work. Additionally, modern day artists such as John Adams, Philip Glass, and Michael Torke draw inspiration from
 +  listening to music by

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, Béla Bartók, and Erik Satie.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Charli XCX also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other female singers such as Billie Eilish, Taylor Swift, Ariana Grande, Selena Gomez, Dua Lipa, Halsey, Meghan Trainor, Katy Perry, and Demi Lovato.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Dua Lipa, Troye Sivan, Halsey, Hayley Kiyoko, and Ariana Grande. All of these artists have a similar sound and style to Charli XCX.
 +  listening to other artists such as Ariana Grande, Doja Cat, Halsey, Billie Eilish, Lauv, Troye Sivan, and Clairo.
 +  listening to music by other female pop and electronic artists such as Lorde, Ariana Grande, Lady Gaga, Carly Rae Jepsen, Billie Eilish, Taylor Swift, Halsey, Selena Gomez, and Jessie Ware.
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

Ariana Grande, Billie Eilish, SOPHIE, Kim Petras, Doja Cat, Sky Ferreira, Grimes, Brooke Candy, Tove Lo, Troye Sivan, ALMA and Carly Rae Jepsen.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Chief Keef also would enjoy
 +  listening to other drill and trap music. Artists such as 21 Savage, Desiigner, Migos and Young Thug are similar in style and genre to Chief Keef.
 +  music by 
Lil Uzi Vert, Lil Pump, Young Thug, 21 Savage, Kodak Black, and Juice WRLD.
 +  listening to music by: 

Lil Durk, Young Thug, Future, 21 Savage, Drake, Gucci Mane, Migos, and A$AP Rocky.
 +  music by other hip-hop artists such as Lil Uzi Vert, 21 Savage, Young Thug, Migos, Future, A$AP Rocky, Drake, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by artists such as Future, Young Thug, Migos, Lil Uzi Vert, Kodak Black, 21 Savage, Playboi Carti, and A$AP Rocky.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Chinatsu Kuzuu also would enjoy
 +  music from other Japanese female vocalists such as:

1. Utada Hikaru
2. Ayumi Hamasaki
3. Namie Amuro
4. Kana Nishino
5. Yui
6. Miwa
7. Eir Aoi
8. Gackt
9. Aimer
10.
 +  music by

Miyuki Nakajima, Akiko Yano, Kiroro, and Shoko Nakagawa. All of these artists are from Japan and create music of similar genres, including soft rock, pop, and adult contemporary.
 +  listening to music by Yukari Tamura. Both singers are known for their work in anime, and they have a similar style of singing, with high pitched and sweet-sounding melodies. They both have a large catalog of songs and albums, so fans of Chinatsu Kuzuu can certainly find something to enjoy in the work of Yukari Tamura
 +  listening to music by artists like Yoko Kanno, Yuki Kajiura, Ko Otani, and Jun Maeda. These composers are all well-known for creating intricate, atmospheric soundtracks with a wide range of instruments, textures, and emotions. All four of these composers have composed music for various anime titles, making them
 +  music by similar artists, such as Masayoshi Minoshima, Yuki Kajiura, and KOTOKO. These artists share similar musical styles, such as classical music influences, electronic sounds, melodic vocal lines, and a blend of digital and orchestral elements. Additionally, fans of Chinatsu Kuzuu may also appreciate


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Chuck Berry also would enjoy
 +  music by

Little Richard, Bo Diddley, Fats Domino, Elvis Presley, Jerry Lee Lewis, Buddy Holly, and The Everly Brothers.
 +  listening to music by Elvis Presley. Elvis Presley was heavily influenced by Chuck Berry and often played and covered his songs, so their styles of music are quite similar.
 +  listening to

Little Richard, Bo Diddley, Fats Domino, Elvis Presley, Buddy Holly, Jerry Lee Lewis, and The Beatles.
 +  listening to music by Little Richard, Buddy Holly, Elvis Presley, Jerry Lee Lewis, and Johnny Cash. All of these artists are part of the early days of rock and roll, and all are closely associated with Chuck Berry's style.
 +  music by

Little Richard, Bo Diddley, Jerry Lee Lewis, Fats Domino, and Buddy Holly.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Chuck Ragen also would enjoy
 +  music by other folk-rock and singer-songwriters such as Bruce Springsteen, Bob Dylan, Tom Petty, Neil Young, Ryan Adams, Wilco, and The Decemberists.
 +  listening to music by John Mellencamp, Bruce Springsteen, Tom Petty, and Bob Seger.
 +  listening to music by the band Flogging Molly. Flogging Molly is an Irish-American Celtic punk band from Los Angeles, California, and they are known for their upbeat, energetic style of traditional Irish music. They often draw influence from traditional Irish rebels songs, incorporating elements of punk rock, American folk, and sea shanties into their music.
 +  listening to the music of Billy Bragg, Bruce Springsteen, and Tom Petty. These musicians are all considered to be part of the Americana/Roots Rock genre, which is heavily influenced by Chuck Ragan's work. All of these musicians have a distinct musical style that draws influence from folk, country, blues, and rock and roll,
 +  music by artists like Bruce Springsteen, Tom Petty and The Heartbreakers, John Mellencamp, Bob Dylan, and Billy Joel.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Clairo also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Phoebe Bridgers, Snail Mail, and Soccer Mommy.  These are all indie singer-songwriters who explore similar topics such as love, relationships and self-reflection.
 +  listening to music by

other bedroom pop artists such as Julien Baker, Rex Orange County, Soccer Mommy, and Phoebe Bridgers.
 +  music by artists such as Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, Rex Orange County, Beabadoobee, and Miley Cyrus. These artists have a similar sound and style to Clairo, featuring dreamy and mellow indie pop/rock with introspective lyrics.
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish, Rex Orange County, and King Princess.
 +  music by artists such as Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, Snail Mail, Cavetown, Charly Bliss, and Girlpool.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Clario also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from the following genres:

-Alternative Rock
-Indie Pop
-Ambient
-Chillwave
-Electronic
-Dream Pop
-Shoegaze
-Synthpop
 +  music by:

Bon Iver, Billie Eilish, Blood Orange, The 1975, Daughter, Solange, Glass Animals, Halsey, James Blake, Maggie Rogers, Lorde, Tove Lo.
 +  music by

Aurora, Phoebe Bridgers, Billie Eilish, The Japanese House, Låpsley, Lewis Capaldi, and Dua Lipa.
 +  music by similar artists such as CHVRCHES, Ruelle, Lontalius, Cavetown, and ELIO.
 +  music by:

Sasha Sloan, Elderbrook, Tate McRae, Mallrat, Ruel, Conan Gray, and Gracey.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Claude Monet also would enjoy
 +  the music of other Impressionist composers, such as Erik Satie, Maurice Ravel, and Gabriel Fauré. These composers all wrote in a similar style to Monet, using beautiful melodies, lush harmonies, and gentle rhythms. They also drew inspiration from the works of classical greats like Bach, Beethoven, and
 +  listening to the works of other impressionist artists like Pierre-Auguste Renoir, Paul Cezanne, and Edgar Degas. Other artists with impressionist styles include Berthe Morisot, Alfred Sisley, and Camille Pissarro.
 +  music by Pierre-Auguste Renoir
 +  listening to music by other Impressionist composers including Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, and Claude Debussy. All of these composers incorporated elements of Impressionism into their works, often featuring a dreamy, atmospheric sound.
 +  listening to music by other Impressionist composers such as Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, Camille Saint-Saëns, and Gabriel Fauré. These composers were all influenced by the same artistic movements of the 19th century that Monet was a part of and wrote music inspired by the same subject matter.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cocteau Twins also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by The Cure, Siouxsie and the Banshees, and Dead Can Dance.
 +  listening to music by bands such as Siouxsie and the Banshees, The Cure, My Bloody Valentine, New Order, Slowdive, and The Smiths. These bands all have a similar sound to Cocteau Twins with their dreamy, ethereal textures and atmospheric melodies. They are all pioneers of the alternative rock and indie scenes
 +  listening to music by Siouxsie and the Banshees, Dishwalla, The Cure, and Joy Division.
 +  listening to music by the Cure, Siouxsie and the Banshees, and The Smiths.
 +  music by The Cure, Siouxsie and the Banshees, and My Bloody Valentine.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Conan Gray also would enjoy
 +  music by Billie Eilish, Lauv, and Khalid. These artists are similar in the way they all create heartfelt pop music that blends elements of alternative R&B, bedroom pop, and indie rock.
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish. Both artists are young, talented, and create music that speaks to the experiences of growing up. They both have distinct styles, but they share a lot of common themes in their songs. Songs by both artists often focus on topics such as teenage love, heartbreak, and social issues.
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish, Lauv, and Troye Sivan. All three of these artists produce music that is similar in style and genre to Conan Gray's. They have popular songs with strong lyrics and a focus on the emotion behind each track.
 +  music by Lauv, Jeremy Zucker, Alec Benjamin, and Jon Bellion.
 +  music by Billie Eilish, Lauv, Alec Benjamin, and Shawn Mendes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Creedence Clearwater Revival also would enjoy
 +  music by other popular classic rock bands such as:

-The Rolling Stones 
-The Doors 
-The Who 
-Led Zeppelin 
-Lynyrd Skynyrd 
-The Eagles 
-Van Morrison 
-The Allman Brothers Band 
-Jimi Hendrix 
-
 +  music by other artists from the same era such as Bob Dylan, The Rolling Stones, Led Zeppelin, The Doors, Neil Young, and The Allman Brothers Band.
 +  music by other popular rock bands of the 1960s and 1970s, such as The Beatles, Led Zeppelin, Pink Floyd, The Rolling Stones, The Doors, and Lynyrd Skynyrd.
 +  similar music from artists such as Neil Young, The Band, Bob Dylan, Van Morrison and Tom Petty. These are all artists that have a similar sound to Creedence Clearwater Revival, utilizing elements of rock, blues and country music.
 +  music by The Allman Brothers and Lynyrd Skynyrd. These bands were all part of the Southern Rock scene and share similarities in their sound, such as prominent use of guitar riffs, slide guitar, and harmonized vocals.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cristoph Fringeli also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Autechre, Aphex Twin, and Richie Hawtin.
 +  the music of Aphex Twin, Brian Eno, and Orbital.
 +  music by other ambient and electronica artists like Aphex Twin, Tycho, Biosphere and Autechre.
 +  music by

Aphex Twin, Autechre, Plaid, Four Tet, Clark, and Bicep.
 +  music by

Aphex Twin, Autechre, Boards of Canada, Bvdub, and Brian Eno.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Crystal Castles also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

The Knife, Grimes, Health, Blonde Redhead, Purity Ring, HEALTH, and Chromatics.
 +  listening to music by Grimes, Purity Ring and Chvrches.
 +  listening to music by..
 +  listening to music by

The Knife, Grimes, Health, HEALTH//DISCO, Marilyn Manson, Nine Inch Nails, and Of Montreal.
 +  music by:

1. Grimes 
2. HEALTH 
3. Purity Ring 
4. M83 
5. Animal Collective 
6. The Knife 
7. Fever Ray 
8. Tokimonsta 
9. Kreayshawn 
10. Austra


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cypress Hill also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Beastie Boys, N.W.A., Public Enemy, Run-DMC, Dr. Dre, Snoop Dogg, Eminem, OutKast, Ice Cube, A Tribe Called Quest.
 +  other hip hop artists such as Wu-Tang Clan, A Tribe Called Quest, Outkast, Public Enemy, Run DMC, Nas, The Notorious B.I.G., Dr. Dre, Jay-Z, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by other hip hop artists such as Wu-Tang Clan, Public Enemy, Run-DMC, Nas, Dr. Dre, Jay-Z, Notorious B.I.G., Outkast, A Tribe Called Quest and many more.
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

1. Beastie Boys
2. Run-DMC
3. Public Enemy
4. Ice Cube
5. Dr. Dre
6. Wu-Tang Clan
7. A Tribe Called Quest
8. Snoop Dogg
9. Notorious B.I.G.
 +  music by

Snoop Dogg, Ice Cube, N.W.A., Dr. Dre, Beastie Boys, Run-D.M.C., Wu-Tang Clan, Public Enemy, A Tribe Called Quest, Kendrick Lamar.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Cyriak also would enjoy
 +  listening to a variety of electronic music, including glitch hop, trip hop, and experimental music. Other recommended artists include Amon Tobin, Flying Lotus, Aphex Twin, and Boards of Canada.
 +  music by Aphex Twin. Aphex Twin is an electronic musician and producer who has been active since the late 1980s. His style of music ranges from ambient to experimental and incorporates various genres such as techno, IDM, and industrial.
 +  music by Aphex Twin, Clark, and Squarepusher.
 +  music by Aphex Twin. Aphex Twin is a British electronic music artist who creates a range of electronic music styles including ambient, IDM, and experimental. His music is often described as being abstract and surreal, with a focus on sound design and complexity.
 +  music by Aphex Twin, Squarepusher, and Venetian Snares.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by D.O.E. also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other hip hop artists, such as A$AP Rocky, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Chance the Rapper, and Post Malone.
 + :

• The Notorious B.I.G. 
• 2Pac 
• Nas 
• Jay-Z 
• Eminem 
• Wu-Tang Clan 
• Dr. Dre 
• Big Daddy Kane 
• Ice Cube 
• Mobb Deep 
• A Tribe Called Quest 
 +  music from artists like Pop Smoke, A Boogie Wit Da Hoodie, and Tory Lanez. These artists have a similar sound to D.O.E., combining elements of trap, hip hop, and R&B genres.
 +  music by other hip hop and rap artists like Drake, Future, Lil Uzi Vert, and Cardi B.
 +  music by Kendrick Lamar, J. Cole and Drake. These three hip-hop artists are all similar to D.O.E. in that they create music with intelligent lyrics and intricate beats. They often collaborate with each other and often rap about social issues such as race, poverty, politics and relationships.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by DaisyBitch Brigade also would enjoy
 +  music by 

The Julie Ruin, Sleater-Kinney, Bikini Kill, Joanna Gruesome, and Tacocat.
 +  music by

Lil Mosey, Trippie Redd, Juice WRLD, YoungBoy Never Broke Again, YNW Melly, Ski Mask the Slump God, DaBaby, and Lizzo.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Charli XCX, Rico Nasty, Doja Cat, Brooke Candy, and Kero Kero Bonito. These are all female artists who make hip-hop and alternative-pop music that’s heavy on female empowerment and self-expression.
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Brooke Candy, Princess Nokia, Rico Nasty, Noname, CupcakKe, Saweetie, Kamaiyah, and Doja Cat. These artists all have a similar sound and lyrical content to DaisyBitch Brigade and explore similar topics with their music.
 +  music by:

Bikini Kill, Sleater-Kinney, The Julie Ruin, Bratmobile, The Need, Le Tigre, L7, Kim Gordon, Huggy Bear and Hole.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dan Flavin also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from other minimalist composers such as Steve Reich, Terry Riley, and Philip Glass. All of these composers have created music that is rooted in minimalism and is often repetitive and based on simple harmonic structures.
 +  the work of which other artist?

Ans: Other artists whose work a person who listens to music by Dan Flavin might enjoy include Minimalist composers such as Steve Reich and Philip Glass, as well as contemporary abstract painters such as Mark Rothko and Barnett Newman.
 +  listening to minimalist music, electronic music, and experimental sound art.
 +  music by

Minimalist composers such as Steve Reich, Philip Glass, Terry Riley, La Monte Young, and John Cage.
 + 

other minimalist artists, including Robert Morris, Donald Judd, John McCracken, Sol LeWitt, Richard Serra, and Agnes Martin. They may also enjoy the work of other minimalists from different fields such as visual art, architecture, fashion, and music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Daniel Caesar also would enjoy
 +  to listen to SZA, H.E.R, Sabrina Claudio, and Noname.
 +  music by:

1. H.E.R
 +  listening to music by 

Frank Ocean, H.E.R., James Blake, Ari Lennox, Syd, and Jorja Smith.
 +  similar artists such as Jessie Reyez, Sabrina Claudio, H.E.R., and Kehlani. All of these artists have a similar style of R&B music that combines elements of soul, pop and jazz.
 +  music by

Alicia Keys, Snoh Aalegra, Jorja Smith, Kaytranada, H.E.R., SZA, and Khalid.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Danielle Dax also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

1. The Pixies
2. Sonic Youth
3. Devo
4. Throwing Muses
5. Cocteau Twins
6. Bauhaus
7. Robyn Hitchcock and the Egyptians
8. Lush
9. Siouxsie and the Banshees
 +  music by other experimental performers such as Laurie Anderson, Throbbing Gristle, Coil, and Cabaret Voltaire. These artists were contemporaries of Danielle Dax and share a similar experimental and often dark sound. They all explore electronic music, industrial music, avant-garde music, and other sonic experimentation, making them great choices for fans
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Siouxsie and the Banshees, Blondie, The Cure, Bauhaus, Joy Division, New Order, The Smiths, and Depeche Mode. These bands have a similar sound to Danielle Dax's music and often feature dark, post-punk inspired sounds.
 +  listening to music by other alternative rock musicians, such as Bauhaus, Siouxsie and the Banshees, The Cure, Joy Division, Cocteau Twins, Echo and The Bunnymen, Jesus and Mary Chain, and The Smiths. These bands were all active in the 1980s and are considered influential in the development of alternative rock
 +  listening to music by

Siouxsie and the Banshees, The Cure, Joy Division, Talking Heads, and Bauhaus.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Danny Gonzalez also would enjoy
 +  the music of

Lil Nas X, Doja Cat, Taylor Swift, Ariana Grande, Billie Eilish, Khalid, Megan Thee Stallion, Post Malone, Travis Scott, and Drake.
 +  listening to music by other YouTubers such as Jaiden Animations, Domics, and TimTom. Other artists that have similar styles and topics include artists like My Chemical Romance, Fall Out Boy, Panic! At The Disco, and Twenty One Pilots.
 +  music by

Logan Paul, Rudy Mancuso, and Jeff Wittek.
 +  listening to music by 
Andrew Huang, Jaiden Animations, and Boyinaband.
 +  music by Donte Colley. Donte Colley is an artist and musician who is often compared to Danny Gonzalez in terms of their comedic, witty style of rap music. Donte Colley's music is full of clever wordplay and hilarious punchlines. He often uses popular culture and everyday situations as comic material in his songs, making them rel


Prompt: A person who listens to music by David Bowie also would enjoy
 +  music by other artists such as Jimi Hendrix, Prince, The Beatles, Lou Reed, Iggy Pop, and Queen.
 +  listening to music by 

Kraftwerk, Lou Reed, Iggy Pop, Prince, Brian Eno, and T. Rex.
 +  listening to music by Prince. Prince and Bowie were both highly influential in the world of pop music, and their styles are similar in many ways. Both musicians were known for their unique sound and innovative approaches to creating music. While Bowie was more experimental and eclectic in his approach to music, Prince was renowned for his funk-driven groove and expansive vocal range
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Queen, Lou Reed, Elton John, Iggy Pop, Talking Heads, and The Velvet Underground.
 +  listening to music by Prince. Prince was a contemporary of Bowie and both artists have been cited as influences on each other. Both artists had lasting influence in the music industry, with their boundary-pushing musical styles. Prince was known for his funk-inspired style and Bowie for his glam rock and art rock sounds.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by David Smith also would enjoy
 +  music by other singer-songwriters such as John Mayer, Jason Mraz, Jack Johnson, and Ed Sheeran. These artists create soulful and melodic music that can be both reflective and uplifting, just like Smith's.
 +  music by:

John Mayer, Adele, Ed Sheeran, Coldplay, Sam Smith, James Bay, Bruno Mars, Alicia Keys, Maroon 5, Beyonce.
 +  listening to music by

Bruce Springsteen, John Mayer, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers, Eric Clapton, Stevie Wonder, Aretha Franklin, Sting, Phil Collins, Elton John, and Van Morrison.
 +  music by

other classical music composers such as Beethoven, Bach, Mozart, Haydn, and Handel.
 +  music by

Miles Davis, John Coltrane, Herbie Hancock, Wayne Shorter, and Charles Mingus.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Derek Fiechter and Brandon Fiechter also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Hans Zimmer and John Williams. Hans Zimmer and John Williams are two of the most celebrated film composers in history, and their music is often compared to the work of Derek and Brandon Fiechter. The music of all four composers could be described as classical-style orchestral music, with grandiose arrangements and
 +  music by Lindsey Stirling. Lindsey Stirling is a classically trained violinist who performs with a unique combination of classical and electronic dance music. She often incorporates elements of dubstep and hip hop into her performances, making for a truly unique listening experience.
 +  instrumental music by other New Age composers such as Yanni, Vangelis and Kitaro. Other instrumentalists to explore may include Enya, George Winston, David Arkenstone and Tom Barabas. 

In addition, fans of Derek and Brandon Fiechter may enjoy film scores composed by John Williams, Hans Zimmer
 +  music from other classical composers such as Beethoven, Mozart, Bach, Chopin, and Vivaldi. These composers are known for their beautiful and timeless compositions which have inspired many musicians over the centuries. Other modern classical composers such as Yanni, John Williams, and Ennio Morricone are also popular amongst fans of
 +  similar music from artists like Lindsey Stirling, Two Steps From Hell, and Audiomachine. These artists create cinematic, epic, and powerful instrumental music that is inspired by the Fiechters' work.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dif Juz also would enjoy
 +  listening to

Cocteau Twins, This Mortal Coil, Talk Talk, and The Blue Nile.
 +  listening to music by The Durutti Column. The Durutti Column is a band from Manchester, England, that was formed in 1978 and is known for its experimental post-punk sound. It combines elements of jazz, funk, and dub with improvisation and electronic production. The band has released several studio albums over the years, including Vini
 +  listening to

Other post-punk and art rock bands from the 1980s, such as Echo & The Bunnymen, The Chameleons, Bauhaus, Killing Joke, Siouxsie and the Banshees, Joy Division, Ultravox, or Wire.
 +  listening to

-Cocteau Twins
-This Mortal Coil
-Slowdive
-Pale Saints
-The Wolfgang Press
-His Name Is Alive
-Discordance Axis
 +  listening to music by

Cocteau Twins, Talk Talk, This Mortal Coil, Modern English, and Clan of Xymox.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dodie also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Lily Allen, Aurora, Lucy Spraggan, The Japanese House, Ben Platt, Phoebe Bridgers, Jake Bugg, Maggie Rogers, Seafret, HAIM.
 +  the music of Soccer Mommy, Phoebe Bridgers and Julien Baker. All three artists are known for their introspective and thoughtful songwriting, often exploring themes such as love, heartbreak, hope, and resilience. The music of these artists is often considered to be indie-folk or indie-rock in genre, though all three also
 +  listening to music by:

Hozier, Billie Eilish, Taylor Swift, Maggie Rogers, Imogen Heap, Ruel, Julia Michaels, Lauv, Khalid, Phoebe Bridgers.
 +  music by the following artists:

-Aurora
-Lucy Spraggan
-Bastille
-Troye Sivan
-Hayley Kiyoko
-Lewis Capaldi
-Lauv
-Ben Platt
-Maggie Rogers
-Jon Bellion
 +  music by

Phoebe Bridgers, Alex Lahey, Julia Jacklin, Beabadoobee, Hop Along, Soccer Mommy, Say Sue Me, The Japanese House, Bon Iver, and Miya Folick.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Donald Judd also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Steve Reich. Steve Reich is an American composer and musical pioneer, who is widely credited as one of the originators of minimalism. He has composed a wide variety of works for various media, including pieces for strings, voices, percussion, and more. His work often features complex, repeating patterns that gradually evolve with subtle changes in
 +  music by

John Cage, Steve Reich, and Philip Glass. These three composers are often referred to as the "Holy Trinity" of Minimalism, the genre to which Donald Judd belongs. All three of these composers are known for their minimalistic approach to music, making use of repetition and simple, often hypnotic patterns to create
 +  music by

John Cage, Philip Glass, Steve Reich, Morton Feldman, and Arvo Pärt.
 +  listening to music by other minimalist composers such as John Cage, Philip Glass, Steve Reich, and Terry Riley. All of these composers created works that have minimalistic qualities, often using repetition and simple harmonic structures. Additionally, some of these composers have even collaborated with one another to create some of their greatest works.
 +  listening to music by:

Brian Eno, Aphex Twin, Autechre, Steve Reich, Philip Glass, Morton Feldman, John Cage, Terry Riley, Karlheinz Stockhausen.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Donatachi also would enjoy
 +  music from the band Twenty-One Pilots. Both Donatachi and Twenty-One Pilots have a distinct alternative rock sound with elements of hip-hop, pop and electronic music. Both artists have catchy beats, interesting lyrics and an overall lighthearted feel to their music.
 +  other types of music, such as hip-hop, EDM, jazz, and pop. Fans of Donatachi would likely enjoy the unique and creative approach to music that he takes, which combines elements from various genres and styles. They might also appreciate his experimental soundscapes and eclectic choice of instrumentation.
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish and Lil Nas X. Both artists have a unique sound that draws influence from various genres such as hip hop, pop, and R&B. They both have a distinct sound that has gained them popularity among listeners of all ages.
 +  listening to:

-Kendrick Lamar 
-Kanye West 
-Drake 
-Childish Gambino 
-Chance the Rapper 
-J. Cole 
-Lil Wayne 
-Tame Impala 
-Frank Ocean 
-Tyler, The Creator
 +  listening to music by artists like Cardi B, DaBaby, and Post Malone. These artists are all part of the contemporary hip-hop/rap genre that has taken over the music industry in recent years. All three of these artists have released chart-topping hits that have quickly become some of the most popular songs on streaming services like Spotify and


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dorian Electra also would enjoy
 +  listening to the music by artists such as Allie X, Lady Gaga, Kim Petras, SOPHIE, Charli XCX, and A.G. Cook. These artists have a similar blend of pop and alternative sounds that are often futuristic and experimental like Dorian Electra's music.
 +  listening to music by

SOPHIE, LE1F, Charli XCX, Dorian Electra has been described as a post-modern pop artist, combining elements of hip hop, electronic, and experimental music. Fans of Dorian Electra's sound would likely enjoy the similar sounds of other artists such as: SOP
 +  music by 

Aesop Rock, Lil Uzi Vert, Mykki Blanco, Die Antwoord, Killer Mike, Yung Lean, clipping., Le1f, Peaches, Big Freedia.
 +  music by other artists such as Perfume Genius, SOPHIE, Sauna, HANA, Big Freedia, and LE1F.
 +  listening to 

The Marias, Poppy, 100 gecs, Charli XCX, Slayyyter, Tommy Genesis, and Kero Kero Bonito.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dr. Dre also would enjoy
 +  listening to Tupac Shakur. Both Dr. Dre and Tupac were two of the most influential figures in West Coast hip-hop, and their work is often considered to be the foundation of the genre. Their music often focuses on topics such as social injustice, police brutality, and gang violence, making it relevant to many listeners today.
 +  listening to music by Tupac. Tupac was a close friend of Dr. Dre's and both rappers had a significant influence on the West Coast hip hop scene in the 1990s. Both rappers had similar rap styles, and were highly respected in the hip hop community. As such, fans of Dr. Dre's music will likely enjoy listening to Tup
 +  music by Eminem
 +  listening to music by Snoop Dogg, Eminem, Kendrick Lamar, and 50 Cent.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Eminem, Snoop Dogg, Kendrick Lamar, The Game, 50 Cent, and Tupac. All of these artists are associated with Dr. Dre and have been featured on some of his albums or songs.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Drake also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Jay-Z, Lil Wayne, Nicki Minaj, Future, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by Kendrick Lamar and Kanye West. Both of these rappers have a similar style to Drake, with catchy and hard-hitting beats. They both explore many different themes in their music, such as love, relationships, and social issues. In addition, Kendrick Lamar and Kanye West are two of the most influential and successful hip-hop artists of the last
 +  music by Kendrick Lamar, Kanye West, J. Cole, and Big Sean
 +  listening to music by Kendrick Lamar, The Weeknd, Chance the Rapper, and Post Malone.
 +  music by Kendrick Lamar. This is because both artists have a similar sound and style of rap, both utilizing complex rhyme patterns and hard-hitting beats. Additionally, they often collaborate with one another and have a mutual respect for each other's work. As such, many of the same qualities can be found in the music they make together and individually.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dream also would enjoy
 +  music by

Avicii, Skrillex, Daft Punk, Calvin Harris, Zedd, Kygo, Marshmello, Martin Garrix, The Chainsmokers, Kaskade.
 +  music by the following artists:

1. Ariana Grande
2. Taylor Swift
3. Maroon 5
4. P!nk
5. Lady Gaga
6. Katy Perry
7. Justin Bieber
8. Ed Sheeran
9. Adele
10. Rihanna
 +  music by

Paramore, All Time Low, Fall Out Boy, PVRIS, Halestorm, The Pretty Reckless, New Found Glory, and Weezer.
 +  music by

Ariana Grande, Demi Lovato, Justin Bieber, Maroon 5, Taylor Swift, Selena Gomez, Rihanna, Katy Perry, Lady Gaga, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by

Maroon 5, Panic! at the Disco, OneRepublic, Taylor Swift, Justin Bieber and Ed Sheeran.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Dusty Springfield also would enjoy
 +  music by other classic female singers such as Aretha Franklin, Carole King, Patti LaBelle, and Dionne Warwick. All of these singers have achieved a great deal of success with their music and are celebrated for their powerful voices and ability to convey emotion through song.
 +  listening to music by other British female singers from the 1960s, such as Petula Clark, Cilla Black, Lulu, Sandie Shaw, and Marianne Faithfull.
 +  other classic British performers such as Petula Clark, Tom Jones, and Cliff Richard. They may also enjoy other female singers from the same era such as Cilla Black, Lulu and Marianne Faithfull.
 +  music by

Carole King, Aretha Franklin, Dionne Warwick, The Shangri-Las, Nancy Sinatra, and Jackie DeShannon.
 +  music by 

The Supremes, Dionne Warwick, Aretha Franklin, The Temptations, Petula Clark, Martha and the Vandellas, and The Four Tops.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Earl Moran also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

other jazz and blues musicians from the 1920s-1940s such as Louis Armstrong, Duke Ellington, Ella Fitzgerald, Bessie Smith, Billie Holiday, and Count Basie.
 +  music by

Bob Wills, Merle Haggard, Hank Williams Sr., Patsy Cline, Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, and Willie Nelson.
 +  music by

other jazz and blues artists such as Louis Armstrong, Ella Fitzgerald, Billie Holiday, Duke Ellington, Benny Goodman, and Count Basie.
 +  listening to music by:

Johnny Cash, Willie Nelson, Patsy Cline, Hank Williams, Bob Wills, Merle Haggard, George Jones, Buck Owens, Loretta Lynn, Jimmie Rodgers.
 +  listening to music by

other jazz, blues, and swing musicians such as Louis Armstrong, Fats Waller, Cab Calloway, Duke Ellington, Count Basie, Billie Holiday, Ella Fitzgerald, and Bessie Smith.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Earthbound OST also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from the albums of other video game soundtracks, such as those from the Final Fantasy series, The Legend of Zelda series, and the Super Mario series. They may also enjoy listening to music from popular game composers like Nobuo Uematsu, Koji Kondo, and Yoko Shimomura.
 +  the music of

the Undertale soundtrack and the Mother 3 soundtrack. They may also enjoy music from other games in the same series, such as Mother 1, Mother 2, and Super Smash Bros. Brawl. Other similar game soundtracks they may enjoy include Chrono Trigger, Final Fantasy VI, Mega Man X, and Sonic the Hedgehog.
 +  music by

Undertale, Yume Nikki, The World Ends with You, Hyper Light Drifter, and Shovel Knight.
 +  listening to music by Undertale OST, as both are produced by Toby Fox.  Both soundtracks have a similar style of chiptune music and feature themes that suit their respective games. Both soundtracks were composed for RPGs and feature upbeat and nostalgic tunes that evoke the atmosphere of the games. The two soundtracks also share a mix of emotions
 +  music by:

Undertale OST, The Legend of Zelda OST, Final Fantasy OST, Chrono Trigger OST, Super Mario RPG OST, Kingdom Hearts OST, Castlevania OST.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Eastern Mind OST also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from

other video games such as Final Fantasy, Chrono Trigger, Xenogears, and The Legend of Zelda.
 + :

-Sigur Ros
-Explosions in the Sky
-Godspeed You! Black Emperor
-The Album Leaf
-Mogwai
-Labradford 
-Yann Tiersen 
-Baths 
-65daysofstatic 
-Four Tet 
-Brian
 +  listening to

other electronic music such as Future Bass, Synthwave, and Chiptune. They might also enjoy listening to game soundtracks from other genres, such as RPGs and action-adventure games. Additionally, they may also find some ambient and atmospheric music enjoyable.
 +  other music from the same genre, such as Kitaro, Ryuichi Sakamoto, Joe Hisaishi, and Yoko Kanno. Other electronic and ambient music from various other artists would also likely be enjoyed by someone who appreciates Eastern Mind OST. Examples of this type of music include Aphex Twin, Enigma, Jean Michel
 +  listening to other music by the same artist such as his album "Emerald Tablet" and other albums including "Ascension" and "The Sound of Innocence". Additionally, they may also enjoy listening to other ambient, electronic, and new age composers such as Steve Roach, Robert Rich, and Brian Eno.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Echobelly also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by band such as Elastica, Sleeper, Lush, The Cranberries, Garbage, Blur, and All Saints.
 +  listening to music by Elastica, as both bands are from the same genre of alternative rock. Both bands are known for their unique sound, incorporating elements from punk rock and Britpop.
 +  listening to music by Blur, Elastica, Suede, and Pulp.
 +  bands like Elastica, Lush, Salad, and Sleeper. These bands all have a similar sound to Echobelly and have a blend of rock, pop, and alternative music.
 +  listening to music by

Elastica, Sleeper, Lush, Blur, Saint Etienne, Kenickie, Salad, and Cardiacs.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Eden also would enjoy
 +  music by

The Chainsmokers, Twenty One Pilots, Coldplay, Halsey, Ellie Goulding, Dua Lipa, Marshmello, and Kygo.
 +  listening to music by: 

James Blake, Banks, Lorde, SOHN, Glass Animals, Imogen Heap, Halsey, Alt-J, The xx, and Honor.
 +  music from artists like:

-Banks 
-The Chainsmokers 
-Kesha 
-Kygo 
-Beyonce 
-Marian Hill 
-Calvin Harris 
-HAIM 
-Rihanna 
-Avicii
 +  music by:

1. Hozier
2. Kaleo
3. Lorde
4. The Lumineers
5. James Bay
6. Flume
7. Ruel
8. Banks
9. MØ 
10. Sylvan Esso
 +  listening to music by artists such as:

-The Chainsmokers 
-Flume 
-Galantis 
-Louis The Child 
-Lauv 
-Zedd 
-Martin Garrix 
-Gryffin 
-Illenium 
-Marshmello


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Edvard Munch also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other Scandinavian composers such as Jean Sibelius, Carl Nielsen, Grieg, and Per Nørgård. Additionally, they may enjoy listening to other composers from the Romantic era such as Beethoven, Brahms, Schubert, and Chopin.
 +  listening to the works of other modern composers such as Claude Debussy, Igor Stravinsky, and Arnold Schoenberg. All three of these composers have pieces that explore similar themes and evocative soundscapes as Edvard Munch's music. In particular, Debussy's "Reverie" and Stravinsky's "The
 +  music by other romantic era composers, such as Johannes Brahms, Franz Schubert, Robert Schumann, and Felix Mendelssohn. These composers wrote music in a similar style to Munch, with lush harmonies and emotional melodies that evoke strong feelings of nostalgia and longing. Other Romantic era composers include Hector Berlioz,
 +  listening to music by other Norwegian composers, such as Grieg and Sinding. Other Scandinavian composers, such as Sibelius, also may be enjoyable for someone who likes Edvard Munch's music. Additionally, some of the works of Debussy, Ravel, and Strauss might be of interest.
 +  the music of Frédéric Chopin. Chopin is a romantic composer whose works often have a dreamy, lyrical quality that are similar to those of Edvard Munch. Both composers have been known to use musical elements to evoke a range of emotions, from joy to sorrow. As a result, people who enjoy Munch


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Edward Gorey also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Voltaire, The Dresden Dolls, and Tim Burton.
 + 

other darkly humorous or offbeat music, such as Tom Waits, The Tiger Lillies, Dresden Dolls, They Might Be Giants, and The Decemberists.
 +  the work of other artists such as Tim Burton, Roald Dahl, Neil Gaiman, and Lemony Snicket. All of these artists have a darkly whimsical style that is similar to Edward Gorey's work. Additionally, fans of Edward Gorey's work may enjoy the works of artists such as Maurice Sendak, Dr. Seuss
 +  literature written by Edward Gorey. Gorey wrote works of fiction, poetry and drama, as well as illustrated books such as The Gashlycrumb Tinies and The Insect God. His work often combined elements of the macabre with dark humor, creating a unique and entertaining combination of horror, fantasy and comedy. Fans of his music may appreciate
 +  music by:

Tom Waits, Nick Cave, Leonard Cohen, David Bowie, PJ Harvey, The Decemberists, Vampire Weekend, and Neutral Milk Hotel.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Edwin Georgi also would enjoy
 +  music by other artists that are similar in sound, such as Tom Waits, Leonard Cohen, Ry Cooder, and Nick Cave. Other contemporary singers who have a similar sound to Edwin Georgi include Father John Misty, Ben Howard, and Bon Iver.
 +  music by

Sam Cooke, Otis Redding, Aretha Franklin, Ray Charles, Marvin Gaye, Stax Records artists and other classic soul and R&B performers of the 1950s-1970s.
 +  music by

Ludwig van Beethoven, Johannes Brahms, Felix Mendelssohn, Franz Schubert, Antonin Dvořák, and George Gershwin.
 +  music by 
Billie Holiday, Ella Fitzgerald, Louis Armstrong, Ray Charles, and Duke Ellington. These artists were all influential in the jazz scene during the mid-20th century, when Edwin Georgi was most active. All of these artists have a sound that is rooted in jazz, but their styles range from swing to blues
 +  music by

other 20th century composers such as Arnold Schoenberg, Igor Stravinsky, Sergei Prokofiev, Béla Bartók, and Carl Orff.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by El Greco also would enjoy
 +  listening to Pedro Infante, Vicente Fernandez, and Juan Gabriel.
 +  listening to music by

Greece's other prominent composers, such as Mikis Theodorakis and Manos Hadjidakis. Both of these composers are well-known for their use of traditional Greek musical elements combined with modern musical styles. They have contributed greatly to the evolution of music in Greece, and they both have a
 +  music by other composers such as Claude Debussy, Johannes Brahms, Antonio Vivaldi, Johann Sebastian Bach, Ludwig van Beethoven, Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, and George Frideric Handel. These composers span a variety of musical styles and genres, offering listeners the opportunity to explore a range of sounds. El Greco
 +  music by other Spanish composers like Joaquín Rodrigo and Fernando Sor. In addition, they may also enjoy the music of Latin American composers like Heitor Villa-Lobos and Astor Piazzolla.
 +  music by

other classical composers such as Bach, Mozart, Beethoven, Vivaldi, Handel, Debussy, Ravel and Tchaikovsky.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Elastica also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

The Breeders, Blur, Lush, Pavement, Sleater-Kinney.
 +  listening to music by Blur and Sleeper. Both bands were part of the Britpop movement and featured a similar indie rock sound. Blur's biggest hits include "Song 2", "Girls & Boys" and "Country House". Sleeper's notable songs include "Inbetweener", "What Do I Do Now?" and "Statues
 +  listening to music by Blur. Both bands are considered part of the Britpop movement and incorporate a range of genres, including punk, indie rock, and alternative rock. They have both had successful albums in the UK, with Elastica's debut self-titled album reaching number one on the UK Albums Chart in 1995 and Blur's sixth
 +  hearing music by Blur. Blur was a British rock band that emerged in the early 1990s and enjoyed considerable success, with hits like "Song 2," "Parklife," and "Country House." Elastica was also a British alternative rock band of the same era, known for their hit single "Connection" and their cover of The Strang
 +  listening to music by Blur and The Cranberries, as these bands are similar in style and sound to Elastica. Other similar bands include Sleeper, Garbage, and Lush.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Electro Swing Circus also would enjoy
 +  music by

Caravan Palace, Parov Stelar, and Alice Francis.
 +  listening to

- Swing Revival
- Electro Swing
- Vintage Remix music
- Gypsy Jazz
- Ragtime
 +  listening to

Vintage Remix, Gypsy Jazz, Electro-Swing, Balkan Beats, Big Band Swing, Hot Jazz, Disco House, and French House.
 +  listening to music by

Swing Republic, Parov Stelar, Caravan Palace, and Bart & Barker.
 +  listening to:

1. Big Band Swing
2. Gypsy Jazz
3. Electro-Swing Remixes
4. Vintage Hip Hop
5. Swing House
6. Classic Jazz
7. Dubstep Ragtime
8. Balkan Brass Music
9. Latin Grooves
10. Breakbeat Paradiddles


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Elie Nadelman also would enjoy
 +  music from composers such as Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, and Sergei Prokofiev. Elie Nadelman was a Polish-American composer and conductor whose music is characterized by its neoclassical style, often incorporating elements of folk music. Other composers with similar approaches to music include George Gershwin and Aaron
 +  music by

Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, Paul Hindemith, George Gershwin, Darius Milhaud, Bela Bartok, and Aaron Copland.
 +  listening to music by

George Gershwin, Aaron Copland, and Igor Stravinsky. All three of these composers were contemporaries of Elie Nadelman and are considered part of the same era of classical music. Each composer brought a unique style to their works and could be said to have influenced one another in some way.
 +  listening to music by

George Gershwin, Aaron Copland, Igor Stravinsky, and Paul Schoenfield.
 +  listening to music by

Marcel Duchamp, Wassily Kandinsky, and Francis Picabia.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ella Fitzgerald also would enjoy
 +  listening to

Louis Armstrong, Dinah Washington, Billie Holiday, Sarah Vaughan, and Nat King Cole.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Sarah Vaughan, Louis Armstrong, Nat King Cole, and Billie Holiday. All of these artists were part of the same jazz movement as Ella Fitzgerald and share similar musical styles.
 +  listening to music by

Billie Holiday, Sarah Vaughan, Louis Armstrong, Nat King Cole, and Duke Ellington.
 +  listening to music from Billie Holiday, Louis Armstrong, Sarah Vaughan, and Nat King Cole.
 +  listening to music by

Billie Holiday, Sarah Vaughan, Louis Armstrong, Nat King Cole, and Duke Ellington.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ellsworth Kelly also would enjoy
 +  the music of

Philip Glass, John Cage, Steve Reich, Morton Feldman, Karlheinz Stockhausen, Olivier Messiaen, Arvo Pärt, and Brian Eno.
 +  the work of other abstract artists. Artists who work in a similar style to Ellsworth Kelly include Mark Rothko, Jackson Pollock, and Willem de Kooning.
 +  listening to music by other minimalists composers such as Philip Glass, Steve Reich, John Adams, Arvo Pärt, Terry Riley, La Monte Young, and Morton Feldman. These composers share many of the same aesthetic values that Kelly did in his work, such as an emphasis on simplicity and repetition. Additionally, they often draw inspiration from
 +  the music of other minimalist composers such as John Cage, Steve Reich, and Philip Glass. Ellsworth Kelly was a pioneer in the minimalist movement, so his music is often compared to that of other minimalist composers. These composers all draw influence from various genres such as jazz, classical, and world music, so someone who enjoys Ellsworth Kelly
 +  listening to music from other minimalists, such as Steve Reich, Philip Glass, John Adams, Terry Riley, and La Monte Young. These composers are all pioneers of minimalist music, which is characterized by its emphasis on repetition, rhythm, and textural layering. Through their compositions, these composers explore the potential for music to create a hypnot


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Elton John also would enjoy
 +  music by Billy Joel, Queen, and the Beatles.
 +  listening to music by Billy Joel. Both Elton John and Billy Joel are well-known and prolific musicians who have been active in the music industry since the 1970s. They both perform a blend of rock, pop, and soft rock styles and tend to cover similar topics such as love, relationships, nostalgia and longing in their songs.
 +  listening to music by Billy Joel. Both artists are piano-playing singer-songwriters who share a similar style and sound.
 +  the music of Billy Joel. Both artists are pianists who specialize in a classic piano-rock style, which has been described as “piano-driven pop-rock.” They both have an extensive catalog of hits and have collaborated on several songs over the years, making them a great match for fans of Elton John's music.
 +  listening to Billy Joel, Stevie Wonder, and Phil Collins.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Elvis Depressedly also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by bands such as American Football, Modest Mouse, Brand New, Death Cab for Cutie, The Appleseed Cast, and Bright Eyes.
 +  music by other indie artists, such as Iron & Wine, Neutral Milk Hotel, The Microphones, and Beach House. These bands have a melancholic sound that is similar to Elvis Depressedly's music. Other related artists include Sun Kil Moon, Phoebe Bridgers, Slowdive, and Mount Eerie.
 +  listening to bands such as The National, Sufjan Stevens, Bon Iver, Phoebe Bridgers, Mitski, Daughter, and Sharon Van Etten. These artists also create music with introspective lyrics and emotive soundscapes.
 +  listening to music by Alex G, Foxing, Julien Baker, Hop Along, and LVL UP.
 +  music by bands such as American Football, mewithoutYou, Tigers Jaw, Car Seat Headrest, and The Hotelier. These bands share a similar sound and themes that are common within the emo and indie rock genres.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Elvis Presley also would enjoy
 +  music by Buddy Holly, The Beatles, Roy Orbison, and Chuck Berry.
 +  music by other artists from the 1950s and 1960s, such as Chuck Berry, Little Richard, The Beach Boys, The Supremes, and The Ventures. They might also enjoy rockabilly and classic country music from the era such as Johnny Cash, Hank Williams, Patsy Cline, and Merle Haggard.
 +  listening to music by other classic rock artists such as the Beatles, the Rolling Stones, Led Zeppelin, and Jimi Hendrix. Other artists from the same era that Elvis Presley was popular include Buddy Holly, Chuck Berry, Roy Orbison, and Johnny Cash.
 +  music by other classic rock artists such as The Beatles, The Rolling Stones, Led Zeppelin, and Jimi Hendrix. They might also enjoy the music of classic country artists like Johnny Cash and Willie Nelson, and rockabilly artists such as Carl Perkins and Eddie Cochran. Additionally, they may enjoy more modern musicians who were directly influenced by Elvis
 +  music by other classic rock artists such as The Beatles, The Rolling Stones, Led Zeppelin, and Jimi Hendrix. Other music genres related to Elvis Presley that the listener might enjoy include rockabilly, country, pop and soul.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Eminem also would enjoy
 +  listening to

Kanye West, Dr. Dre, Jay-Z, 50 Cent, Lil Wayne, Nicki Minaj, Kendrick Lamar, Snoop Dogg, Drake, Future, Logic, and 2Pac.
 +  listening to music by other hip hop and rap artists such as Lil Wayne, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Cardi B, Nicki Minaj, and Post Malone. They might also enjoy listening to music from other genres, such as rock, pop, EDM, and country, depending on their taste in music.
 +  rap music in general. This could include other popular rap artists such as Drake, Cardi B, Kendrick Lamar and Migos.
 +  rap music from Lil Wayne, Kendrick Lamar, Drake, and Nicki Minaj.
 +  music by Tupac Shakur, Dr. Dre, Jay-Z and Snoop Dogg.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Emmy-Lou Harris also would enjoy
 +  music by:

1. Alison Krauss
2. Bob Dylan
3. Gillian Welch
4. Steve Earle
5. Lucinda Williams
6. Townes Van Zandt
7. Johnny Cash
8. Bonnie Raitt
9. Dolly Parton
10. Kris Kristofferson
 +  listening to music by the following artists:

1. Lucinda Williams
2. Gillian Welch
3. Steve Earle
4. Johnny Cash
5. Kris Kristofferson
6. Dolly Parton
7. Linda Ronstadt
8. John Prine
9. Willie Nelson
10. Ryan Adams
 +  listening to music by

Dolly Parton, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, Alison Krauss, Lucinda Williams, Steve Earle, and Townes Van Zandt.
 +  listening to other country singers such as Loretta Lynn, Dolly Parton, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, George Jones, and Patsy Cline.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Lucinda Williams, Gillian Welch, Dolly Parton, Willie Nelson, Steve Earle, Emmylou Harris and Linda Ronstadt. These artists all have a similar style of country-influenced folk and Americana music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Enya also would enjoy
 +  listening to artists like Clannad, Loreena McKennitt, Secret Garden, Moya Brennan, and Celtus.
 +  music by

Loreena McKennitt, Clannad, Dead Can Dance, Yanni, and Celtic Woman.
 +  listening to music by artists like Loreena McKennitt, Yanni, and Secret Garden.
 +  listening to music by 

Loreena McKennitt, Céline Dion, Sarah Brightman, Celtic Woman, and Clannad.
 +  music by

Loreena McKennitt, Clannad, Celtic Woman, Moya Brennan, Ólafur Arnalds, Capercaillie, and Dead Can Dance.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Epsyle also would enjoy
 +  music by artists like:

Avicii, Kygo, The Chainsmokers, Marshmello, Martin Garrix, Zedd, David Guetta, Calvin Harris, Deadmau5, Afrojack, Tiësto, Diplo, Kaskade, Armin van Buuren, Skrillex.
 +  music by

Odesza, Kaskade, Tycho, Above & Beyond, Illenium, Madeon, RÜFÜS DU SOL, Flume, and Porter Robinson.
 +  music by

The Weeknd, PartyNextDoor, Travis Scott, Post Malone, Drake, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  music by:

Alt-J, Glass Animals, The xx, Foals, Bombay Bicycle Club, and Flume.
 +  listening to music by

Gorillaz, Daft Punk, Aesop Rock, Flying Lotus, Radiohead, OutKast, MF Doom, and Animal Collective.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ethel Cain also would enjoy
 +  music by other jazz singers such as Dinah Washington, Billie Holiday, Ella Fitzgerald, Sarah Vaughan and Nat King Cole. They would also enjoy listening to music from other jazz greats such as Louis Armstrong, Duke Ellington, John Coltrane, Thelonius Monk and Miles Davis.
 +  other music by female indie-folk artists, such as Phoebe Bridgers, Julien Baker, Sharon Van Etten, Soccer Mommy, Lucy Dacus, and Faye Webster. These artists create music in a similar style to that of Ethel Cain, often featuring folky acoustic guitars, dreamy synth sounds and beautiful vocal harmonies
 +  music by

other female singer-songwriters such as Billie Eilish, Phoebe Bridgers, Lucy Dacus, Maggie Rogers, and Kacey Musgraves.
 +  music by artists such as Billie Eilish, Ella Fitzgerald, Frank Sinatra, Louis Armstrong, Nina Simone, and Aretha Franklin. These artists all have a similar style of music that includes jazz, blues, and soul. Cain's music is inspired heavily by these genres so listeners may also find enjoyment in her work.
 +  listening to music by other female artists such as Billie Eilish, Edith Piaf, Ariana Grande, Lady Gaga, Taylor Swift, Joni Mitchell, Dolly Parton, Janis Joplin, Aretha Franklin, Alicia Keys, and Ella Fitzgerald.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Etta James also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other classic R&B and soul singers, such as Aretha Franklin, Otis Redding, Stevie Wonder, Marvin Gaye, Al Green, and Sam Cooke. They might also enjoy listening to more modern R&B, blues, and jazz artists like Jill Scott, John Legend, Alicia Keys, and Lauryn
 +  listening to artists such as Aretha Franklin, Billie Holiday, Nancy Wilson, and Dinah Washington. All of these artists had a strong influence on the musical style of Etta James and each has their own unique blend of jazz, blues, and soul music.
 +  listening to other classic soul, blues, and jazz music from artists such as Aretha Franklin, Ray Charles, Billie Holiday, Nina Simone, and B.B. King.
 +  the music of other classic soul and blues singers, such as Aretha Franklin, Otis Redding, B.B. King, and Sam Cooke. These artists all had a major influence on the development of modern soul and R&B music, and their powerful performances are still relevant today. Listening to their music is a great way to experience
 +  music by

Aretha Franklin, Sam Cooke, Ray Charles, Billie Holiday, Otis Redding, Nina Simone, and Ike & Tina Turner.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Everybody Loves an Outlaw also would enjoy
 +  music by similar artists such as Chris Stapleton, Jason Isbell, Sturgill Simpson, Margo Price, Tyler Childers, and Kacey Musgraves. These artists have a similar style to Everybody Loves an Outlaw and are often classified as Americana or country-rock artists.
 +  listening to music by other outlaw country artists such as Willie Nelson, Waylon Jennings, Johnny Cash, Kris Kristofferson, Merle Haggard and Hank Williams.
 +  other modern country music, such as songs by Brad Paisley, Blake Shelton, Luke Bryan, and Kacey Musgraves. They may also enjoy older country music from artists such as Johnny Cash and Willie Nelson.
 +  music by other alt-country artists such as Sturgill Simpson, Kacey Musgraves, Margo Price, Jason Isbell, John Moreland, Whitey Morgan, and Nikki Lane.
 +  music by other country-rock acts such as The Eagles, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers, John Mellencamp, and Steve Earle. These acts have a similar musical style that combines elements of rock and roll, blues, and country music. Additionally, fans of Everybody Loves an Outlaw may also enjoy the works of newer country-rock


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Everything but the Girl also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

-Morcheeba
-Chet Faker 
-José González
-Zero 7
-Air
-Chicane 
-Goldfrapp 
-Tori Amos 
-Röyksopp 
-Portishead
 +  music by:

-Daughter 
-The xx 
-Chet Faker 
-Groove Armada 
-Air 
-Zero 7 
-Röyksopp 
-Morcheeba 
-Lamb 
-Saint Raymond
 +  listening to music by

The xx, Zero 7, Peter Gabriel, Air, Sade, Massive Attack, Thievery Corporation, St. Germain, Tracey Thorn, Morcheeba.
 +  listening to other music styles such as indie, jazz, soul, electronic, hip-hop, and rock. Everything but the Girl has a melodic sound that is heavily influenced by elements of jazz, folk, blues, and pop music. So listeners may also enjoy artists and bands such as Norah Jones, Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver,
 +  listening to music by

Morcheeba, Zero 7, The Style Council, Alison Moyet, Dido, Saint Etienne.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ezekiel also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Kanye West, Kendrick Lamar, Drake, J. Cole, Chance the Rapper, Anderson .Paak, Travis Scott, A$AP Rocky, Lil Uzi Vert, Post Malone.
 +  music by other contemporary Christian artists such as TobyMac, Lauren Daigle, Hillsong Worship, For King and Country, MercyMe, Bethel Music, Kari Jobe, Lecrae, Amy Grant, and Casting Crowns.
 +  the music of artists such as Kacey Musgraves, Hozier, Gregory Alan Isakov, Lord Huron, and Maren Morris. All of these artists have a folk-rock or country style that is similar to Ezekiel's music.
 +  music by the following artists:

1. Bon Iver
2. Sufjan Stevens
3. The Antlers
4. Bright Eyes
5. Andrew Bird
6. Fleet Foxes
7. Iron & Wine
8. Damien Rice
9. The National
10. Elliot Smith
 +  music from other alternative rock artists such as Cage The Elephant, The Wallflowers, and Band of Horses. All of these artists are known for their experimental and lyrical style of alternative rock music that is similar to Ezekiel. Other similar artists include Death Cab for Cutie, Modest Mouse, Interpol, and The Shins.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by FAKE TYPE. also would enjoy
 + 

- Indie Pop
- Electronic Dance Music (EDM)
- Alternative Rock
- Jazz
- Hip Hop 
- Reggae
 + 

-Indie rock
-Hip hop
-Alternative rock
-Electronic music 
-Dance music 
-Folk music 
-Experimental music 
-Industrial music 
-Ambient music 
-Reggae 
-World music
 +  music by real type. Music by real type is music that is created by musicians who are professional and experienced in their craft. It is usually of higher quality than music that is created by amateur musicians or those who lack experience.
 +  music by 

-Lany
-Joji 
-The 1975 
-Khalid 
-Rex Orange County 
-Beabadoobee 
-Hayley Williams 
-Haim
-Clairo 
-Girl in Red 
-Carly Rae Jepsen
 +  music from other genres such as indie, rock, pop, hip-hop, EDM, jazz, classical and more. They may also be interested in exploring different music styles from different cultures.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Fernand Leger also would enjoy
 +  the works of Pablo Picasso and Salvador Dali. Both Picasso and Dali were important figures in the Surrealism art movement, which had a strong influence on Leger's work. Additionally, all three of these artists are heavily associated with Cubism, as all three experimented with abstracted forms, geometric shapes, and bright colors. Ultimately
 +  art by Fernand Leger. Fernand Leger was a French painter and sculptor who is considered one of the pioneers of modern art. His work often featured bold colors and geometric shapes, which can be seen in his paintings, sculptures, tapestries, and stained glass. As such, someone who enjoys Leger's music may also find pleasure in
 +  listening to the music of

Erik Satie, Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, and Aaron Copland.
 +  listening to music by

Piet Mondrian, Wassily Kandinsky, Marc Chagall, and Kazimir Malevich.
 +  the works of

Pablo Picasso, Salvador Dali, Joan Miro, Wassily Kandinsky, and Marc Chagall.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Fiona Stephenson also would enjoy
 +  music by

Lorde, Florence and the Machine, Adele, Lord Huron, and Alanis Morissette.
 +  listening to music by other female singer-songwriters such as Taylor Swift, Adele, Alicia Keys, Halsey, and Kelly Clarkson.
 +  music by other alternative indie and rock artists, such as The National, Phoebe Bridgers, Mitski, Orville Peck, Soccer Mommy, The 1975, and Julien Baker. All of these artists create music that is similar in sound to that of Fiona Stephenson. Other genres they might enjoy include folk, dream pop, jazz, and
 +  listening to music by:

Kacey Musgraves, Taylor Swift, Adele, Hozier, Ariana Grande, Sam Smith, Billie Eilish, Ed Sheeran, Justin Timberlake, and Beyoncé.
 +  listening to music by artists such as:

-Taylor Swift 
-Adele 
-Lorde 
-Ed Sheeran 
-Coldplay 
-Kesha 
-Miley Cyrus 
-Alicia Keys 
-Ariana Grande 
-Katy Perry 
-Sh


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Fire on Fire also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Bright Eyes, a group that has a similar tone and sound. Bright Eyes is an American indie rock band led by singer-songwriter Conor Oberst and is known for its folk-tinged and experimental sound.
 +  bands such as Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, War on Drugs, Sufjan Stevens, Local Natives, and The National. These bands are all similar to Fire on Fire in that they create a soundscape of folk-inspired indie rock with an experimental and often atmospheric approach. Additionally, fans of Fire on Fire would likely enjoy the work
 +  music by

Phosphorescent, The Dodos, The Head and the Heart, Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, and Iron & Wine.
 +  listening to music by

other folk bands such as Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, The Head and the Heart, Phosphorescent, Iron & Wine, Daughter, The Tallest Man on Earth, Mumford & Sons, and First Aid Kit.
 +  music by

Bon Iver, Sufjan Stevens, The National, Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, Phosphorescent, Bonny Light Horseman, Big Thief, St. Vincent, and Damien Rice.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by First-Aid Kit also would enjoy
 +  music by The Lumineers, Mumford & Sons, and Fleet Foxes.
 +  music by artist such as Fleet Foxes, Bon Iver, The Head and the Heart, The Lumineers, Iron & Wine, Of Monsters and Men, The Avett Brothers, Sufjan Stevens, and Phosphorescent.
 +  listening to music by:

Laura Marling, The Head and the Heart, Fleet Foxes, Of Monsters and Men, Mumford & Sons, Lord Huron, The Lumineers, The Staves, Phosphorescent, Bon Iver.
 +  listening to:

-The Lumineers
-The Head and the Heart
-Mumford & Sons
-Courtney Barnett
-Bon Iver
-Father John Misty
-Fleet Foxes
-Phosphorescent
-Neko Case
-Hozier
 +  listening to music by Of Monsters and Men and Ben Howard.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Fleetwood Mac also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

The Eagles, The Rolling Stones, Neil Young, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers, Bob Dylan, Paul Simon, Santana, Led Zeppelin, The Allman Brothers Band, Crosby Stills Nash & Young, and Journey.
 +  music by the following artists:

-The Eagles
-Stevie Nicks
-The Beach Boys
-The Beatles
-Pink Floyd
-Led Zeppelin
-Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers
-Lynyrd Skynyrd
-The Rolling Stones
-The Who
 +  discovering similar musical groups such as The Eagles, Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers, and Lindsey Buckingham & Christine McVie.
 +  the music of:

The Eagles, Tom Petty, Steely Dan, Bruce Springsteen, Bob Seger, Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young, Heart, The Doobie Brothers, and Led Zeppelin.
 + 

Stevie Nicks, Billy Idol, The Eagles, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers, The Allman Brothers Band, Elvis Costello, Elton John, Lindsey Buckingham, Bob Dylan, Crosby Stills Nash & Young.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Fleur also would enjoy
 +  music by

Lorde, The xx, Grimes, CHVRCHES, Haim, and Beach House.
 +  music by artists such as Lorde, Sia, Adele, Taylor Swift, Halsey, and Carly Rae Jepsen. These artists have similar styles to Fleur's music, which is often a blend of pop and alternative sounds.
 +  listening to music by:

Kimbra, Grimes, Lorde, FKA Twigs, Lykke Li, St. Vincent.
 +  music from artists such as Mura Masa, Sevdaliza, FKA twigs, Lykke Li, Lana Del Rey, Banks, and Lorde.
 +  listening to music by

Artists such as Coldplay, Ed Sheeran, Adele, Taylor Swift, Lorde, and Sia.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Flo Rida also would enjoy
 +  music by Pitbull, Sean Kingston, and Lil Wayne.
 +  listening to music by Pitbull. Both of these artists are rappers who are known for their upbeat and danceable songs. They both use a lot of electronic and pop elements in their music, and they often collaborate on tracks. Their styles are very similar and they often feature other singers or rappers on their songs.
 +  listening to Pitbull, T-Pain, Kanye West, and Snoop Dogg.
 +  listening to music by Drake, Pitbull, Nicki Minaj, and Will.i.am.
 +  listening to Lil Wayne and Drake. Both Lil Wayne and Drake have collaborated with Flo Rida in the past, creating songs such as "Let It Roll" and "Wild Ones". These songs often feature similar beats and styles to Flo Rida's music, making it likely that someone who enjoys Flo Rida's music would also enjoy listening to the music


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Flogging Molly also would enjoy
 +  bands like The Pogues, The Dropkick Murphys, and The Tossers. These bands all have a similar sound of Celtic punk and folk rock. All of these bands feature lyrics that focus heavily on Irish heritage, culture, and politics.
 +  listening to other Celtic punk bands such as Dropkick Murphys, The Pogues, The Real McKenzies, and The Tossers.
 +  listening to Dropkick Murphys, The Pogues and The Dubliners.
 +  music by Dropkick Murphys. Both bands are Celtic punk bands from the United States and often perform similar styles of music. Dropkick Murphys have a more intense punk sound than Flogging Molly, so if you're looking for a more aggressive version of Celtic punk then Dropkick Murphys is a good choice.
 +  similar Celtic punk bands, such as Dropkick Murphys, The Pogues, The Tossers, and The Real McKenzies. They might also enjoy traditional Irish folk music, as well as other folk-punk bands like Flogging Molly, such as Gogol Bordello and The Levellers.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Florence + The Machine also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Lana Del Rey, Lorde, Chvrches, Sia, The xx, Grimes, Halsey, St. Vincent, Lykke Li, and Marina and the Diamonds.
 +  listening to music by

Lana Del Rey, Lorde, Hozier, Lykke Li, Alt-J, The National, Adele, Bon Iver, Feist, and St. Vincent.
 +  the music of:

Lana Del Rey, Hozier, Lorde, Lykke Li, The xx, St. Vincent, Daughter, Banks, CHVRCHES, Glass Animals.
 +  listening to

Lana Del Rey, Lorde, Bjork, St. Vincent, Cat Power, Lykke Li, Feist, Grimes, Chvrches, Sia.
 +  music by:

Lana Del Rey, Haim, Adele, Vampire Weekend, St. Vincent, The xx, Lykke Li, Grimes, Lorde, Arctic Monkeys.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Florence + the Machine also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by 

Lana Del Rey, Lorde, Hozier, Florence and the Machine, Vampire Weekend, Amy Winehouse, The xx, Coldplay, Adele, Lykke Li.
 +  listening to music by Adele, Lana Del Rey, and Lorde.
 +  music by:

1. Lykke Li
2. The xx
3. Alt-J
4. Bat for Lashes
5. St. Vincent
6. Of Monsters and Men
7. Haim
8. Mumford & Sons
9. Laura Marling
10.Feist
 +  listening to:

-Lana Del Rey
-Haim
-Sia
-The xx
-CHVRCHES
-Lykke Li
-Vampire Weekend
-Mumford & Sons 
-The National 
-alt-J 
-Birdy 
-Of Monsters and Men
 +  listening to Lykke Li. 

Lykke Li is a Swedish singer-songwriter who produces music that is often described as having a similar sonic landscape to Florence + the Machine. Her music is often melancholy and dark, like Florence + the Machine, but also has an underlying pop sensibility. Both artists have a strong emotional intensity


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Francis Criss also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

John Coltrane, Duke Ellington, Miles Davis, Charlie Parker, and Herbie Hancock.
 +  listening to music by 
Elton John, Stevie Wonder, Paul Simon, Fleetwood Mac, and Billy Joel.
 +  music by other artists from the 1950s and 1960s such as Elvis Presley, The Beatles, The Beach Boys, Chuck Berry, Jerry Lee Lewis, Johnny Cash and many others.
 +  music by:

Miles Davis, John Coltrane, Louis Armstrong, Herbie Hancock, Duke Ellington, Charlie Parker, Bill Evans, Thelonious Monk, and Nat King Cole.
 +  listening to music by other artists such as The Beatles, Michael Jackson, Queen, Elton John, and Billy Joel. All of these artists have created music that has stood the test of time and have had a major influence on the development of pop music throughout the years.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Frank Sinatra also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other singers from the era such as Dean Martin, Nat King Cole, Doris Day, and Ella Fitzgerald. Other artists from the same era that could be enjoyed include Bobby Darin, Sammy Davis Jr., Peggy Lee, and Louis Armstrong.
 +  listening to music by Dean Martin, Sammy Davis Jr., and Tony Bennett. These singers were all popular during the same era of music known as the Rat Pack era, which was known for jazz, swing, and romantic love ballads.
 +  listening to music by Ella Fitzgerald, Dean Martin, Nat King Cole, Tony Bennett, and Sammy Davis Jr.
 +  listening to music by other artists from the same era, such as Nat King Cole, Ella Fitzgerald, Dean Martin, Sammy Davis Jr., Louis Armstrong, and many more.
 +  listening to music by Dean Martin. 

Both Frank Sinatra and Dean Martin are part of the Rat Pack, a group of entertainers popular in the 1950s and 1960s who were known for their swinging, smooth style of jazz. Both singers have a similar vocal style, crooning with a deep, rich tone, so fans of Sin


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Frank Stella also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

other minimalists such as Steve Reich, Philip Glass, John Adams, Arvo Pärt, Terry Riley, and La Monte Young.
 +  listening to music by

Miles Davis, John Coltrane, Charles Mingus, Thelonious Monk, Ella Fitzgerald, Billie Holiday, and Herbie Hancock.
 +  music by

John Lennon, The Beatles, David Bowie, ABBA, Prince, Bob Dylan, Michael Jackson, Madonna, Elvis Presley, Queen, and Led Zeppelin.
 +  listening to music by 

other jazz artists such as Miles Davis, John Coltrane, Ella Fitzgerald, Duke Ellington, and Thelonious Monk.
 +  music by

Elton John, Lady Gaga, The Beatles, Billy Joel, Michael Jackson, Amy Winehouse, Bruno Mars, Fleetwood Mac, Alicia Keys and Beyoncé.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Frank ocean also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Tyler the Creator. The two artists share a similar sound and style that blends elements of hip hop, R&B, and indie music. Additionally, both artists have poignant lyrics that explore themes such as love, identity, and heartbreak.
 +  listening to music by Tyler, the Creator. Tyler, the Creator has collaborated with Frank Ocean on a number of songs, and both artists share a similar style and approach to making music. Tyler, the Creator's music often incorporates elements of hip-hop, soul, alternative, and even rock music. His albums are known for their catchy hooks and clever
 +  listening to music by:

-Kendrick Lamar 
-Tyler, The Creator 
-Childish Gambino 
-Mac Miller 
-The Weeknd 
-Bryson Tiller 
-Post Malone 
-J. Cole
 +  music by

Tyler, The Creator, Sampha, Solange, Mac Miller, Jhene Aiko, Kehlani, Childish Gambino, and the Internet.
 +  music by

The Weeknd, Tyler the Creator, Kendrick Lamar, SZA, Travis Scott, Post Malone, Drake, Childish Gambino, Migos, and J. Cole.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Frankie Cosmos also would enjoy
 +  music by 
Vampire Weekend, Mitski, Porches, Soccer Mommy, Jay Som, and Snail Mail.
 +  music from other indie pop artists like Soccer Mommy, Phoebe Bridgers, and Alex G. 

Other similar artists that a person who enjoys Frankie Cosmos might enjoy include Youth Lagoon, Tiny Moving Parts, and Cathedrals.
 +  music by other indie pop artists such as Clairo, Soccer Mommy, Girlpool, Mitski and Phoebe Bridgers. These artists similarly explore themes of youth, relationships, identity, and self-expression in their music. Other genres associated with indie pop such as dream-pop or lo-fi may also appeal to fans of Frankie Cosmos
 +  music by

Snail Mail, Soccer Mommy, Mitski, Phoebe Bridgers, Big Thief, Girlpool, Julien Baker, Jay Som, Palehound, and Japanese Breakfast.
 +  music by Soccer Mommy, Phoebe Bridgers, and Snail Mail.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Frums also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Tame Impala, Beach House, Fleet Foxes, Vampire Weekend, Grizzly Bear, Bon Iver, and Wolf Alice.
 +  listening to music from bands such as The 1975, The Killers, Arcade Fire, Phoenix, Kings of Leon, and Empire of the Sun. These bands create a sound similar to Frums, combining alternative rock and indie pop. Other similar artists include The Strokes, Bloc Party, Interpol, and Foals.
 +  music by 

other hip-hop and rap artists such as Kendrick Lamar, J. Cole, Drake, Travis Scott, and Lil Uzi Vert.
 +  listening to music by

The Tallest Man on Earth, Bon Iver, Sharon Van Etten, Phoebe Bridgers, and Fleet Foxes.
 +  listening to music by 
Marian Hill, FKA Twigs, and Alina Baraz.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by GARAGE: Bad Dream Adventure OST also would enjoy
 +  listening to music from other video game soundtracks, such as Super Mario Odyssey OST, Zelda Breath of the Wild OST, and Undertale OST. They would also enjoy listening to similar genres such as chiptune, synthwave, and outrun.
 +  music by

-Hudson Mohawke
-Arca
-Bibio
-Oneohtrix Point Never
-Kuedo
-Dean Blunt
-James Blake
-Kelpe
 +  music from:

- Synthwave artists such as Com Truise, FM-84, and Miami Nights 1984 
- Dream pop artists such as Beach House, Wild Nothing, and Washed Out 
- Electronic music producers such as SBTRKT, Flying Lotus, and Four Tet 
- Other game soundtracks such as Journey
 +  listening to

-Music by Yuzo Koshiro (Streets of Rage, Etrian Odyssey)
-Chiptune-style music (Kero Kero Bonito, Anamanaguchi)
-Electronic music (Justice, Daft Punk)
-Hip hop (J. Cole, Kendrick Lamar)

 +  the following bands:

1. Perturbator
2. Kavinsky
3. Carpenter Brut
4. Dance with the Dead
5. Mega Drive
6. Scandroid
7. FM-84
8. Power Glove
9. Neon Nox
10. Magic Sword


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gang of Youths also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Vance Joy, The Lumineers, Mumford & Sons, The National, Ben Howard, and Hozier. All of these artists have similar soundscapes and styles to Gang of Youths, with indie-rock and folk influences.
 +  listening to music by The 1975, Arctic Monkeys, and Florence + The Machine.
 +  music by:

The National, The War on Drugs, The 1975, Foals, Arcade Fire, Hozier, Shakey Graves, Local Natives, Vampire Weekend, Bon Iver.
 +  listening to music by The National and The War on Drugs. Both The National and The War on Drugs are indie rock bands that have a similar sound to Gang of Youths. Their sound is characterized by indie rock with a strong emotional presence and lyrics that focus on themes of introspection and personal struggles. The music by these two bands evoke similar feelings as
 +  listening to:

1. The National
2. The War on Drugs
3. Arcade Fire
4. Father John Misty
5. Bon Iver
6. Hozier
7. Florence + the Machine
8. The Lumineers
9. The Killers
10. Broken Social Scene


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gareth Coker also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Hans Zimmer, Thomas Bergersen, Two Steps From Hell, and Austin Wintory.
 +  listening to music by other composers such as Jeremy Soule, Austin Wintory, Nobuo Uematsu, and Yasunori Mitsuda. These composers are all known for creating beautiful and evocative game soundtracks and other musical works.
 +  listening to the music of other composers such as Yoko Shimomura, Nobuo Uematsu, Austin Wintory, and Harry Gregson-Williams. These composers have all composed music for video games and films and are known for creating beautiful soundtracks that evoke emotions and set the mood for a scene.
 +  listening to music by other game composers such as Austin Wintory, Yasunori Mitsuda, and Nobuo Uematsu. All of these composers have created music for various video games, and their styles vary from classical to modern. Additionally, those who enjoy Coker's music may want to explore the work of other film and television
 +  music by artists such as Hans Zimmer, Tom Holkenborg (Junkie XL), Joe Hisaishi, and Ludwig Göransson. All of these composers create music for films, television and/or video games. They are masters of creating atmospheric scores that transport listeners to different worlds.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gaslight Anthem also would enjoy
 +  music from other rock bands such as The Killers, The Strokes, Kings of Leon, Green Day, Foo Fighters, Weezer, The Black Keys, Arctic Monkeys, and Blink-182.
 +  music by

The Menzingers, The Hold Steady, The Bouncing Souls, Against Me!, Hot Water Music, Chuck Ragan, The Weakerthans.
 +  listening to music by:

-The Hold Steady
-The Menzingers
-The Bouncing Souls
-Frank Turner
-Hot Water Music
-The Wonder Years
-Brian Fallon and the Crowes
-Billy Talent
-Bruce Springsteen
 +  music by:

The Hold Steady, The Menzingers, The Bouncing Souls, River City Extension, The Scandals, The Loved Ones, Hot Water Music, Ted Leo and the Pharmacists, Chuck Ragan, Frank Turner.
 +  music by The Menzingers, The Bouncing Souls, The Wonder Years, and Against Me!. These bands all have a similar sound and play a type of punk-rock that Gaslight Anthem fans will appreciate. Additionally, these bands often collaborate with one another on albums and live performances, further expanding the connection between them.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by George Ault also would enjoy
 +  music by

Piet Mondrian, Wassily Kandinsky, Paul Klee, and other early 20th century modernist composers. Music from this era often featured the exploration of tonality and dissonance, as well as the use of unconventional instruments and soundscapes.
 +  music by

other early 20th century American composers such as Aaron Copland, Charles Ives, and John Cage.
 +  listening to music by

Edward Hopper, Arthur Dove, and Charles Sheeler. These three artists were contemporaries of George Ault and shared a similar style of painting. They all embraced the American Scene Movement, which focused on realistic depictions of everyday subjects, such as rural landscapes and cityscapes. The music of these artists might be expected
 +  music by

other American modernist composers such as Aaron Copland, Charles Ives, Henry Cowell, and Edgar Varèse.
 +  music by

other early 20th century American modernists such as Aaron Copland, Charles Ives, and Henry Cowell.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by George Jones also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Hank Williams Sr., Merle Haggard, Tammy Wynette, Loretta Lynn, Johnny Cash, and Willie Nelson.
 +  listening to music by 
 Merle Haggard.
 +  listening to music by

Hank Williams, Johnny Cash, Merle Haggard, Tammy Wynette, and Willie Nelson.
 +  listening to music by Merle Haggard. Merle Haggard and George Jones were two of the most influential country singers of all time. They are often referred to as The Hag and Possum, respectively, and they shared a similar honky-tonk style of songwriting. Both artists have released dozens of studio albums over their careers
 +  music by

Hank Williams, Johnny Cash, Willie Nelson, Merle Haggard, and Patsy Cline.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Georges Braque also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Pablo Picasso. Both were Spanish artists who were contemporaries and friends in the early 20th century, and both had an influence on modern art, including the use of cubism in their works. They also both composed music that incorporated elements of jazz, classical, and folk music.
 +  music by other French composers, such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Erik Satie. Additionally, they might enjoy music from other early 20th century composers such as Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, and Bela Bartok.
 +  music by other modern classical composers such as Erik Satie, Claude Debussy, Olivier Messiaen, Igor Stravinsky and Arnold Schoenberg. These composers all share some of the same stylistic elements as Braque, such as the use of a wide range of harmonic and melodic dissonance, a focus on texture and tim
 +  music by other French composers, such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Erik Satie. These composers were contemporaries of Braque and shared a common interest in creating music with a unique and often experimental edge. Each composer has their own distinct style, so there are many different types of music to explore.
 +  listening to other classical composers, such as Claude Debussy, Ludwig van Beethoven, Johannes Brahms, Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, and Franz Schubert. These composers were contemporaries of Braque and their works share many of the same influences and motifs.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Georgia O'Keeffe also would enjoy
 +  music by

other impressionist composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Erik Satie. These composers wrote music that was often characterized by its ethereal, dreamlike qualities and delicate harmonies.
 +  music by

Joan Tower, John Corigliano, William Bolcom, Jennifer Higdon, and Augusta Read Thomas.
 +  listening to the work of other American composers. Such composers include Leonard Bernstein, Aaron Copland, George Gershwin, John Cage, Charles Ives, and Duke Ellington. Other more recent composers like Philip Glass, Steve Reich, and John Adams might also be of interest.
 +  the music of 
John Cage.
 +  listening to music by

other American composers of the early 20th century, such as Charles Ives, Aaron Copland, and George Gershwin.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Get Scared also would enjoy
 +  music from bands in the rock genre such as Three Days Grace, Breaking Benjamin, Falling In Reverse, Seether, and Escape The Fate. They would also enjoy artists such as Sleeping With Sirens, Of Mice & Men, and Motionless In White.
 +  listening to music by

Asking Alexandria, Falling in Reverse, Motionless in White, Escape the Fate, Of Mice & Men.
 +  listening to music by

Escape The Fate, Falling In Reverse, Of Mice & Men, A Skylit Drive, and Motionless In White.
 +  bands such as Motionless In White, Falling in Reverse, Asking Alexandria, Ice Nine Kills, and Of Mice & Men.
 +  music by:

1. Escape the Fate
2. Falling in Reverse
3. I Prevail
4. Hawthorne Heights
5. Asking Alexandria
6. Motionless in White
7. A Day to Remember
8. Of Mice & Men
9. Issues
10. Crown the Empire


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Ghost and Pals also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Clairo. Clairo is an American singer-songwriter and musician who is known for her bedroom pop style and lo-fi aesthetic. Her music is often described as dreamy, and incorporates elements of indie rock, alternative R&B and dream pop. Clairo has released two EPs, Diary 001 and Immunity,
 +  music by

The Black Keys, Radiohead, Coldplay, and Muse.
 +  music by:

The Black Keys, Arctic Monkeys, Foo Fighters, Queens of the Stone Age, Radiohead, The Strokes, Kings of Leon, Muse, Jack White, The White Stripes.
 +  listening to music by The 1975. The 1975's sound is often described as a blend of indie, rock, and pop. Their music includes dreamy guitar melodies, layered synths, and smooth vocal harmonies. The band's signature sound has been compared to the likes of Arcade Fire, MGMT, and Foster the People.
 +  music by which bands?

Similar bands to Ghost and Pals include: The Black Keys, Death Grips, FIDLAR, Ty Segall, Wavves, King Gizzard & The Lizard Wizard, Thee Oh Sees, Parquet Courts, Thee Oh Sees, White Denim.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Girl in Red also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, Clairo, Jade Bird, Lucy Dacus, and Mitski.
 +  music by

Beabadoobee, Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, Clairo, and Pom Poko.
 +  music by

Phoebe Bridgers, Clairo, Soccer Mommy, Beabadoobee, Dayglow, and Wallows.
 +  music by King Princess and Hayley Williams. Both artists have a similar sound to Girl in Red, creating music that is indie-pop with strong lyrical content.
 +  music by:

Banks, Clairo, Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, Hayley Williams, Alicia Acuna, Snail Mail, Miley Cyrus, Maggie Rogers, Billie Eilish.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Goreshit also would enjoy
 +  music by other producers who make similar style of music. These would include artists such as DJ Amaya, Scandroid, Das Mörtal, Glitch Black, Neoslave, and Subliminal Code.
 +  listening to 
Vomitstep, Glitch Hop, Breakcore, Drum and Bass, IDM, and Industrial.
 +  music by other artists in the breakcore genre, such as Venetian Snares, Cex, and Enduser. They might also like other genres related to breakcore such as speedcore, darkstep, and drum and bass. Additionally, they may enjoy listening to a variety of different electronic music genres, such as dubstep, ID
 +  listening to music by 
Noisia, Aphex Twin, Amon Tobin, and FuntCase.
 +  music by artists such as Enduser, Hecq, Ugress, and Subheim. These artists all have a similar dark, industrial sound that Goreshit is known for. Other artists who share similar music styles would include Aesthetic Perfection, Rein, Controlled Collapse and I:Scintilla.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gorillaz also would enjoy
 +  music by other alternative rock bands like Radiohead and Arcade Fire. They could also enjoy hip hop and rap music by artists like Kendrick Lamar and A Tribe Called Quest.
 +  listening to music by other alternative rock bands such as Blur, Arctic Monkeys, Radiohead, Oasis, The Killers, Muse, Coldplay, Foo Fighters and Red Hot Chili Peppers.
 +  listening to music by:

Artist such as Radiohead, Beck, Blur, LCD Soundsystem, OutKast, The Streets, The Prodigy, Ladytron, Massive Attack, The Chemical Brothers, Arctic Monkeys, and Muse.
 +  music by other alternative rock bands, such as Radiohead, Blur, Pavement, The Pixies, and The Flaming Lips.
 +  music by Muse, Blur, and The Good, The Bad and The Queen.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Green Day also would enjoy
 +  music by Blink-182, Sum 41, and The Offspring. These bands are all part of the same genre of punk rock music that Green Day is known for.
 +  listening to music from bands such as Blink-182, The Offspring, Weezer, Jimmy Eat World, Fall Out Boy, and Sum 41.
 +  music by:

Foo Fighters, Blink-182, The Offspring, Weezer, Red Hot Chili Peppers, My Chemical Romance, Sum 41, Jimmy Eat World, Fall Out Boy, and Billy Talent.
 +  music by The Offspring
 +  listening to music by Fall Out Boy. Both bands are punk rock/pop punk bands and have similar sounds. Additionally, they often tour together and often collaborate on songs.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gregory Alan Isakov also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by artists such as Bon Iver, Sufjan Stevens, Iron and Wine, The Lumineers, and Ryan Adams. These artists all share a similar style of folk-influenced indie music that is characterized by thoughtful lyrics, often featuring acoustic instrumentation alongside electronic elements.
 +  music by Ben Howard and Ray LaMontagne. Both of these musicians have very similar styles of music, consisting of acoustic guitar and gentle vocals. They draw their inspiration from folk music and nature and create emotionally evocative songs about life.
 +  listening to music by

Bon Iver, Iron & Wine, Sufjan Stevens, The Head and the Heart, and Villagers.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Iron & Wine, Ben Howard, Ryan Adams, Neko Case, and Bon Iver. All of these artists offer a similar style of music that is reflective and lyrically-driven. It often has a folky or Americana feel, with gentle instrumentation and poetic lyrics.
 +  listening to music by Bon Iver, Iron & Wine, Sufjan Stevens, and The Tallest Man On Earth.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gregory and the Hawk also would enjoy
 +  music by:

Iron and Wine, Death Cab for Cutie, Sufjan Stevens, Laura Marling, Bon Iver, Beach House, The Antlers, Band of Horses, Fleet Foxes, Joanna Newsom.
 +  listening to music by

Feist, Iron & Wine, Sufjan Stevens, Bon Iver, and Simon & Garfunkel.
 +  listening to music by Bright Eyes, Sufjan Stevens, Iron & Wine, and Elliott Smith. 

These musicians often create music with a similar indie-folk acoustic sound, featuring gentle vocal melodies and thoughtful lyrics.
 +  listening to music by

Iron & Wine, Bon Iver, Jose Gonzales, Damien Rice, and Sufjan Stevens.
 +  listening to other indie folk artists such as Bon Iver, Iron & Wine, Sufjan Stevens, and The Lumineers. They might also like listening to some of the classic folk/indie rock bands such as The Decemberists or Death Cab for Cutie.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Grimes also would enjoy
 +  music by

Lana Del Rey, FKA Twigs, Blood Orange, Purity Ring, and Charli XCX.
 +  music by FKA twigs. Both Grimes and FKA Twigs are experimental pop artists who use elements of electronic music and other genres to create unique sounds. Both artists often incorporate unconventional vocal techniques, such as auto-tune, in their music. They are also known for their creative DIY approach to production and visuals.
 +  music by

FKA Twigs, Bjork, Perfume Genius, Charli XCX, and Clairo.
 +  music by:

• FKA Twigs 
• Bjork 
• CHVRCHES 
• Purity Ring 
• Zola Jesus 
• Little Dragon 
• Janelle Monáe 
• Robyn 
• Nite Jewel
 +  music by FKA Twigs. Both artists have similar experimental, ethereal soundscapes with dreamy production, heavy use of synths and unique vocal styling. Both artists also explore themes related to love, isolation, and self-expression in their music. 


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Gustave Doré also would enjoy
 +  listening to the music of other Romantic composers such as Franz Schubert, Ludwig van Beethoven, Johannes Brahms, Robert Schumann, and Felix Mendelssohn. These composers are all considered prominent figures in the Romantic music period and their works are seen as some of the best in classical music.
 +  listening to other classical composers such as Mozart, Beethoven, Bach, Brahms, Schubert, Haydn and Chopin. Doré was a French Romantic composer who wrote primarily orchestral music, piano works and operas. Other composers in the same style would be Debussy, Ravel, Franck and F
 +  listening to music by

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Frédéric Chopin, and Franz Liszt.
 +  listening to other French composers, such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Jacques Offenbach. Other 19th century French composers that could be enjoyed include Charles Gounod, César Franck, and Gabriel Fauré.
 +  listening to music by 
Claude Debussy. Both composers created works that blend classical styles with romantic and impressionistic sensibilities. The music of both Doré and Debussy is often characterized by its delicate yet intricate textures, which allow the listener to drift away into dreamy soundscapes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by H3artcrush also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Lauv, Khalid, Tove Lo, Troye Sivan, and Selena Gomez. They might also enjoy listening to music from similar genres such as EDM and synth-pop.
 +  music from other alternative artists such as Taylor Swift, The 1975, LANY, Lorde, and Carly Rae Jepsen. Other genres that may be of interest to a H3artcrush fan are synth-pop, indie pop, dream pop, and indie rock.
 +  listening to music by

blackbear, Lauv, Bea Miller, Jeremy Zucker, Dayglow, bülow, and gnash.
 +  music by 

Twenty One Pilots, The 1975, Panic! at the Disco, Billie Eilish, Dermot Kennedy, Conan Gray, Halsey, Lorde, Selena Gomez, Ed Sheeran.
 +  artists such as Lauv, BTS, Daya, blackbear, Carly Rae Jepsen, Troye Sivan, Zara Larsson and G-Eazy.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Half-Life and Portal series OSTs also would enjoy
 +  other titles in the same genre, like the soundtracks from other games developed by Valve Corporation, including Dota 2 and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive. They may also enjoy soundtracks from other popular video games such as The Last Of Us, Uncharted, and Red Dead Redemption. Music fans of similar genres might also be drawn to the likes of Hans Zimmer
 +  music from other video games like The Elder Scrolls, Final Fantasy, and Kingdom Hearts. They may also enjoy instrumental or electronic music from composers like Nobuo Uematsu, Yasunori Mitsuda, and Michiru Yamane.
 +  music from games such as Journey, Limbo, and Braid. These games all have soundtracks that feature a mix of ambient music and classical instrumentation, often blending together elements of acoustic instruments, electronic beats, and synthesizers. The music from these games is also often emotionally evocative, creating a unique atmosphere and feeling that resonates with players
 +  listening to music by other video game soundtracks such as those from the Mass Effect, The Elder Scrolls, and Bioshock series. These soundtracks feature similar types of soaring orchestral scores and have a similar level of production quality. Other popular video game soundtracks to explore include The Last of Us, Red Dead Redemption, and Super Mario Bros
 +  listening to other video game soundtracks such as Final Fantasy, The Legend of Zelda, Super Mario, and Dark Souls. They may also enjoy listening to post-rock or ambient music, as several of the Half-Life and Portal series OSTs draw on those genres.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Halsey also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Lana Del Rey, Lorde, and Billie Eilish.
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish, Lorde, and Lana Del Rey.
 +  listening to the following artists:

1. Lorde
2. Lana Del Rey
3. Billie Eilish
4. Sia
5. Hayley Kiyoko
6. Charli XCX
7. Ariana Grande
8. P!nk
9. Bebe Rexha
10.
 +  music by artists such as:

-The Chainsmokers 
-Lana Del Rey 
-Billie Eilish 
-Bebe Rexha 
-Charli XCX 
-Tove Lo 
-Zara Larsson 
-Marshmello 
-Dua Lipa 
 +  listening to music by 

Banks, Lorde, Lana Del Rey, and Grimes.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hank Williams Sr. also would enjoy
 +  music by

Johnny Cash, Merle Haggard, Willie Nelson, George Jones, Loretta Lynn, and Patsy Cline.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Johnny Cash, Willie Nelson, Merle Haggard, and George Jones. All of these musicians drew inspiration from Hank Williams Sr. and his approach to country music and Americana. They all have a similar sound and style, focusing heavily on traditional instrumentation, storytelling lyrics, and heartfelt performances.
 +  listening to music by Johnny Cash. Johnny Cash and Hank Williams Sr. are both considered part of the genre of Country Music, which was popularized in the 1950s. Both singers have a similar style of singing and songwriting, often featuring acoustic guitar, fiddle, and steel guitar. Their songs often focus on topics of love, heartache,
 +  listening to music by other artists from the era. These include Johnny Cash, Patsy Cline, Merle Haggard, Loretta Lynn, Willie Nelson and George Jones.
 +  listening to music by Johnny Cash, Willie Nelson, and Merle Haggard. These artists are all considered country music greats who have been strongly influenced by Hank Williams Sr.'s style and sound. All four of these artists had a significant impact on the development of Country Music and are often referred to as the "Mountain Men" or "


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Harold Budd also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Brian Eno, Steve Reich, and Erik Satie.
 +  listening to music by Brian Eno. Both musicians are considered Ambient or Drone music pioneers, and both have similar styles of creating music that is often characterized as peaceful and calming.
 +  music by Brian Eno. Harold Budd and Brian Eno had a long collaboration which resulted in several albums together, so those who enjoy Harold Budd's music would likely appreciate Brian Eno's work. Both musicians focus heavily on ambient music with spacey, dreamlike sounds and atmospheres.
 +  listening to music by Brian Eno and Laraaji. These three artists are all prominent figures in the ambient and experimental music genres. Their sounds draw on minimalism, improvisation, and textural exploration and often feature atmospheric soundscapes and meditative melodies. All of their music is highly contemplative and calming, making them ideal for relaxation and meditation
 +  music by Brian Eno. This is because Harold Budd and Brian Eno are both known for creating ambient music, which is a type of electronic music that emphasizes texture and atmosphere. Both musicians have worked together in the past in collaborations, such as on their album The Pearl. They also share a similar style of composition and instrumentation, which could be


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Harry Clarke also would enjoy
 +  music from

other alternative folk artists such as Bon Iver, The Tallest Man on Earth, Sufjan Stevens, Iron & Wine, Fleet Foxes, and The Decemberists.
 +  music by other similar artists, such as David Bowie, Queen, Elton John, Led Zeppelin and Pink Floyd.
 +  listening to music by

Katy Perry, Billie Eilish, Taylor Swift, Ed Sheeran, Ariana Grande, and other popular pop and rock artists.
 +  listening to music by

Bon Iver, The National, Iron and Wine, Sufjan Stevens, Death Cab for Cutie, Fleet Foxes, and St. Vincent.
 +  listening to music by:

Frank Sinatra, Billie Holiday, Ella Fitzgerald, Bing Crosby, Louis Armstrong, Nat King Cole, and Dean Martin.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Henri Matisse also would enjoy
 +  jazz music because Matisse was influenced by jazz music. He was particularly fond of the swing sounds of the 1930s and 40s, and his compositions often contain elements of jazz. Furthermore, Matisse was very close to popular jazz musicians such as Django Reinhardt, who inspired him to develop his own style of jazz-influenced music.
 +  listening to music by other French composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, and Gabriel Fauré. All of these composers share a similar style of composition that is characterized by an emphasis on melody and texture, with influences from Impressionism, Romanticism, and the classical idiom.
 +  listening to other classical composers such as Bach, Mozart, Haydn, Beethoven, Schubert, Debussy and Ravel. These composers represent the same style of music that Matisse created, with intricate compositions and beautiful melodies.
 +  listening to music by Claude Debussy. Both Debussy and Matisse are French composers from the late 19th and early 20th century who incorporated elements of Impressionism into their music. Their styles are similar in that both composers sought to capture the beauty of nature and evoke emotion through their compositions. Debussy's works are characterized by dream
 +  listening to music by

Claude Debussy.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Henri le Fauconnier also would enjoy
 +  music by other French composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Francis Poulenc. All three of these composers wrote works in the same style of classical music as Le Fauconnier, often incorporating sophisticated harmonies and lush textures. They are considered some of the most influential French composers of the 20th century,
 +  listening to music by

Maurice Ravel, Claude Debussy, Erik Satie, and Igor Stravinsky.
 +  the music of:

Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, Erik Satie, Jean Sibelius, and Igor Stravinsky.
 +  music by

other French Impressionist composers, such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Gabriel Fauré.
 +  listening to music by

Maurice Ravel.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hexperos also would enjoy
 +  music by

Nievi, Valeriane Q, Somnium Nox, Novo Amor, and The Controversy.
 + 

listening to other dark ambient, neoclassical, and ritual music acts like John 3:16, Lustmord, In Slaughter Natives, Rapoon, Raison D'être, and Lustmord & Robert Rich.
 +  music from

other bands and artists that create dark ambient, neoclassical, and ethereal music such as Dead Can Dance, Jóhann Jóhannsson, Lycia, In the Nursery, Elend, Raison D'être, Arcana, Aeternam, and Omnia.
 +  music by

Kammarheit, Raison D'être, and Atrium Carceri.
 +  listening to music by

Agalloch, Camel of Doom, Crippled Black Phoenix, The Foreshadowing, and Jaldaboath.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hollywood Undead also would enjoy
 +  music by bands such as Asking Alexandria, Falling in Reverse, Escape the Fate, and Attack Attack!. All of these bands have similar styles of music and are often categorized in the same genre.
 +  listening to music by

Asking Alexandria, Escape The Fate, Falling In Reverse, Motionless In White, and Five Finger Death Punch.
 +  music by Linkin Park, Slipknot, and Papa Roach.
 +  bands like

Asking Alexandria, Falling in Reverse, Escape the Fate, Attack Attack!, The Word Alive, Motionless in White, I See Stars, As I Lay Dying, Bring Me the Horizon, Suicide Silence, Bleeding Through, and Of Mice & Men.
 +  other similar type of music such as Asking Alexandria, Falling in Reverse, Escape the Fate, Attila, and Motionless in White. These artists have a similar sound to Hollywood Undead with hard rock, metalcore, and rap elements.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hot Water Music also would enjoy
 +  listening to

Rise Against, Strike Anywhere, Gaslight Anthem, Bad Religion, Against Me!, The Lawrence Arms, Thursday, Bouncing Souls, No Use For A Name, Alkaline Trio.
 +  listening to music by

The Gaslight Anthem, Titus Andronicus, The Menzingers, Against Me!, Rise Against, and NOFX.
 +  listening to

Rise Against, Thrice, The Lawrence Arms, Alkaline Trio, Gaslight Anthem, and Against Me!.
 + 

similar bands such as Rise Against, Gaslight Anthem, Against Me!, The Menzingers, Alkaline Trio, Anti-Flag, No Use For A Name, and Strike Anywhere.
 +  listening to Bruce Springsteen. Bruce Springsteen's music is often referred to as "heartland rock" and shares many similarities in style and sound with Hot Water Music. He has a powerful voice that tells stories through his music, like Hot Water Music does. His music also often deals with themes of hard work, resilience, and the struggles of everyday


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hozier also would enjoy
 +  music by

James Bay, John Mayer, George Ezra, Mumford & Sons, Bon Iver, Ed Sheeran, Tom Odell, Ben Howard, The Lumineers, and The Head and the Heart.
 +  listening to music by

Bon Iver, Daughter, The National, Fleet Foxes, Laura Marling, and Ben Howard.
 +  listening to music by Tom Odell. Tom Odell is a British singer-songwriter who has a similar style to Hozier, combining folk, rock and soul elements into his music. Both artists write meaningful lyrics that explore themes of love, heartbreak and personal transformation. Odell's music is often described as uplifting and romantic, while
 +  music by:

-James Bay 
-Mumford and Sons
-Florence and the Machine
-George Ezra
-Ed Sheeran 
-Ben Howard 
-Lorde 
-The Lumineers 
-Sam Smith 
-The National
 +  listening to music by James Bay, Lewis Capaldi, and Passenger.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Hélène de Beauvoir also would enjoy
 +  music by other French artists such as Edith Piaf, Jacques Brel, Charles Trenet, Serge Gainsbourg, and Yves Montand. These artists are all classics of the French chanson tradition and share many of the same influences and inspirations as Hélène de Beauvoir. Other contemporary French artists to
 +  music by other French artists such as Edith Piaf, Édith Piaf, Charles Aznavour, Yves Montand, Serge Gainsbourg, Françoise Hardy and Maurice Chevalier. These artists represent a variety of genres including chanson, jazz, classical and pop. Additionally, contemporary French artists such as Vé
 +  listening to other classical French composers such as Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Gabriel Fauré. Other more modern French composers, such as Camille Saint-Saëns, George Bizet, and Francis Poulenc, could also be enjoyed by fans of de Beauvoir's music.
 +  music by other French artists such as Édith Piaf, Serge Gainsbourg, Jacques Brel, Zaz, Stromae, Mylène Farmer and many more.
 +  listening to music by other French female singers such as Edith Piaf, Francoise Hardy, Vanessa Paradis, and Mylène Farmer. These singers have been major influences in the French music scene and have all created timeless music that incorporates a variety of genres such as chanson, jazz, and pop.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Igorrr also would enjoy
 +  music by Aphex Twin. Aphex Twin is a British electronic musician and composer whose music combines elements of many different genres, such as ambient, techno, acid house, drum and bass, and breakbeat. His music is often experimental, abstract and complex, but with a strong emphasis on melody and emotion.
 +  listening to music by:

Aphex Twin, Squarepusher, Venetian Snares, Amon Tobin, Flying Lotus, Noisia, Clark, and Autechre.
 +  listening to Aphex Twin, Clark, and Squarepusher. These are all electronic music producers who blend various genres together in experimental ways.
 +  listening to Aphex Twin, Squarepusher, Venetian Snares, and Autechre. These artists are all influential in the electronic music scene and have a sound that is similar to Igorrr's.
 +  listening to music by:

Aphex Twin, Venetian Snares, Squarepusher, Flying Lotus, Amon Tobin, Autechre, The Knife, Björk, Boards of Canada.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Infected Mushroom also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

The Prodigy, Pendulum, Bassnectar, Skrillex, Pretty Lights, Knife Party, Noisia, Excision, Flux Pavilion, Zedd, and Seven Lions.
 +  music by

Shpongle, Hallucinogen, Ott, Tipper, Juno Reactor, and Kaya Project.
 +  music by:

The Glitch Mob, Pendulum, Bassnectar, Noisia, Nero, Prodigy, Skrillex, Krewella, and Deadmau5.
 +  music by

The Crystal Method, Skrillex, Bassnectar, BT, Aphex Twin, ATB, and Prodigy.
 +  the works of Bassnectar, Skrillex, and Knife Party.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Insane Clown Posse also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Twiztid. The two artists are associated with the horrorcore subgenre of hip hop, which is characterized by dark and violent themes. Both artists often rap about the struggles of life in their hometowns and the violence they see around them. This type of music appeals to many fans due to its gritty, raw nature and
 +  music by

Twiztid, Tech N9ne, Kottonmouth Kings, Esham, Boondox, Twizted, Psychopathic Rydas, and Blaze Ya Dead Homie.
 +  music by:

Twiztid, Blaze Ya Dead Homie, Boondox, Anybody Killa, and Swollen Members.
 +  music by Twiztid, Dark Lotus, and Blaze Ya Dead Homie.
 +  other hip hop and rap music. Some specific artists they may like include Lil Wayne, Lil Uzi Vert, Cardi B, Kendrick Lamar, Drake, Kanye West, Travis Scott, Migos, and Post Malone.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Irene Patten also would enjoy
 +  listening to other female singer-songwriters such as Carly Rae Jepsen, Taylor Swift, Billie Eilish, Halsey and Lana Del Rey.
 +  music by

Alicia Keys, Lauryn Hill, Billie Eilish, SZA, Ella Mai, and Janelle Monáe.
 +  music by

Carly Rae Jepsen, Taylor Swift, Troye Sivan, MØ, Ariana Grande, and Halsey.
 +  music from other artists including:

1. The Weeknd
2. Billie Eilish
3. Taylor Swift
4. Ariana Grande
5. Ed Sheeran
6. Khalid
7. Selena Gomez
8. Shawn Mendes
9. Maroon 5
10. Halsey
 +  music by

Karen O, Sleigh Bells, M.I.A., Grimes, Charli XCX, Janelle Monáe, Lykke Li, Santigold, Robyn, Yeah Yeah Yeahs.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jack Stauber also would enjoy
 +  music by Lemon Demon, Sufjan Stevens, and Ween.
 +  listening to music by the artist Ween. Ween is a rock band that was founded in 1984, and their music has a unique and eclectic sound with elements of alternative, funk, punk, psychedelic, pop, and more. They have released several albums over the years, including The Mollusk, Chocolate and Cheese, White Pepper, and La
 +  listening to artists such as Weezer, Radiohead, and Vampire Weekend. These artists all have a similar pop-rock and alternative sound that Jack Stauber is known for. Other similar artist to check out may include Mac DeMarco, Foals, The Strokes, and The 1975.
 +  music by:

A. Parry Gripp
B. Jens Lekman
C. Andrew Huang
D. Sufjan Stevens
 +  music by 

Tennis, Rubblebucket, The Blow, Sufjan Stevens, Free Cake For Every Creature, Peach Pit, The Feelies, Reptaliens, Beach Bunny, and Soccer Mommy.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jacob Collier also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other artists who specialize in jazz and soul, such as Robert Glasper, Kamasi Washington, Erykah Badu, and Thundercat. Other artists that have a similar style to Collier's include Hiatus Kaiyote, Anderson .Paak, and Terrace Martin.
 +  the music of

Snarky Puppy, Emily King, Kaidi Tatham, Robert Glasper, and Thundercat.
 +  listening to music by other artists such as Snarky Puppy, Kamasi Washington, Esperanza Spalding, Robert Glasper, Flying Lotus, and Thundercat.
 +  listening to music by

Hiatus Kaiyote, Snarky Puppy, Kamasi Washington, and Thundercat.
 +  music from other artists such as Snarky Puppy, Kamasi Washington, Cory Wong, Thundercat, Robert Glasper, and Hiatus Kaiyote. All of these artists have a similar sound to Jacob Collier in that they incorporate many genres and styles into their music. They all have a jazz influence as well as incorporating elements of funk


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jaden Smith also would enjoy
 +  other artists such as Tyler, The Creator, Frank Ocean, Mac Miller, Chance the Rapper, Childish Gambino, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  listening to music by Tyler The Creator and Lil Uzi Vert.  These three artists are all part of the modern hip-hop and rap scene, with similar styles and subject matters. Jaden Smith’s work often has a more positive, uplifting message than the other two, but all three have a distinct style and flavor. All three
 +  music by Chance the Rapper, Khalid, and Kendrick Lamar. All of these artists are hip-hop and rap artists, so fans of Jaden Smith's music should find something to like in any of them.
 +  listening to music by Tyler, the Creator, Kid Cudi, Frank Ocean, and Kendrick Lamar.
 +  listening to music by Tyler the Creator, Kendrick Lamar, and Chance the Rapper.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jake Stauber's Micropop also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by artists such as Childish Gambino, Chance the Rapper, Anderson .Paak, Noname, Mac Miller, Brockhampton, Solange, and The Internet. These artists all have a similar sound to Jake Stauber's Micropop, with their own unique twist.
 +  listening to music by

other indie and lo-fi pop artists such as Sufjan Stevens, Soccer Mommy, Clairo, Bedouine, and Tomberlin.
 +  music by

Haley Heynderickx, Valerie June, Angel Olsen, Big Thief, Soccer Mommy, Lucy Dacus, and Phoebe Bridgers.
 +  music by

other artists in the genre, such as LCD Soundsystem, tUnE-yArDs, Toro y Moi, Hot Chip, and Neon Indian.
 +  music by

other artists in the same genre such as Mac Demarco, Toro y Moi, Clairo, Jay Som, and TOPS.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jamie Berry also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Rufus Wainwright, Lykke Li, Little Dragon, Kaytranada, and The xx. All of these artists have a similar sound to Jamie Berry's and often draw inspiration from similar genres, such as indie-pop, electro-swing, and soul.
 + 

listening to music by artists such as Parov Stelar, Caravan Palace, Gramatik, Fakear, and Svidden. These artists all produce upbeat electronic music with jazz, funk, and swing influences.
 +  listening to music by artists such as Parov Stelar, Caravan Palace, and Phonotonic. These artists also create electronic music that is heavily influenced by jazz, swing, and funk.
 +  music by

The Champs, Caravan Palace, The Swing Republic, Parov Stelar, and Stray Cats.
 +  music by:

- Parov Stelar 
- Caravan Palace 
- Yolanda Be Cool 
- Gramatik 
- Bajka


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Javad Hamidi also would enjoy
 +  other Iranian music, including traditional folk music and modern pop music. Popular Iranian singers include Mohsen Chavoshi, Farzad Farzin, Ebi, Googoosh, and Sasy Mankan.
 +  music by other Iranian musicians such as Mohsen Namjoo, Sattar, Ebi, Shahram Nazeri, Googoosh, and Mahasti.
 +  other Iranian artists such as Googoosh, Ebi, Mohsen Chavoshi, Farhad, Iman Gholami, and Morteza. These artists are often considered to be the pioneers of Persian Pop music and have helped shape the sound of modern Iranian music. Additionally, listeners may enjoy the vibrant sounds of various other Iranian music genres
 +  music by other Iranian artists, such as Barbad, Hamid Askari, and Mohsen Namjoo. These artists are known for combining traditional Persian music with modern electronic and pop genres, creating a unique sound. Other Iranian artists include Ehsan Khaje Amiri, Reza Yazdani, and Sasy Mankan.
 +  music by Mohammad Reza Shajarian. Both Javad Hamidi and Mohammad Reza Shajarian are two of the most renowned Iranian singers and composers of traditional Persian music. They both combine the sounds of classical Persian melodies with modern instrumentation and arrangements, creating a unique and timeless soundscape. While Javad Hamidi is known for his


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jazmin Bean also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other artists in the same genre such as Lizzo, Noname, and Solange. Other artists outside of the genre who have similar vibes include SZA, Kali Uchis, and Anderson .Paak.
 +  music by

Alicia Keys, Billie Eilish, Ella Fitzgerald, Lady Gaga, and Solange.
 +  listening to music by:

-Little Simz 
-Saba 
-Tory Lanez 
-Noname 
-Jessie Reyez 
-Aurora 
-Anderson .Paak 
-Kali Uchis 
-Masego 
-H.E.
 +  listening to music by other jazz artists such as Billie Holiday, Louis Armstrong, Ella Fitzgerald, Nina Simone and John Coltrane. They would also like listening to more contemporary jazz artists such as Esperanza Spalding, Robert Glasper and Kamasi Washington.
 +  listening to music by:

-Ari Lennox
-King Princess
-Noname
-SZA
-Syd
-Moses Sumney
-Jamila Woods
-Snoh Aalegra
-Kehlani
-Joji


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jazmin bean also would enjoy
 +  music from other genres. Examples of music from other genres that a fan of Jazmin Bean might enjoy include Pop, Hip Hop, R&B, EDM, Indie, and Folk.
 +  listening to other artists and genres that encompass a similar sound. These may include neo-soul, hip-hop, R&B, funk, and electronica. Other musicians who are similar in style to Jazmin bean may include Jamila Woods, Anderson .Paak, Frank Ocean, Mac Miller, Tyler the Creator, Eryk
 +  listening to music by:

- Noname
- Little Simz
- Jamila Woods
- Denzel Curry
- Anderson .Paak
- Solange
- Tierra Whack
- Smino
- Kali Uchis
- Thundercat
 +  the music of:

1. Kamaal Williams
2. Yussef Dayes
3. Kamasi Washington
4. BadBadNotGood
5. Flying Lotus
6. Thundercat
7. Georgia Anne Muldrow
8. Jean Grae
9. Robert Glasper
10. Hypnotic Brass
 +  music by

Solange, Anderson .Paak, Janelle Monáe, Flying Lotus, Georgia Anne Muldrow, Nai Palm, The Internet, Thundercat, Lauren Jauregui, and Kendrick Lamar.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jean Metzinger also would enjoy
 +  music by other artists from the early 20th century, such as Claude Debussy, Igor Stravinsky, Erik Satie, Béla Bartók, Paul Hindemith, Sergei Prokofiev, and Arnold Schoenberg. Additionally, they may be interested in modern classical music such as Philip Glass and Steve Reich.
 +  the works of other

Cubist artists such as Pablo Picasso, Fernand Leger, Georges Braque, Robert Delaunay, and Juan Gris. These artists all worked in the Cubist style to create highly abstracted and often fragmented representations of the world around them. Additionally, Metzinger's work was heavily influenced by early
 +  listening to music by Pablo Picasso. Both Metzinger and Picasso were prominent figures in the Cubist art movement, and their musical works share many of the same characteristics. They both experimented with new forms of expression, blending elements from popular and classical music styles. They both favored dissonant and atonal harmonies, combined with unexpected rhythms and
 +  listening to music by

Pablo Picasso, Fernand Léger, Sonia Delaunay, Robert Delaunay, Wassily Kandinsky, and other early 20th-century French avant-garde artists.
 +  listening to the work of other cubist painters, such as Pablo Picasso, Georges Braque, and Fernand Léger. Other French artists from the same era, including Henri Matisse and André Derain, also produced works that could be appreciated by fans of Metzinger's cubist paintings. Additionally, there are many modern


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jessica Simpson also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Britney Spears, Christina Aguilera, Miley Cyrus, Selena Gomez, Demi Lovato, and Ariana Grande.
 +  listening to music by Britney Spears, Christina Aguilera, Kelly Clarkson, and Miley Cyrus.
 +  listening to music from artists such as Mariah Carey, Ashlee Simpson, Britney Spears, Justin Timberlake, Kelly Clarkson, and Gwen Stefani.
 +  listening to music by Britney Spears. Britney Spears is a pop singer and songwriter who has achieved worldwide fame, and her music is similar in style to Jessica Simpson's. Both singers have released multiple albums across multiple genres, ranging from pop to dance to country. Their music often includes catchy hooks and memorable lyrics.
 +  music by

Britney Spears, Christina Aguilera, Miley Cyrus, and Selena Gomez.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jhariah also would enjoy
 +  artists such as:

-Lizzo 
-Billie Eilish
-Solange 
-Ariana Grande
-H.E.R. 
-Doja Cat 
-Kendrick Lamar 
-Beyoncé 
-Miguel 
-Khalid 
-The
 +  songs by

other reggae artists such as Bob Marley, Shaggy, Sean Paul, Shabba Ranks, Barrington Levy, Beenie Man, and Inner Circle.
 +  music by similar artists, such as Denzel Curry, Rico Nasty, Noname, Saba and Mick Jenkins. They may also enjoy music from hip-hop or R&B artists like Drake, Cardi B, Lil Uzi Vert, 21 Savage and Post Malone.
 +  listening to music from other R&B, soul, and hip-hop artists such as Beyonce, Drake, Usher, Rihanna, Alicia Keys, and The Weeknd.
 +  music from other genres, such as hip hop, rock, pop, EDM, and country. Jhariah's music is a cross-genre blend of many different genres, so fans should be open to exploring new styles of music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Jimi Hendrix also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Stevie Ray Vaughan, Janis Joplin, Cream, and Led Zeppelin. These artists were all contemporaries of Hendrix and are of a similar style of rock music. They often feature blues and psychedelic influences, along with heavy riffs and solos.
 +  listening to music by other musicians of the 1960s and '70s psychedelic rock and blues rock genre, such as Pink Floyd, Led Zeppelin, Cream, Janis Joplin, The Doors, and The Beatles. Other classic rock artists from later decades such as Bruce Springsteen, Bob Dylan, the Rolling Stones, and Neil Young would also
 +  music by

The Who, Led Zeppelin, Cream, Pink Floyd, Janis Joplin and other classic rock bands of the same era.
 +  music by:

Stevie Ray Vaughan, Cream, Led Zeppelin, The Who, Janis Joplin, Santana, The Doors, Mountain, and Eric Clapton.
 +  music from other legendary artists such as Eric Clapton, Led Zeppelin, The Beatles and Pink Floyd. These classic rock bands are often referred to as the "Big Four" of the 1960s and 1970s and have influenced generations of musicians with their iconic sound. Other artists that might appeal to a Jimi Hendrix fan include Stevie Ray


Prompt: A person who listens to music by John Marin also would enjoy
 +  music by

Miles Davis, Thelonious Monk, Charles Mingus, Duke Ellington, Ornette Coleman, and Bill Evans.
 +  music by George Gershwin. Both composers are considered to be masters of American classical music and have created works with a distinctively American sound. Gershwin's compositions feature elements of jazz, blues, and Latin music, while Marin's works combine Classical, Romantic, and modernist styles. Therefore, a person who enjoys John Marin
 +  listening to music by Bob Dylan, Bruce Springsteen, and Tom Waits.
 +  listening to

other classical composers like Ludwig van Beethoven, Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, and Johannes Brahms.
 +  listening to

other classical composers such as Bach, Brahms, and Beethoven. They may also enjoy listening to music from Romantic composers such as Chopin and Schubert, or 20th century composers such as Debussy and Ravel.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by John McCracken also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Joni Mitchell, Neil Young, Bob Dylan, Leonard Cohen, Bruce Springsteen, and Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young.
 +  listening to music by

Björk, Arcade Fire, Radiohead, Sufjan Stevens, Bon Iver, Billie Eilish, Lorde, St. Vincent, Daft Punk, and Beck.
 +  music by other artists such as: Pat Metheny, Bill Frisell, Lyle Mays, Herbie Hancock, Keith Jarrett, Chick Corea, Pat Martino, Jaco Pastorius, and Miles Davis.
 +  listening to other electronic music, such as Aphex Twin, Flying Lotus, Autechre, Squarepusher, and Boards of Canada. These artists are all often classified as "electronic" or "IDM," which stands for "intelligent dance music." Other musicians in the same genre include Kode9, Caribou, Four Tet
 +  music by

The War on Drugs, Wilco, Fleet Foxes, Sufjan Stevens, Tame Impala, Angel Olsen, Father John Misty, and Bon Iver.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Johnny Cash also would enjoy
 +  other music by artists such as Willie Nelson, Merle Haggard, Waylon Jennings, Elvis Presley, Hank Williams, Kris Kristofferson, and Bob Dylan. Cash was heavily influenced by these artists, and his music is often grouped with them in the genre of Outlaw Country. All of these artists are known for their thoughtful lyrics and
 +  listening to music by Willie Nelson. Willie Nelson and Johnny Cash both have a similar style of country music, so their music would appeal to similar audiences. Additionally, both artists have been around for decades and have had a major impact on the country music genre.
 +  listening to

Bob Dylan, Willie Nelson, Merle Haggard, Hank Williams Sr., Waylon Jennings, and Kris Kristofferson.
 +  music by:

Hank Williams, Willie Nelson, Merle Haggard, Bob Dylan, Elvis Presley, Patsy Cline.
 +  listening to music by Willie Nelson. Both artists are considered country music legends and they have very similar styles of playing guitar, singing, and songwriting. Willie Nelson has a more relaxed, laid-back style compared to Johnny Cash's darker and more somber sound. Both artists write about themes of love, loss, faith, and redemption in their music


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Johnny Flynn also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by:

Bon Iver, Fleet Foxes, The Decemberists, Laura Marling, Josh Ritter, Mumford and Sons, The Mountain Goats, Iron & Wine, and Conor Oberst.
 +  listening to music by:

- Laura Marling 
- Mumford & Sons 
- Ben Howard 
- Noah and the Whale 
- Stornoway
 +  listening to music by:

Bon Iver, Mumford & Sons, Laura Marling, Fleet Foxes, Iron & Wine, Ben Howard, Noah and the Whale, The Avett Brothers, Of Monsters and Men.
 +  listening to music by

Nick Drake, Bon Iver, Laura Marling, and Fleet Foxes.
 +  listening to music by

Noah and the Whale, Mumford & Sons, Laura Marling, Fleet Foxes, and The Lumineers.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Joji also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Billie Eilish, Khalid, and The Weeknd.
 +  music by

Lauv, Khalid, James Blake, Clairo, Rex Orange County, and J. Cole.
 +  listening to music by:

Trevor Daniel, Clams Casino, Rich Brian, Rex Orange County, Brockhampton, and Khalid.
 +  listening to music by artists such as: Lil Peep, Rich Brian, Clams Casino, Yukimi Nagano, and Thundercat.
 +  music by:

Brockhampton, Ruel, Khalid, Billie Eilish, Clairo, Tyler the Creator, Post Malone, and XXXTentacion.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Joseph Stella also would enjoy
 +  the music of

Paul Klee, Wassily Kandinsky, Georgia O'Keeffe, Jackson Pollock, and Mark Rothko.
 +  music by

other early-twentieth century modernist composers such as Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, and Bela Bartok. Additionally, they may be interested in the work of more recent classical composers like John Corigliano or Philip Glass.
 +  listening to music by

Vincent van Gogh, Wassily Kandinsky, Gustav Klimt, Marc Chagall, Pierre-Auguste Renoir, and Claude Monet.
 +  listening to music by

Maurice Ravel, Claude Debussy, Igor Stravinsky, and George Gershwin.
 +  listening to:

- Marcel Duchamp 
- Wassily Kandinsky 
- Georgia O'Keeffe 
- Piet Mondrian 
- Salvador Dali 
- Paul Klee 
- Francis Picabia 
- Marc Chagall 
- Max Ernst 
- Joan Miro.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Joy Hester also would enjoy
 +  the artwork of Joy Hester. Much of her work is known for its vivid colors and raw emotion, which can be seen in her paintings and drawings. Hester's artwork often reflects her inner emotions and feelings, offering viewers a glimpse into the artist's mind. Her work is highly expressive and provides an interesting insight into her life and struggles.
 +  listening to music by Janet Laurence, J. J. Cale, and Billie Eilish. 

Janet Laurence is a multi-instrumentalist from Australia who often composes ambient and experimental music. J.J. Cale was an American singer-songwriter and musician best known for his influence on the Tulsa
 +  listening to music by:

Nina Simone, Billie Holiday, Joni Mitchell, Bessie Smith, Big Mama Thornton, and Lead Belly.
 +  the music of

Emily King, Laura Marling, Norah Jones, Joni Mitchell, and Gillian Welch.
 +  listening to music from other artists and composers who share a similar style. Some similar artists and composers include:

1. John Cage
2. Arnold Schoenberg
3. Alan Hovhaness
4. Olivier Messiaen
5. Claude Debussy
6. Erik Satie
7. Anton Webern



Prompt: A person who listens to music by Joyce Ballentyne also would enjoy
 +  music by other artists such as Bob Dylan, John Lennon, Bruce Springsteen, Joni Mitchell, Billy Joel, Fleetwood Mac, Neil Young, Cat Stevens, Elton John, and many others. Depending on their preference and style, they may also appreciate the music of other genres such as jazz, classical, blues, hip-hop, and
 +  music by:

Kari Jobe, Lauren Daigle, Bethel Music, Hillsong Worship, Jeremy Camp, Chris Tomlin.
 +  listening to music by:

Joni Mitchell, Carly Simon, Leonard Cohen, Simon & Garfunkel, Bob Dylan, Joan Baez, Crosby Stills Nash & Young, Cat Stevens.
 +  listening to music by other female jazz singers such as Ella Fitzgerald, Billie Holiday, Sarah Vaughan, Nina Simone, and Dinah Washington. Other contemporary artists in the same genre that one may enjoy include Esperanza Spalding, Norah Jones, and Gregory Porter.
 +  music by other artists who play a similar style of music. Artists who play similar styles of music to Joyce Ballentyne include Emilie-Claire Barlow, Corinne Bailey Rae, Norah Jones, and Diana Krall.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Juan Gris also would enjoy
 +  music by other cubist artists like Pablo Picasso, Georges Braque, and Juan Miro.
 +  music by

other Spanish composers, such as Manuel de Falla, Joaquín Rodrigo, and Isaac Albéniz. Additionally, they might also be interested in the works of other 20th century European composers like Claude Debussy, Maurice Ravel, and Sergei Prokofiev.
 +  music by

other Spanish composers of the early 20th century such as Manuel de Falla, Isaac Albéniz, Joaquín Turina, and Joaquín Rodrigo.
 +  music by 
other Spanish composers of the early 20th century, such as Manuel de Falla, Joaquín Turina, and Isaac Albéniz. These composers were all contemporaries of Juan Gris and shared a similar style of composition, often referred to as the Spanish Nationalist School, which combined folk-inspired motifs with
 +  listening to music by

Pablo Picasso, Joan Miró, Salvador Dalí, and Marcel Duchamp.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Julee Cruise also would enjoy
 +  artists like Mazzy Star, Chris Isaak, and Cocteau Twins. These artists share a similar dreamy, ethereal sound. They often feature a mix of jazz and alternative rock elements in their music.
 +  music by 
Cocteau Twins, Mazzy Star, and Air.
 +  other music in the same genre such as:

-Mazzy Star 
-Luna 
-Tarnation 
-Vast 
-The Sundays 
-Cocteau Twins 
-4AD Records artists 
-The Cranberries 
-Lush 
-Smashing Pumpkins
 +  music by:

Cocteau Twins, Mazzy Star, Air, Broadcast, The Sundays, Beach House, Cat Power, Cults, Lykke Li, and St. Vincent.
 +  music by

Laurie Anderson, David Sylvian, Chris Isaak, Angelo Badalamenti, Hope Sandoval, Bill Nelson, and Cocteau Twins.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kay Nielson also would enjoy
 +  music from other influential composers such as George Gershwin, Leonard Bernstein, Irving Berlin, Erik Satie, and Claude Debussy. These composers also had a powerful influence on the development of popular music and their works often show similarities to Nielson's style.
 +  listening to music by

Gustav Holst, Ralph Vaughan Williams, Maurice Ravel, Sergei Prokofiev, and Igor Stravinsky.
 +  listening music by

Viktor Klimenko, Carl Nielsen, and Edvard Grieg.
 + 

listening to music by other Scandinavian composers such as Edward Grieg, Jean Sibelius, Edvard Hagerup Bull, Ole Bull, and Carl Nielsen.
 +  listening to music by 
Gustav Holst. Both composers have made significant contributions to the world of classical music. Holst's The Planets suite is one of his most famous works and is often performed in concert halls around the world. Additionally, Holst wrote other pieces such as The Perfect Fool, A Moorside Suite and


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kenneth Noland also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Milton Avery, Morris Louis, Helen Frankenthaler, Jules Olitski, and Sam Francis.
 +  works by

other Color Field painters such as Mark Rothko, Morris Louis, Helen Frankenthaler, Friedel Dzubas, Jules Olitski, and Sam Francis.
 +  listening to artists such as Mark Rothko, Frank Stella, and Ellsworth Kelly. These abstract expressionist and minimalist artists were all contemporaries of Noland and their works often share similar formal elements and visual language. Additionally, the work of Agnes Martin and Ad Reinhardt could also be appreciated by someone who enjoys Kenneth Noland's music.
 +  listening to music by

Frank Stella, Helen Frankenthaler, Morris Louis, Robert Ryman, and Jules Olitski.
 +  the works of other abstract expressionist painters such as Jackson Pollock, Mark Rothko, Willem de Kooning, Franz Kline, and Morris Louis. These artists are all associated with the Abstract Expressionism movement and share similar styles with Kenneth Noland in their use of vibrant colors and strong brush strokes. Other abstract painters to explore


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kevin Rudolf also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Flo Rida, Drake, and Lil Wayne.
 +  music by

Flo Rida, Pitbull, LMFAO, Lil Jon, T-Pain, Akon, Rihanna, Drake, Jay Sean, and Ne-Yo.
 +  music from:

-Flo Rida
-Pitbull
-Lil Wayne
-T-Pain
-Usher
-Jay Sean
-Jason Derulo
-Enrique Iglesias
 +  listening to music by Flo Rida, Pitbull, and Lil Wayne.
 +  listening to music from the following artists:

-Flo Rida 
-Floating Points 
-The Black Eyed Peas 
-Mark Ronson 
-Sean Kingston 
-Kanye West 
-Lil Wayne 
-Snoop Dogg 
-T.I. 
-


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kid606 also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by

Venetian Snares, Aphex Twin, Autechre, Flying Lotus, and Amon Tobin.
 +  music by Aphex Twin. They both make electronic music that relies heavily on synthesizers and samples, but Kid606's style is more influenced by hip-hop and drum and bass while Aphex Twin is more experimental and explores more avant-garde sounds.
 +  music from Aphex Twin. The two musicians have a similar electronic style and use of samples, and both rely heavily on experimentation in their music. Aphex Twin is known for creating complex soundscapes using an array of synthesizers, drums and percussion instruments, while Kid606 often combines elements of hip-hop, techno, drum 'n' bass
 +  listening to other experimental electronic music, such as Aphex Twin, Autechre, and Venetian Snares. Other related genres could include glitch, ambient, noise, and IDM.
 +  listening to music by similar artists such as Aphex Twin, Squarepusher, Venetian Snares, Autechre, Boards of Canada, and Luke Vibert.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kikuo also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by other Japanese producers, such as:

-Yuyoyuppe 
-Konishi 
-Bump of Chicken 
-Utsu-P 
-Kensuke Ushio 
-Teddyloid 
-CosMo 
-Hige Driver 
-
 +  music by other producers such as DECO*27, Orangestar, kemu, BNSI, and Dixie Flatline. These producers all specialize in Japanese Vocaloid-style music, often featuring the voices of Hatsune Miku, KAITO, and Kagamine Rin. Other artists to explore would be EK
 +  music by:

Vocaloid producers such as Teto, Neru, and Hachi, as well as other electronic music producers such as DECO*27 and otetsu.
 +  listening to music by Yuki Kajiura, who is a Japanese composer known for creating soundtracks for video games and anime. Her style of music is often described as a mix of classical, jazz, and electronic elements. Her soundscapes are characterized by sweeping instrumental melodies and hauntingly beautiful vocals. Fans of Kikuo's music should enjoy Y
 +  listening to music by:

Hachi, KOKIA, Reol, ChouchouP, DECO*27, Mothy_AKuMA, Giga, and EKLIPES.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Kim Petras also would enjoy
 +  listening to music by Charli XCX, Doja Cat, and Billie Eilish.
 +  listening to music by Charli XCX, Dorian Electra, Troye Sivan, Ariana Grande, and Avril Lavigne.
 +  listening to music by other female pop singers such as Ariana Grande, Billie Eilish, Dua Lipa, Halsey and Charli XCX.
 +  listening to music by 

Charli XCX, Billie Eilish, Troye Sivan, Kygo, and Ariana Grande.
 +  the music of Charli XCX, Sophie, and PC Music. Charli XCX is a British singer-songwriter who has released several charting singles, including "Boom Clap" and "Fancy" with Iggy Azalea. Sophie is a Scottish electronic artist who has collaborated with artists such as Charli X


Prompt: A person who listens to music by King Princess also would enjoy
 +  music by artists such as Billie Eilish, Beabadoobee, Hayley Williams, Halsey, Maggie Rogers, Phoebe Bridgers, Soccer Mommy, and Troye Sivan.
 +  listening to music by:

Carly Rae Jepsen, Hayley Kiyoko, Troye Sivan, Miley Cyrus, Clairo, Lorde, Grimes, Charli XCX, Paramore, Alicia Keys.
 +  listening to music by:

Billie Eilish, Troye Sivan, Halsey, Bad Bunny, Charli XCX, Brockhampton, Hayley Kiyoko, and Maggie Rogers.
 +  music by:

-Hozier 
-Billie Eilish 
-AURORA 
-Lana Del Rey 
-Hayley Kiyoko 
-Phoebe Bridgers 
-Harry Styles 
-Troye Sivan 
-Sylvan Esso 

 +  music by 

Rina Sawayama, Clairo, Charli XCX, Hayley Kiyoko, Phoebe Bridgers, and Kim Petras.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Labyrinth also would enjoy
 +  music from other metal bands such as Iron Maiden, Metallica, Judas Priest, Black Sabbath, Megadeth and Slayer. They may also enjoy listening to more classic heavy metal bands such as Motorhead and Saxon. Additionally, they may appreciate progressive metal bands like Dream Theater, Symphony X and Fates Warning as well as power metal bands like
 +  music by

Iron Maiden, Blind Guardian, Judas Priest, Dio, Black Sabbath, Helloween, Dream Theater, AC/DC, Van Halen, Megadeth, and Metallica.
 +  music by

Nightwish, Within Temptation, Epic Soul Factory, Evanescence, and Kamelot.
 +  music by other metal bands such as Iron Maiden, Metallica, Black Sabbath, Judas Priest, Megadeth, and Motorhead. They might also enjoy some of the newer metal bands such as Slipknot, Avenged Sevenfold, Trivium, and Bullet for My Valentine. Additionally, fans of Labyrinth may enjoy music from other genres
 +  listening to music by Muse. Both bands are rock bands that incorporate elements of progressive, experimental and alternative rock into their music.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Lacuna coil also would enjoy
 +  music by:

-Evanescence
-Within Temptation
-Epica
-Nightwish
-In This Moment
-Halestorm
-Arch Enemy
-The Agonist
-Motionless In White
-Delain
 +  music by:

1. Within Temptation
2. Evanescence
3. HIM
4. Nightwish
5. Epica 
6. Theatres des Vampires
7. After Forever
8. Delain
9. Opeth
10. Sirenia
 +  other bands that have a similar style. Bands such as Evanescence, Within Temptation, Nightwish, Delain, Epica, and Xandria are all comparable in sound to Lacuna Coil.
 +  music by:

-Within Temptation
-Epica
-Nightwish
-The Gathering
-Draconian
-Leaves' Eyes
-Evanescence
-Delain
-Kamelot
 +  music from other gothic metal or alternative metal bands, such as Motionless In White, In This Moment, Evanescence, Falling in Reverse, Three Days Grace, Breaking Benjamin, and Asking Alexandria.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Lady Gaga also would enjoy
 +  music by

Katy Perry, Taylor Swift, Ariana Grande, Rihanna, Selena Gomez, Miley Cyrus, Ke$ha, Nicki Minaj, Demi Lovato.
 +  listening to music by Rihanna, Katy Perry and Britney Spears.
 +  music by

Katy Perry, Rihanna, Selena Gomez, Ariana Grande, Britney Spears, Taylor Swift, Demi Lovato, Miley Cyrus, Nicki Minaj.
 +  listening to music by Katy Perry, Pink,and Rihanna.
 +  music by

Katy Perry, Ariana Grande, Selena Gomez, Rihanna, Miley Cyrus, Demi Lovato, Nicki Minaj, Britney Spears, Taylor Swift, and Beyoncé.


Prompt: A person who listens to music by Lana Del Rey also would enjoy
 +  music by Billie Eilish, Halsey, Lorde, and Ariana Grande.
 +  music by Lorde, Billie Eilish, and Halsey.
 +  listening to music from similar artists like Lorde, Billie Eilish, Banks, and Halsey.
 +  listening to music by:

-Billie Eilish 
-Ariana Grande
-Halsey
-Dua Lipa 
-Lady Gaga 
-Taylor Swift 
-Katy Perry 
-Selena Gomez 
-Bebe Rexha
-Charli XCX
 +  music by Lorde, Billie Eilish, and Halsey.

